UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
Form10-K
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020
Or
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT
OF 1934
For the transition period from              to             
Commission file number: 001-32877
Mastercard Incorporated
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 13-4172551
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(IRS Employer
Identification Number)
2000 Purchase Street
Purchase, NY 10577
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
(914) 249-2000
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol Name of each exchange of which registered
Class A Common Stock, par value $0.0001 per
share MA New York Stock Exchange
1.1% Notes due 2022 MA22 New York Stock Exchange
2.1% Notes due 2027 MA27 New York Stock Exchange
2.5% Notes due 2030 MA30 New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
Class B common stock, par value $0.0001 per share
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required
to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be
submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such
shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or
an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth
company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check One):
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐(do not check if a smaller reporting company) Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with
any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13 (a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its
internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting
firm that prepared or issued its audit report.☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes ☐ No ☒
The aggregate market value of the registrant’s Class A common stock, par value $0.0001 per share, held by non-affiliates (using the New York Stock
Exchange closing price as of June 30, 2020, the last business day of the registrant’s most recently completed second fiscal quarter) was
approximately $261.3 billion. There is currently no established public trading market for the registrant’s Class B common stock, par value $0.0001 per
share. As of February 9, 2021, there were 985,146,914 shares outstanding of the registrant’s Class A common stock, par value $0.0001 per share
and 8,215,424 shares outstanding of the registrant’s Class B common stock, par value $0.0001 per share.
Portions of the registrant’s definitive proxy statement for the 2021 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference into Part III hereof.
MASTERCARD INCORPORA TED FISCAL YEAR 2020 FORM 10-K ANNUAL REPOR T
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PART I6 Item 1. Business
20 Item 1A. Risk factors
33 Item 1B. Unresolved staf f comments
33 Item 2. Properties
33 Item 3. Legal proceedings
33 Item 4. Mine safety disclosures
34 - Information about our executive of ficers
PART II38 Item 5. Market for registrant’ s common equity , related stockholder matters and issuer purchases
of equity securities
40 Item 6. Selected financial data
41 Item 7. Management’ s discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations
55 Item 7A. Quantitative and qualitative disclosures about market risk
56 Item 8. Financial statements and supplementary data
105 Item 9. Changes in and disagreements with accountants on accounting and financial disclosure
105 Item 9A. Controls and procedures
105 Item 9B. Other Information
PART III107 Item 10. Directors, executive of ficers and corporate governance
107 Item 11. Executive compensation
107 Item 12. Security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management and related
stockholder matters
107 Item 13. Certain relationships and related transactions, and director independence
107 Item 14. Principal accountant fees and services
PART IV109 Item 15. Exhibits and financial statement schedules
109 Item 16. Form 10-K summary
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 3
In this Report on Form 10-K (“Report”), refere nces to the “Company ,” “Mastercard,” “we,” “us” or “our” refer to the business
conducted by Mastercard Incorporated and its consolidated subsidiaries, including our operating subsidiary , Mastercard International
Incorporated, and to the Mastercard brand.
Forward-Looking Statements
This Report contains forward-looking statements pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform
Act of 1995.  All statements other than statements of historical facts may be forward-looking statements. When used in this Report,
the words “believe”, “expect”, “could”, “may”, “would”, “will”, “trend” and similar words are intended to identify forward-looking
statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements that relate to the Company’ s future
prospects, developments and business strategies.
Many factors  and uncertainties relating to our operations and business environment, all of which are difficult to predict and many of
which are outside of our control, influence whether any forward-looking statements can or will be achieved. Any one of those factors
could cause our actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in writing in any forward-looking statements made
by Mastercard or on its behalf, including, but not limited to, the following factors:
•regulation directly related to the payments industry (including regulatory , legislative and litigation activity with respect to
interchange rates and surcharging)
•the impact of preferential or protective government actions
•regulation of privacy , data, security and the digital economy
•regulation that directly or indirectly applies to us based on our participation in the global paymen ts industry (including anti-money
laundering, counter financing of terrorism, economic sanctions and anti-corruption; account-base d payment systems; and issuer
practice legislation and regulation)
•the impact of changes in tax laws, as well as regulations and interpretations of such laws or challenges to our tax positions
•potential or incurred liability and limitations on business related to any litigation or litigation settlements
•the impact of the global coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic and containment measures taken in response
•the impact of competition in the global payments industry (including disintermediation and pricing pressure)
•the challenges relating to rapid technological developments and changes
•the challeng es relating to operating a real-time account-based payment system and to workin g with new customers and end
users
•the impact of information security incidents, account data breaches or service disruptions
•issues related to our relationships with our customers (including loss of substantial busine ss from significant customers,
competitor relationships with our customers and banking industry consolidation), merchants and governments
•exposure to loss or illiquidity due to our role as guarantor and other contractual obligations
•the impact of global economic, political, financial and societal events and conditions, including adverse currency fluctuations and
foreign exchange controls
•reputational impact, including impact related to brand perception and lack of visibility of our brands in products and services
•the inability to attract, hire and retain a highly qualified and diverse workforce, or maintain our corporate culture
•issues related to acquisition integration, strategic investments and entry into new businesses
•issues related to our Class A common stock and corporate governance structure
Please see “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A for a complete discussion of these risk factors. We caution you that the important factors
referenced above may not contain all of the factors that are important to you. Our forward-looking statements speak only as of the
date of this Report or as of the date they are made, and we undertake no obligation to update our forward-looking statements.
4 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
Item 1. Business
Item 1A. Risk factors
Item 1B. Unresolved staff comments
Item 2. Properties
Item 3. Legal proceedings
Item 4. Mine safety disclosures
Information about our executive officers
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Item 1. Business
Overview
Mastercard is a technology company in the global payments industry that connects consumers, financial institutions, merchants,
governments, digital partners, businesses and other organizations worldwide, enabling them to use electronic forms of payment
instead of cash and checks. We make payments easier and more efficient by providing a wide range of payment solution s and
services using our family of well-known brands, including Mastercard®, Maestro® and Cirrus®. We operate a multi-rail network that
offers custom ers one partner to turn to for their domestic and cross-border payment needs. Through our unique and proprietary
global payments network, which we refer to as our core network, we switch (authorize, clear and settle) payment transactions and
deliver related products and services. We have additional payment capabilities that include automated clearing house (“ACH”)
transactions (both batch and real-time account-based payments). We also provide integrated value-added offerings such as cyber
and intellige nce produc ts, information and analytics services, consulting, loyalty and reward programs, processing and open
banking. Our payment solutions offer customers choice and flexibility and are designed to ensure safety and security for the global
payments system.
A typical transaction on our core network involves four participants in addition to us: account holder (a person or entity who holds a
card or uses another device enabled for paym ent), issuer (the account holder ’s financial institution), merchant and acquirer (the
merchant’ s financial institution). We do not issue cards, extend credit, determine or receive revenue from interest rates or other fees
charged to account holders by issuers, or establish the rates charged by acquirers in connection with merchants’ acceptance of our
products. In most cases, account holder relationships belong to, and are managed by , our customers.
We generate  revenues from assessing our customers based on the gross dollar volume (“GDV”) of activity on the products that carry
our brands, from the fees we charge to our customers for providing transaction switching and from other payment-related products
and services.
For a full discussion of our business, please see page 8.
Our Performance
The following are our key financial and operational highlights for 2020, including growth rates over the prior year:
GAAP
Net revenue Net income Diluted EPS
$15.3B $6.4B $6.37
down 9% down 21% down 20%
Non-GAAP  (currency-neutral)
Net revenue Adjusted net income Adjusted diluted EPS
$15.3B $6.5B $6.43
down 8% down 17% down 16%
$6.1B$4.5B Repurchased shares$7.2B
in capital returned  
to stockholders$1.6BDividends paid
 cash flows  
 from operations
Gross dollar volume
(growth on a local currency basis)
Cross-border volume growth
(on a local currency basis)
Switched transactions
$6.3Tdown 29%90.1B
flat up 3%
Non-GAAP results exclude the impact of gains and losses on equity investments, Special Items and/or foreign currency. See “Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations - Financial Results Overview” in Part II, Item 7 for the reconciliation to
the most direct comparable GAAP financial measures.1
1
6 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
The coronavirus (“COVID-19”) outbreak and its negative impact on the global economy affected our 2020 performance, during which
we saw unfavorable trends compared to historical periods. For a full discussion of this impact, see “Manag ement’ s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operation” in Item II, Part 7.
Our Strategy
We grow , diversify and build our business through a combination of organic and inorganic strategic initiatives. Our ability to grow our
business is influenced by:
•personal consumption expenditure (“PCE”) growth
•driving cash and check transactions toward electronic forms of payment
•increasing our share in the payments space
•providing integrated value-added products and services
•providing enhanced payment capabilities to capture new payment flows, such as business to business (“B2B”), person to person
(“P2P”), business to consumer (“B2C”) and government payments.
GROW DIVERSIFY BUILD
CORE CUSTOMERS AND GEOGRAPHIES NEW AREAS
Credit
Debit
Commercial
Prepaid
Digital-Physical Convergence
AcceptanceFinancial Inclusion
New Markets
Businesses
Governments
Merchants
Digital Players
Local Schemes/SwitchesData Analytics
Consulting
Marketing Services
Loyalty
Cyber and Intelligence
Processing
New Payment Flows
Open Banking
ENABLED BY BRAND, DA TA, TECHNOLOGY AND PEOPLE
Grow . We focus on growing our core business globally , including growing our consumer and commercial products and solutions, as
well as increasing the number of payment transa ctions we switch. We also look to provide effective and efficient payments solutions
that cater to the evolving ways people interact and transact in the growing digital economy . This includes expanding merchant
access to electronic payments through new technologies in an effort to deliver a better consumer experience, while creating greater
efficiencies and security .
Diversify . We diversify our business by:
•working with new customers, including governments, merchants, financial technology companies (fintechs), digital players, mobile
providers and other corporate businesses
•scaling our capabilities and business into new geographies, including growing acceptance in markets with limited electronic
payments acceptance today
•broadening financial inclusion for the unbanked and underbanked
Build. We build our business by:
•creating and acquiring differentiated products and platforms to provide unique, innovative solutions that we bring to market to
support new payment flows and related applica tions, such as real-time account-based payments and the Mastercard Track™
suite of products
•providing services across data analytics, consulting, marketing services, loyalty , cyber and intelligence, and processing
•providing open banking capabilities to enable the reliable access, transmission and management of consumer-consented data
Strategic Partners. We work with a variety of stakeholders. We provide financial institutions with solutions to help them increase
revenue by driving preference for our products and services. We help merchants, financial institutions, gove rnments, and other
organizations by delivering data-driven insights and other services that help them grow and create simple and secure customer
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 7
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
experiences. We partner with technology companies such as digital players, fintechs and mobile providers to deliver digital payment
solutions powered by our technology , expertise and security protocols. We help national and local governments improve financial
inclusion and efficiencies, reduce costs, increase  transparency of financial transactions and data to reduce crime and corruption and
advance social program s. For consum ers, we provide faster , safer and more convenient ways to pay and transfer funds and
exchange information to enable services.
Talent and Culture.  Our success is driven by the skills, experience, integrity and mindset of the talent we hire. We attract and retain
top talent from diverse backgrounds and industries by building a world-class culture based on decency , respect and inclusion where
people have opportunities to perform purpose-driven work that impacts customers, communities and co-workers on a global scale.
The diversity and skill sets of our people underpin everything we do.
Our Business
Our Operations and Network
We operate a multi-rail network that offers our customers one partner to turn to for their domesti c and cross-border needs. Our core
network links issuers and acquirers around the globe to facilitate the switching of transactions, permitting account holders to use a
Mastercard product at millions of acceptance locations worldwide. Our core network facilitates an efficient and secure means for
receiving payments, a convenient, quick and secure payment method for consumers to access their funds and a channel for
businesses to receive insight through information that is derived from our network. We enable transactions for our customers
through our core network in more than 150 currencies and in more than 210 countries and territories. Our range of capabilities
extend beyond our core network into real-time account-based payments and open banking.
Core Network T ransactions.  Our core network suppo rts what is often referred to as a “four-party” payments network. The following
diagram depicts a typical transaction on our core network, and our role in that transaction:
In a typical transaction, an account holder purchases goods or services from a merchant using one of our payment products. After
the transaction is author ized by the issuer , the issuer pays the acquirer an amount equal to the value of the transaction, minus the
interchange fee (described below), and then posts the transaction to the account holder ’s account. The acquirer pays the amount of
the purchase, net of a discount (referred to as the “merchant discount” rate), to the merchant.
•Interchange Fees.  Interchange fees reflect the value merchants receive from accepting our products and play a key role in
balancing the costs and benefits that consumers and merchants derive. Generally , interchange fees are collected from acquirers
and paid to issuers to reimburse the issuers for a portion of the costs incurred. These costs are incurred  by issuers in providing
services that benefit all participants in the system, including acquirers and merchants, whose participation in the network enables
increased sales to their existing and new customers, efficiencies in the delivery of existing and new products, guaranteed
payments and improved  experience for the customers. We (or, alternatively , financial institutions) establish “default interchange
fees” that apply when there are no other established settlement terms in place between an issuer and an acquirer . We administer
the collection and remittance of interchange fees through the settlement process.
8 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
•Additional Four-Party System Fees.  The merchant discount rate is established by the acquirer to cover its costs of both
participating in the four-party system and providing services to merchants. The rate takes into consideration the amount of the
interchange fee which the acquirer generally pays to the issuer . Additionally , acquirers may charge merchants processing and
related fees in addition to the merchant discount rate. Issuers may also charge account holders fees for the transaction,
including, for example, fees for extending revolving credit.
Switched Transactions
•Authorization, Clearing  and Settlement.  Through our core network, we enable the routin g of a transaction to the issuer for its
approval, facilitate the exchange of financial transaction information between issuers and acquirers after a successfully
conducted transaction, and help to settle the transaction by facilitating the exchange of funds  between parties via settlement
banks chosen by us and our customers.
•Cross-Border and Domestic. Our core network switch es transactions throughout the world when the merchant country and
country of issuance are different (“cross-border transactions”), providing account holders with the ability to use, and merchants to
accept, our products and services across country borders. We also provide switche d transaction services to customers where the
merchant country and the country of issuance are the same (“domestic transactions”). We switch over 55% of all transactions for
Mastercard and Maestro-branded cards, includin g nearly all cross-border transactions. We switch the majority of Mastercard and
Maestro-branded domestic transactions in the United States, United Kingdom, Canada, Brazil and a select number of other
countries.
Core Network Architecture. Our core network featur es a globally integrated structure that provides scale for our issuers, enabling
them to expand into regional and global markets. It is based largely on a distributed (peer-to-peer) architecture with an intelligent
edge that enables the network to adapt to the needs of each transaction. Our core network accomplishes this by performing
intelligent routing and applying multiple value-a dded services (such as fraud scoring, tokenization services, etc.) to appropriate
transactions in real time. Our core network’ s architecture enables us to connect all parties regardless of where or how the
transaction is occurring. It has 24-hour a day availability and world-class response time.
Real-time Account-based Payment Infrastructure and Applications. Augmenting our core network, we offer real-time account-
based payment capabilities, enabling payments between bank accounts in real-time in countries in which it has been deployed.
Open Banking.  We offer a platform that enables data providers and third parties to reliably access, securely transmit and confidently
manage customer-consented data to improve the customer experience.
Payments System Security . Our payment solutions and products are designed to ensure safety and security for the global
payments system. Our core network and additional platforms incorporate multiple layers of protection, providing greater resiliency
and best-in-class security protection. Our program s are assessed by third parties and incorporate benchmarking and other data from
peer companies and consultants. We engage in many efforts to mitigate information security challenges, including maintaining an
information security program, an enterprise resilience program and insurance coverage, as well as regularly testing our systems to
address potential vulner abilities. Through the combined efforts of our Security Operations Centers, Fusion Centers and Masterca rd
Intelligence Center , we work with experts across the organization (as well as through other sources such as public-private
partnerships), to monitor and respond quickly to a range of cyber and physical threats.
As part of our multi-layered approach to protec t the global payments system, we also work with issuers, acquirers, merchants,
governments and payments industry associatio ns to help develop and put in place standards (e.g., EMV) for safe and secure
transactions.
Digital Payments.  Our network  supports and enables our digital payment platforms, products and solutions, reflec ting the growing
digital econo my where consumers are increasin gly seeking to use their payment accounts to pay when, where and how they want.
For a full discussion of the ways our innovation capabilities enable digital payments, see “Our Products and Services - Digital
Enablement” below .
Customer Risk.  We guarantee the settle ment of many of the transactions from issuers to acquirers to ensure the integrity of our
core network. We refer to the amount of this guarantee as our settlement exposure. We do not, however , guarantee payments to
merchants by their acquirers or the availability of unspent prepaid account holder account balances.
Our Franchise.  We manage  an ecosystem of stakeholders who participate in our network. Our franchise creates and sustains a
comprehensive series of value exchanges across our ecosystem. We ensure a balanced ecosystem where all participants benefit
from the availability , innovation and safety and security of our network. We achieve this through the following key activities:
•Participant Onboarding.  We ensure the capability of new customers to use our network, and define the roles and
responsibilities for their operations once on the network
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 9
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
•Safety and Security . We establish the core principles, including ensuring consumer protections and integrity , so participants feel
confident to transact on the network.
•Operating Standards.  We define the operation al, technical and financ ial policies to which network participants are required to
adhere.
•Responsible Stewardship.  We establish performance standards to support  ecosystem growth and optimization and estab lish
proactive monitoring to ensure participant performance.
•Issue Resolution.  We operate a framework to enable the resolution of disputes for both customers and consumers.
Our Products and Services
We provide a wide variety of integrated products and services that support products that customers can of fer to their account holders
and merchants. These offerings facilitate  transactions across our multi-rail payment network among account holders, merchants,
financial institutions, businesses, governments and other organizations in markets globally .
Core Payment Products
Consumer Credit.  We offer a number of products that enable issuers to provide consumers with credit that allow them to defer
payment. These programs are designed to meet the need s of our customers around the world and address standard, premium and
affluent consumer segments.
Consumer Debit. We support a range of payment products and solutions that allow our customers to provide consumers with
convenient access to funds in deposit and other  accounts. Our debit and deposit access programs can be used to make purchases
and to obtain cash in bank branches, at ATMs and, in some cases, at the point of sale. Our branded debit programs consist of
Mastercard (including standard, premium and affluent offerings), Maestro (the only PIN-based solution that operates globally) and
Cirrus (our primary global cash access solution).
Prepaid. Prepaid accounts are a type of electronic payment that enables consumers to pay in adva nce whether or not they
previously had a bank account or a credit history . These accounts can be tailored to meet specific  program, customer or consumer
needs, such as paying bills, sending person-to-person payments or withdrawing cash from an ATM. Our focus ranges from digital
accounts (such as fintech and gig economy platforms) to business programs such as employee payroll, health savings accounts and
solutions for small business owners). Our prepaid programs also of fer opportunities in the private and public sectors to drive financial
inclusion of previously unbanked individuals through social security payments, unemployment benefits and salary cards.
10 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
We also provide prepaid  program management services, primarily outside of the United States, that provide processing and end-to-
end services on behalf of issuers or distributor partners such as airlines, foreign exchange bureaus and travel agents.
Commercial Credit and Debit. We offer commercial credit and debit payment products and solutions that meet the payment needs
of large corporations, midsize companies, small businesses and government entities. Our solutions streamline procurement and
payment processes, manage information and expenses (such as travel and entertainment) and reduce administrative costs. Our
card offerings include travel, small business (debit and credit), purchasing and fleet cards. Our SmartData platform provides
expense management and reporting capabilities . Our Mastercard In Cont rol™ platform generates virtual account numbers which
provide businesses with enhanced controls, more security and better data. Our Masterc ard Track Business Payment Service™
(Track BPS) is aimed at improving the way businesses pay and get paid by providing a single connection enabling access to multiple
payment rails, greater control and richer data to optimize B2B transactions for both buyers and suppliers.
The following chart provides GDV and number of cards featuring our brands in 2020 for select programs and solutions:
Year Ended December 31, 2020 As of December 31, 2020
GDV Cards
(in billions) Growth (Local) % of Total GDV (in millions)Percentage
Increase from
December 31,
2019
Mastercard-branded Programs
    Consumer Credit $ 2,425 (7)% 38 % 894 2 %
    Consumer Debit and Prepaid 3,230 8 % 51 % 1,338 11 %
    Commercial Credit and Debit 682 (6)% 11 % 102 22 %
Excludes Maestro and Cirrus cards and volume generated by those cards.
Prepaid includes both consumer and commercial prepaid.
New Payment Products and Open Banking
In addition to the switching capabilities of our core network, we offer platforms with payment capabilities that support new payment
flows and related applications:
•We offer real-time account-based payments for ACH transactions. This platform enables payments between bank accounts in
real time and provides enhanced data and messaging capabilities.
•We offer applications including those that make  it easier for consumers to view, manage and pay their bills either with cards or
real-time and batch ACH payments from their bank accounts, and that enable consumers, businesses, governments and
merchants to send and receive money beyond borders with greater speed and ease.
•We offer an open banking platform that allows data providers and third parties to reliably  access, securely transmit and
confidently manage customer-consented data to improve the customer experience.
Value-Added Products and Services
Cyber and Intelligence. We offer integrated products and services to prevent, detect and respond to fraud and cyber-attacks and to
ensure the safety of transactions made using Mastercard products. We do this using a multi-layered safety and security strategy:
•The “Prevent” layer prote cts infrastructure, devices and data from attacks. We have continued to grow global usage of EMV chip
and contactless security technology , helping to reduce fraud. Greater usag e of this technology has increased the number of EMV
cards issued and the transaction volume on EMV cards.
•The “Identify” layer allow s us to help banks and merchants verify the authenticity of consumers during the payment process using
various biom etric technologies, including fingerprint, face and iris scanning technology to verify online purchases on mobile
devices, as well as a card with biometric technology built in.
•The “Detect ” layer spots fraudulent behavior and cyber-attacks and takes action to stop these activities once detected. Our
offerings in this space include alerts when accou nts are exposed to data breaches or security incidents, fraud scoring technology
that scans billions of dollars of money flows each day while increasing approvals and reducing false declines, and network-level
monitoring on a global scale to help identify the occurrence of widespread fraud attacks when the customer (or their processor)
may be unable to detect or defend against them.
•The “Experie nce” layer improves the security experience for our stakeholders in areas from the speed of transactions, enhancing
approvals for online and card-on-file payments, to the ability to differentiate legitimate consumers from fraudulent ones. Our
offerings in this space include solutions for consumer alerts and controls and a suite of digital token services. We also of fer an e-1,2
1
2
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 11
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
commerce fraud and dispute management network that enables merchants to stop delivery when a fraudulent or disputed
transaction is identified, and issuers to refund the cardholder to avoid the chargeback process. Moreover , we use our AI and data
analytics, along with our cyber risk assessment capabilities, to help financial institutions, merchants, corporations and
governments secure their digital assets
We have also worked with our customers to provide products to consumers globally with increase d confidence through the benefit of
“zero liability”, where the consumer bears no responsibility for counterfeit or lost card losses in the event of fraud.
Loyalty and Rewards. We have built a scalable rewards platform that enables customers to provide consumers with a variety of
benefits and services, such as personalized offers and rewards, access to a global airline lounge network, concierge services,
insurance services, emergency card replacement, emergency cash advances and a 24-hour account holder service center . For
merchants, we provide campaigns with targeted offers and rewards, management services for publishing offers, and accelerated
points programs for co-brand and rewards program members. We also provide a loyalty platform that enables stronger relationships
with retailer s, restaurants, airlines and consumer packaged goods companies by creating experiences that drive loyalty and
impactful consumer engagement.
Processing.  We extend our processi ng capabilities in the payments value chain in various regions and across the globe with an
expanded suite of of ferings, including:
•Issuer solutions designed to provide customers with a complete processing solution to help them create differentiated products
and services and allow quick deployment of payments portfolios across banking channels.
•Payment gateways that offer a single interface to provide e-commerce merchants with the ability to process secure online and in-
app payments and offer value-added solutions, including outsourced electronic payments, fraud prevention and alternative
payment options.
•Mobile gateways that facilitate transaction routing and processing for mobile-initiated transactions.
Data Analytics and Consulting. We provide proprietary analysis, data-driven consulting and marketing services solutions to help
clients optimize, streamline and grow their businesses, as well as deliver value to consumers.
Our capabil ities incorpo rate payments expertise and analytical and executional skills to create end-to-end solutions which are
increasingly delivered via platforms embedded in our customers’ day-to-day operations. By observing  patterns of payments behavior
based on billions of transactions switched globally , we leverage anonymized and aggregat ed information and a consultative
approach to help our customers make better business decisions. Our executional skills such as marketing, digital implementation
and program management allow us to assist customers to implement actions based on these insights.
We utilize our expertise and tools to collaborate with, and increasingly drive, innovation at financial institutions, merchants and
governments. Through our global innovation and developme nt arm, Mastercard Labs, we offer “Launchpad,” a five-day app
prototyping workshop, as well as other customized innovation programs such as in-lab usability testing and concept design. Through
our Test & Learn software as a service platform, we can help our customers conduct disciplined business experiments for in-market
tests to drive more profitable decision making.
Digital Enablement
Our innovation capabilities enable broader reach to scale digital payment services beyond cards to multiple channels, including
mobile devic es, and our standards, services and governance model help us to serve as the connection that allows financial
institutions, fintechs and technology companies to interoperate and enable consumers to engage through digital channels:
•Delivering better digital experiences everywhere. We are using our techn ologies and security protocols to develop solutions to
make digital  shopping and selling experiences, such as on smartphones and other connected devices, simpler , faster and safer
for both consumers and merchants. We also offer products that make it easier for merchants to accept payments and expand
their customer base, as well as products and practices to facilitate acceptance via mobile devices.
•Securing more transactions. We are leveraging tokenization, biometrics and machine learning technologies in our push to secure
every transaction. These ef forts include driving EMV -level security and benefits through all our payment channels.
•Digitizing personal and business payments. We provide solutions that enable our customers to offer consumers the ability to send
and receive money quick ly and securely domestically and around the world. These soluti ons allow our customers to address new
payment flows from any funding source, such as cash, card, bank account or mobile money account, to any destination globally ,
securely and often in real time.
•Simplifying access to, and integration of, our digital assets. Our Mastercard Developer platform makes it easy for customers and
partners to leverage our many digital assets and services. By providing a single access point with tools and capabilities to find
what we believe are some of the best-in-class  Application Program Interfaces (“APIs”) acros s a broad range of Mastercard
services, we enable easy integration of our services into new and existing solutions.
12 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
•Identifying and experimenting with future technologies, start-ups and trends. Through Mastercard Labs, we continue to bring
customers and partners  access to thought leadership, innovation methodologies, new technologies and relevant early-stage
fintech players.
Brand
Our family of well-known  brands includes Mastercard, Maestro and Cirrus. We manage and promote our brands and brand identities
(including our sonic brand identity) through advertising, promotions and sponsorships, as well as digital, mobile and social media
initiatives, in order to increase people’ s preference for our brands and usage of our products.  We sponsor a variety of sporting,
entertainment and charity-related marketing properties to align with consumer segments important to us and our customers. Our
advertising plays an important role in building brand visibility , preference and overall usage among account holders globally .  Our
“Priceless®” advertising campaign, which has run in more than 50 languages and in more than 120 countries worldwide, promotes
Mastercard usage benefits and acceptance, markets Mastercard payment products and solutions and provides Mastercard with a
consistent, recognizable message that supports our brand around the globe. 
Human Capital Management
As of December 31, 2020, we employed approximately 21,000 persons globally .
We are dedicated to supporting our workforce during the global COVID-19 pandemic:
•We had no COVID-19 related layof fs in 2020
•We introduced a COVID-19 global employee benefit providing up to 10 business days of additional paid leave for sick, childcare
or eldercare related needs
•We covered 100% of the costs associated with COVID-19 testing for all employees and provide d access to free COVID-related
telemedicine consultations for our U.S. employees
•We provided employees with flexibility for how and where they get work done and put precaution ary health and safety measures
in place at each of fice location
Management regularly reviews our people strategy and culture, as well as related risks, with our Human Resources and
Compensation Committe e, and reviews this annually with our Board of Directors. Our strategy  focuses on recruitment, developme nt,
succession and retention, including:
•Attracting top talent with the strength of our talent brand, which includes our culture of being a “force for good”
•Developing our depth of talent through acquisitions and recruitment
•Strong development and succession planning for key roles, including talent and leadership programs across various levels that:
◦Embed our culture principles
◦Focus on diverse populations and
◦Aim to develop talent and people managers through personalized and group executive development programs
•Using learning to drive innovation and growth, including a focus on scaling digital fluency globally , product training certification,
creating an environment for employees to drive their own learning, and focusing on developing capability in key skill areas
•Retaining and growing an inclusive workforce, including:
◦Ongoing development conversations and personalized development plans
◦A focus on talent movement, including career moves and rotations and
◦Competitive and dif ferentiated pay and benefits, including pay equity on the basis of gender and (in the U.S.) race and
ethnicity , as well as a flexible work model
As an organization, we are focused on maintaining a world-class culture, built on a foundation of decency:
•We are mindful of the health of our culture, looking at retention of critical roles, our external brand reputation, internal levels of
engagement, and diverse representation
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 13
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
•We are committed to providing a safe and respectful workplace built on a culture of decency and a focus on the well-being of our
employees, as well as monitoring for potential disruptions to our culture and reputation - especially with respect to such events as
the COVID-19 pandemic
•We are focused on providing and supporting a culture of volunteering
•We have established a culture of high ethical business practices and compliance standards, grounded in honesty , decency , trust
and personal accountability . It is driven by “tone at the top,” reinforced with regular training, fostered in a speak-up environment,
and measured by a risk culture and climate survey
Diversity and inclusion underpin everything we do:
•We look at our recruitment, development, succession and retention practices (including global attrition rates) with a focus on
gender , race (in the U.S.) and generational mix of our employee population
•We have developed regional and functional actio n plans to identify priorities and actions that will help us make more progress for
diversity and inclusion, including balance and inclusion in gender and racial representation
•As part of our commitment to racial justice, we have committed to our “In Solidarity” initiative, which focuses on people, market
and society to harness our culture of decency and build on our ef forts to advance inclusion and equality
We encoura ge you to review our Sustainability Report (located on our website) for more detailed information regarding our people
strategy .
Recent Developments
We are focused on helping individuals and businesses weather the challenges presented by the COVID-19 pandemic by ensuring
our network  remains secure, resilient and reliable. We are applying our technology , philanthropy , and data and cybersecurity
expertise to help rebuild communities, ensure that economic growth is inclusive and help address new challenges facing
governments, small businesses and consumers.
Consumer
While techn ology has increasingly changed the way people get information, interact, shop and make purchases, consumers
continue to expect a seamless experience where their payment is simple and secure. Our teams are creating innovative solutions
that meet the needs of consumers and merchants in a digital environment by applying emerging technologies. During the global
COVID-19 pandemic, we have seen continued trends toward a preference for contactless and the rapid adoption of e-commerce.
These trends are further accelerating the secular shift to digital forms of payment. In 2020, we:
•expanded “click to pay”, the activation of the EMV Secure Remote Commerce industry stand ard that enables a faster , more
secure checkout experience across web and mobile sites, mobile apps and connected devices. This checkout experience is
designed to provide consumers the same conv enience and security in a digital environment that they have when paying in a
store, make it easier for merchants to implement secure digital payments and provide issuers with improved fraud detection and
prevention capability .
•continued our focus on contactless payments technology to help deliver a simple and intuitive way to pay, as well as health and
safety benef its when consumers are looking for low-touch options. These efforts include raising contactless purcha se limits in
virtually all geographies.
•announced a suite of frictionless solutions in various markets designed to deliver low-touch high engagement experiences for
retailers and the consumer . For example, our Shop Anywhere platform enables merchants to create simple, personalized
shopping experiences in store, of fering consumers no wait, no checkout lines and a secure way to pay .
•expanded our Digital First Card Program to each of our regions to provide our customers with foundational guidelines that will
enable them to offer their cardholders a fully digital payment experience with an optional physical card. This solution enables our
customers to meet cardholder expectations of immediacy , safety , and convenience, including during card application,
authentication and instant card access, making secure purchases (whether contactless in-store, in-app, or via the web), and
managing alerts, controls, and benefits.
14 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Commercial and B2B
Building on our corpora te T&E, fleet, purchasing card and small business capabilities, we have been increasingly focused on
developing solutions to address other ways that businesses move money . In 2020, we:
•added accou nt-to-account payment functionality to Mastercard Track BPS, our open-loop commercial service platform built to
simplify and automate payments between suppliers and buyers. With this launch, busines ses in the United States can now have
a similar experience within this service for account-to-account payments as they do for card payments - exchanging data with
greater ef ficiency and facilitating payments across multiple payment rails including real-time and batch ACH payments.
•launched Digital Doors, a dedicated program to help small businesses successfully adapt to the changing needs of their
customers by establishing and protecting an online presence, including accepting digital payments. We have also created a free
Small Business Digital Readiness Diagnostic to identify the first steps needed in this transition.
New Payment Products and Open Banking
In order to help grow our business and offer more electronic payment options to consumers, businesses and governments,
Mastercard has developed and enhanced solutions beyond the principal switching capabilities available on our core network. We
believe this will allow us to capture more payment flows, including B2B, P2P , B2C and government disbursements. In 2020, we:
•continued to expand our support of real-time payments globally , including being selected to build and operate a new real-time
clearing and settlement platform in Canada and partnering with the Saudi Arabian Monetary Authority to enable instant account-
to-account payments in the country for the first time. These developments build on other recent achievements, including our
selection to enhance the InstaPay real-time retail payment system in the Philippines (including operating the infrastructure for
and providing anti-money laundering tools to the its national clearing switch). As of December 31, 2020, we either operated or
were implementing real-time payments infrastructure in 12 of the top 50 markets as measured by GDP .
•positioned ourselves to add to our real-time payments solutions, including our pending acquisition of the majority of the Corporate
Services business of Nets Denmark A/S. The pending  acquisition primarily comprises the clearing and instant payment services,
and e-billing solutions of the business.
•strengthened Mastercard’ s open-banking platfor m with our acquisition of Finicity , a leading North American provider of real-time
access to financial data and insights. The acquisition enables a greater choice of financial services, reinforcing our long-standing
partnerships with and commitment to financial institutions and fintechs across the globe. This acquisition also enables us to
expand our capabilities across North America and globally , and in particular accelerate the adopt ion of Finicity’ s services in North
America. Together with Finicity , we will be able to focus on serving the needs of the lending market, including through helping to
streamline loan application processes and improve credit decisioning, thereby helping to drive further financial inclusion.
•further exten ded Master card Cross-Border Services to customers, including financial institutio ns and fintechs, in every region
across the globe. These servi ces enable a wide range of payment flows and use cases, including trade, remittances and
disbursements. These flows are enabled via a distribution network that continues to evolve across multiple channels, including
account, card, and wallets. In particular , these services have enabled inbound B2B payments into China.
•extended our blockchain initiatives, providing additional transparency and efficiencies to the cross-border B2B payments space
and proof of provenance - innovative, secure solutions across the global supply chain.
Value-Added Products and Services
We provide products and services including cyber and intelligence, loyalty , processing, data analytics and consulting that meet
evolving requirements and the expectations of our stakeholders. We recently:
•extended our investments in Artificial Intelligence (“AI”) by:
◦launching Mastercard ThreatScan, an AI-powered solution that helps banks proactively identify potential vulnerabilities in their
authorization systems. The service works alongside an issuer ’s existing fraud tools, imitating known criminal transaction
behavior to identify potential weaknesses and prompt action before fraud potentially occurs.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 15
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
◦scaling Decision Intellig ence™, our fraud scorin g technology , to score billions of transactions in real time every day while
increasing approvals and reducing false declines.
•scaled digital services in our Loyalty and Engagement capabilities to support customers in their response to the accelerated
demand of digital servi ces from consumers during the pandemic. This scaling  includes additional capabilities for real-time
promotions and cash back offers, digital acquisition, digital training and online offers to bring a full suite of digital loyalty and
marketing solutions to merchants and financial institutions.
•enhanced the services we are able to offer to customers based on account-to-account flows, including data insights we are
providing U.K. and U.S. customers to help them with anti-money laundering compliance and identification and prevention of other
financial crimes.
•launched Recovery Insights, a set of data, tech and research tools that can help airlines, restaurants, consumer packaged goods
companies, banks, governments and others navigate the rise in e-commerce, fine-tune operations, and prioritize investments.
Key Initiatives
•In light of the digital inequality gaps being exacerbated by COVID-19, we have expanded our worldwide commitment to financial
inclusion, pledging to bring a total of 1 billion people and 50 million micro and small businesses into the digital economy by 2025.
As part of this effort, we are focused on providin g 25 million women entrepreneurs with solutions that can help them grow their
businesses.
•Engaged with several hundred national and local governments around the world to support  their efforts to respond to the
pandemic crisis, including facilitating electronic disbursements of vital benefits and providing access to data-driven insights in
order to assess the impact of COVID-19 on their communities and optimize their recovery plans.
•We have committed $250 million in financial, technology , product and insight assets over the next five years to support the
financial security and vitality of small businesses and their workers, including supporting the transition of low-income
entrepreneurs to digital banking and helping small businesses access federal relief.
•We began to implemen t our “In Solidarity” initiative, which focuses on people, market and society to harness our culture of
decency and build on our ef forts to advance inclusion and equality .
•We launched the Priceless Planet Coalition, a platform to unite corporate sustainability efforts and make meaningful investments
to preserve the environment. Together with partners who share a commitment to doing well by doing good, the coalition is
pledging to plant 100 million trees over five years.
•We announced the expansion of Start Path, our startup engagement program, adding new seed businesses and more technology
partners. Through this program, we provide entrepreneurs access to expert engineers and specialists that can help them deploy
new services quickly and ef ficiently and help them grow their businesses and scale sustainably .
Revenue Sources
We generate revenue primarily from assessing our customers based on GDV on the products that carry our brands, from the fees
we charge to our customers for providing transaction processing and from other payment-related products and services. Our net
revenues are classified into five categories: domestic assessments, cross-border volume fees, transaction processing, other
revenues and rebates and incentives (contra-revenue).
See “Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations - Revenue” in Part II, Item 7 and Note
3, Revenue for more detail about our revenue, GDV , processed transactions and our other payment-related products and services.
Intellectual Property
We own a number of valuable trademarks that are essential to our business, including Mastercar d, Maestro and Cirrus, through one
or more af filiates. We also own numerous other trademarks covering various brands, programs and services offered by us to support
our payment programs. Trademark and service mark registrations are generally valid indefinitely as long as they are used and/or
properly maintained. Through license agreements with our customers, we authorize the use of our trademarks on a royalty-free
basis in connection with our customers’ issuing and merchant acquiring businesses. In addition, we own a number of patents and
patent applications relating to payment solutions , transaction processing, smart cards, contactle ss, mobile, biometrics, AI, security
systems, blockchain and other technologies, which are important to our business operations. These patents expire at varying times
depending on the jurisdiction and filing date.
16 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Competition
We face competition in all categories of payment, including:
•cash and checks
•card-based payments, including credit, charge, debit, ATM and prepaid products, as well as limited-use products such as private
label
•contactless, mobile and e-commerce payments, as well as cryptocurrency
•other electronic payments, including ACH payments and wire transfers
We face a number of competitors both within and outside of the global payments industry:
•Cash, Check and Legacy ACH.  Cash and checks conti nue to represent one of the most widely used forms of payment.
However , an even larger share of payments on a U.S. dollar volume basis are made via legacy , or “slow ,” ACH platforms.
•General Purpose Payment Networks.  We compete worldwide with payment networks such as Visa, American Express, JCB,
China UnionPay and Discover , among others. Some competitors have more market share than we do in certain jurisdictions.
Some also have different business models that may provide an advantage in pricing, regulatory compliance burdens or
otherwise. Globally , financial institutions may issue both Mastercard and Visa-branded payment products, and we compete with
Visa for business on the basis of individual portfolios or programs. In addition, a number of our customers issue American
Express and/or Discover-branded payment cards in a manner consistent with a four-party system. We continue to face intense
competitive pressure on the prices we charge our issuers and acquirers, and we seek to enter into business agreements with
them through which we of fer incentives and other support to issue and promote our payment products.
•Debit and Local Networks.  We compete with ATM and point-of-sale debit networks in various countries. In addition, in many
countries outside of the United States, local debit brands serve as the main domestic brands, while our brands are used mostly to
enable cross -border transactions (typically representing a small portion of overall transaction volume). Certain jurisdictions have
also created domestic card schemes focused mostly on debit. In addition, several governments are promoting , or considering
promoting, local network s for domestic switching . See “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A for a more detailed discussion of the risks
related to payments system regulation and government actions that may prevent us from competing ef fectively .
•Real-time Account-based Payment Systems. We face competition in the real-time account-based payment space from other
companies that provide infrastructure, applications and services to support these payment solutions.
•Alternative Payments Systems and New Entrants. As the global payments industry becomes more complex, we face
increasing competition from alternative paymen t systems and emerging payment providers. Many of these providers, who in
many circumstances can also be our partners or customers, have developed payments systems focused on online activity in e-
commerce and mobile channels (in some cases, expanding to other channels), and may process payments using in-house
account transfers, real-time account-based payment networks or global or local networks. Examples include digita l wallet
providers (such as Paytm, PayPal, Alipay and Amazon), POS financing/buy now pay later providers (such as Klarna), mobile
operator services, mobile phone-based money transfer and microfinancing services (such as mPesa), handset manufacturers
and cryptocurrencies. We also compete with merchants and governments.
•Value-Added Products and Service Providers.  We face competition from companies that provide alternatives to our value-
added products and services, including information services and consulting firms that provide consulting services and insights to
financial institutions, merchants and governments and technology companies that provide cyber and fraud solutions, as well as
companies that compete against us as providers  of loyalty and program management solutions. Regulatory initiatives could also
lead to increased competition in this space.
Mastercard is a trusted intermediary in a complex system. Our competitive advantages include our:
•globally recognized brands
•highly adaptable global acceptance network built over more than 50 years which can reach a variety of parties enabling payments
•global payments network with world-class operating performance
•expertise in real-time account-based payments and open banking
•development and adoption of innovative products and digital solutions
•safety and security solutions embedded in our networks
•analytics insights and consulting services that help issuers and merchants optimize their payments and related businesses
•loyalty solutions that enhance the payments value proposition for issuers and merchants
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 17
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
•ability to serve a broad array of participants in global payments due to our expanded on-soil presence in individual markets and a
heightened focus on working with governments
•world class talent and culture, with a focus on inclusion and being a “force for good”
Government Regulation
General. Government regulation impacts key aspects of our business. We are subject to regulations that affect the payments
industry in the many countries in which our integrated products and services are used. We are committed to comply with all
applicable laws and regulations and implement policies, procedures and programs designed to promote compliance. We coordinate
globally while acting locally and leverage our relationships to manage the effects of regulation on us. See “Risk Factors” in Part I,
Item 1A for more detail and examples of the regulation to which we are subject.
Payments Oversight and Regulation.  Central banks and other  regulators in several jurisdictions around the world either have, or
are seeking to establish,  formal oversight over the payments industry , as well as authority to regulate certain aspects of the payment
systems in their countries. Such author ity has resulted in regulation of various aspects of our business. In the European Union,
Mastercard is subject to systemic importance regulation, which includes various requirements we must meet, including obligations
related to governance and risk management. In the U.K., the Bank of England designated Vocalink, our real-time account-based
payment network platform, to be a “specified service provider”, which includes supervisions and examination requirements. In
addition, European Union legislation requires us to separate our scheme activities (brand, products, franchise and licensing) from
our switching activities and other processing in terms of how we go to market, make decisions and organize our structure.
Interchange Fees.  Interchange fees that support the function and value of four-party payments systems like ours are being
reviewed or challenged in various jurisdictions around the world via legislation to regulate interchange fees, competition-related
regulatory proceedings,  central bank regulatio n and litigation. Examples include statu tes in the United States that cap debit
interchange for certain regulated activities, our settlement with the European Commission resolving its investigation into our
interregional interchange fees and the European Union legislation capping consumer credit and debit interchange fees on payments
issued and acquired within the European Economic Area (the “EEA”). For more detail, see “Risk Factors - Other Regulation” in Part
I, Item 1A and Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
Preferential or Protective Government Actions. Some governments have taken action to provide resources, preferential
treatment or other prote ction to selected domestic payments and processing providers, as well as to create their own national
providers. For example, governments in some countries mandate switching of domestic payments either entirely in that country or by
only domestic companies. In China, we are currently excluded from dome stic switching and are seeking market access, which is
uncertain and subject to a number of factors, including receiving regulatory approval.  We are in active discussions to explore
different solutions.
Anti-Money Laundering , Counter Financing of Terrorism, Economic Sanctions and Anti-C orruption. We are subject to anti-
money laundering (“AML”) and counter-financing of terrorism (“CFT”) laws and regulations globally , including the U.S. Bank Secrecy
Act and the USA PATRIOT Act, as well as the various economic sanctions programs, including those imposed and administered by
the U.S. Office of Foreign Assets Control (“OFAC”). We have implemented a comprehensive AML/CFT program, comprised of
policies, procedures and internal controls, including the designation of a compliance officer, which is designed to prevent our
payment network from being used to facilitate money laundering and other illicit activity and to address these legal and regulatory
requirements and assist in managing money laundering and terrorist financing risks. The economic sanctions programs administered
by OFAC restrict financial transactions and other dealings with certain countries and geographies (specifically Crimea, Cuba, Iran,
North Korea  and Syria) and with persons and entities included in OFAC sanctions lists including its list of Specially Designated
Nationals and Blocked Persons (the “SDN List”).  We take measures to prevent transactions that do not comply with OFAC and other
applicable sanctions, including establishing a risk-based compliance program that has policies, procedures and controls designed to
prevent us from having unlawful business dealings with prohibited countries, regions, individuals or entities. As part of this program,
we obligate issuers and acquirers to comply with their local sanctions obligations and the U.S. sanctions programs, including
requiring the screening of account holders and merchants, respectively , against OFAC sanction s lists (including the SDN List). Iran
and Syria have been identified by the U.S. State Department as terrorist-sponsoring states, and we have no offices, subsidiaries or
affiliated entities located in these countries and do not license entities domiciled there. We are also subject to anti-corruption laws
and regulations globally , including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the U.K. Bribe ry Act, which, among other things,
generally prohibit giving or offering payments or anything of value for the purpose of improperly influencing a business decision or to
gain an unfair business  advantage. We have implemented policies, procedures and internal controls to proactively manage
corruption risk.
Financial Sector Oversight.  We are or may be subject to regulations related to our role in the financial industry and our relationship
with our financial institution customers. In addition, we are or may be subject to regulation by a number of agencies charged with
18 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
oversight of, among other things, consumer protection, financial and banking matters. The regulators have supervisory and
independent examination authority as well as enforcement authority that we may be subject to because of the services we provide to
financial institutions that issue and acquire our products.
Issuer Prac tice Legislation and Regulation. Our custome rs are subject to numerous regulations and investigations applicable to
banks, financial institutions and others in their capacity as issuers and otherwise, impacting us as a consequence. Additionally ,
regulations such as the revised Payment Services Directive (commonly referred to as “PSD2”) in the EEA require financial
institutions to provide third-party payment-proce ssors access to consumer payment accounts, enabling them to route transactions
away from Mastercard products and provide payment initiation and account information services  directly to consumers who use our
products. PSD2 also requires a new standard for authentication of transactions, which necessitates additional verification information
from consumers to comp lete transactions. This may increase the number of transactions that consumers abandon if we are unable
to ensure a frictionless authentication experience under the new standards.
Regulation of Internet and Digital T ransactions.  Various jurisdictions have enacted or have proposed regulation related to internet
transactions. The legislation applies to payments system participants, including us and our U.S. customers, and is implemented
through a federal regulation. We may also be impacted by evolving laws surrounding gambling, including fantasy sports. Certain
jurisdictions are also considering regulatory initiatives in digital-related areas that could impact us, such as cyber-security and
copyright and trademark infringement.
Privacy , Data and Information Security . Aspects of our operations or business are subject to increasingly complex privacy and
data protection laws in the United States, the European Union and elsewhere around the world.  For example, in the United States,
we and our customers are respectively subject to Federal Trade Commission and federal banking agency information safeguarding
requirements under the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act that require the maintenance of a written, comprehensive information security
program. In the European Union, we are subject to the General Data Protection Regulation (the “GDPR”), which requires a
comprehensive privacy and data protection program to protect the personal and sensitive data of EEA residents. A number of
regulators and policymakers around the globe are using the GDPR as a reference to adopt new or updated privacy and data
protection laws, includin g in the U.S. (California), Argentina, Brazil, Canada, Chile, India, Indone sia and Kenya. Some jurisdictions,
such as India, are currently considering adopting or have adopted “data localization” requirements, which mandate the collection,
processing, and/or storage of data within their borders. We believe that various  forms of data localization requirements are under
consideration in other countries and jurisdictions, including the European Union. Due to increasing data collection and data flows,
numerous data breaches and security inciden ts as well as the use of emerging technologies such as artificial intelligence,
regulations in this area are constantly evolving with regulatory and legislative authorities in numerous parts of the world adopting
proposals to regulate data and protect informatio n. In addition, the interpreta tion and application of these privacy and data protection
laws are often uncertain and in a state of flux, thus requiring constant monitoring for compliance.
Additional Regulatory Developments. Various regulatory agencies also continue to examine a wide variety of issues that could
impact us, including evolving laws surroundi ng marijuana, prepaid payroll cards, virtual currencies, identity theft, account
management guidelines, disclosure rules, security and marketing that would impact our customers directly .
Additional Information
Mastercard Incorporated was incorporated as a Delaware corporation in May 2001. We conduct our busines s principally through our
principal operating subsidiary , Mastercard International Incorporated, a Delaware non-stock (or membership) corporation that was
formed in November 1966. For more information about our capital structure , including our Class A common stock (our voting stock)
and Class B common stock (our non-voting stock), see Note 16 (Stockholders' Equity) to the consolidated financial statements
included in Part II, Item 8.
Website and SEC Reports
Our internet address is www .mastercard.com. From time to time, we may use our corporate website as a channel of distribution of
material company inform ation. Financial and other material information is routinely posted and accessible on the investor relations
section of our corporate website. You can also visit “Investor Alerts” in the investor relations section to enroll your email address to
automatically receive email alerts and other information about Mastercard.
Our annual report on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and amendments to those reports are
available for review , without charge, on the investor relations section of our corporate website as soon as reasonably practicable
after they are filed with, or furnished to, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”). The information contained on
our corporat e website is not incorporated by reference into this Report. Our filings are also available electronically from the SEC at
www .sec.gov .
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 19
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Item 1A. Risk factors
RISK HIGHLIGHTS
Legal and Regulatory Business and Operations
Payments Industry Regulation COVID-19Global Economic and Political
Environment
Preferential or Protective Government
ActionsCompetition and T echnology Brand and Reputational Impact
Privacy , Data and SecurityInformation Security and Service
DisruptionsTalent and Culture
Other Regulation Stakeholder Relationships Acquisitions
Litigation Settlement and Third-Party Obligations
Class A Common Stock and Governance Structure
Legal and Regulatory
Payments Industry Regulation
Global regu latory and legislative activity directly related to the payments industry may have a material adverse impact on
our overall business and results of operations.
Regulators increasingly seek to regulate certain aspects of payments systems such as ours, or establish or expand their authority to
do so. Many jurisdi ctions have enacted such regulation s, establishing, and potentially further expandin g, obligations or restrictions
with respect to the types of products and services that we may offer, the countries in which our integrated products and services may
be used, the way we structure and operate our business and the types of consumers and merc hants who can obtain or accept our
products or services. New regulations and oversight could also relate to our clearing and settlement activities (including risk
management policies and procedures, collateral requirements, participant default policies and procedures, the ability to complete
timely switch ing of financial transactions, and capital and financial resource requirements). Several jurisdictions have also inquired
about the network fees we charge to our customers (typically as part of broader market revie ws of retail payments). In addition,
several central banks or similar regulatory bodies around the world have increased, or are seeking to increase, their formal oversight
of the electronic payments industry . In some cases, we have been designated as a “systemically important payment system”, and
other regula tors may consider designating us as systemically important or in a similar category resulting in heightened regulatory
oversight. These obligations, designations and restrictions may further expand and could conflict with each other as more
jurisdictions impose oversight of payment systems. Moreover , as regulators around the world increasingly look to replicate similar
regulation of payments and other industries, efforts in any one jurisdiction may influence approa ches in other jurisdictions. Similarly ,
new initiatives within a jurisdiction involving one product may lead to regulation of similar or related products (for example, debit
regulations could lead to regulation of credit products). As a result, the risks to our business created by any one new law or
regulation are magnified by the potential it has to be replicated in other jurisdictions or involve other products within any particular
jurisdiction.
Increased regulation and oversight of payment systems may result in costly compliance burdens  or otherwise increase our costs. As
a result, issuers and acquirers could be less willing to participate in our payments system, reduce the benefits offered in connection
with the use of our products (making our produ cts less desirable to consumers), reduce the volume of domestic and cross-border
transactions or other operational metrics, disintermediate us, impact our profitability and limit our ability to innovate or offer
differentiated products and services, all of which could materially and adversely impact our financial performance. In addition, any
regulation that is enacted related to the type and level of network fees we charge our customers could also materially and adversely
20 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
impact our results of operations. Regulators could also require us to obtain prior approval for changes to our system rules,
procedures or operations, or could require customization with regard to such changes, which could negatively impact us. Such
changes could lead to new or different criteria for participation in and access to our payments system by financial institutions or other
customers. Moreover , failure to comply with the laws and regulations to which we are subject could result in fines, sanctions, civil
damages or other penalties, which could materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operations, as well as
have an impact on our brand and reputation.
Increased regulatory , legislative and litigation activity with respect to interchange rates could have an adverse impact on
our business.
Interchange rates are a significant component of the costs that merchants pay in connection with the acceptance of our products.
Although we do not earn revenues from interchange, interchange rates can impact the volume of transactions we see on our
payment products. If interchange rates are too high, merchants may stop accepting our products or route transactions away from our
network. If interchang e rates are too low, issuers may stop promoting our integrated products and services, eliminate or reduce
loyalty rewards programs or other account holder benefits (e.g., free checking or low interest rates on balances), or charge fees to
account holders (e.g., annual fees or late payment fees).
Governments and merchant groups in a number  of countries have implemented or are seeking interchange rate reductions through
legislation, competition law , central bank regulation and litigation. See “Business - Government Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 and Note
21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for more details.
If issuers cannot collect  or we are forced to reduce interchange rates, issuers may be less willing to participate in our four-party
payments system, or may reduce the benefits offered in connection with the use of our products, reducing the attractiveness of our
products to consumers.  In particular , changes to interregional intercha nge fees as a result of the resolution of the European
Commission’ s investigat ion could impact our cross-border transaction activity disproportionately versus competitors that are not
subject to similar reductions. These and other impac ts could lower transaction volumes, and/or make proprietary three-p arty
networks or other forms of payment more attractive. Issuers could reduce the benefits associated with our products or choose to
charge higher fees to consumers to attempt to recoup a portion of the costs incurred for their services. In addition, issuers could
seek a fee reduction from us to decrease the expense of their payment programs, particularly if regulation has a disproportionate
impact on us as compared to our competitors in terms of the fees we can charge. This could make our products less desirable to
consumers, reduce the volume of transactions and our profitability , and limit our ability to innovate or of fer dif ferentiated products.
We are devo ting substan tial resources to defending our right to establish interchange rates in regulatory proceedings, litigation and
legislative activity . The potentia l outcome of any of these activities  could have a more positive or negative impact on us relative to
our competitors. If we are ultimately unsuccessful in defending our ability to establish interchange rates, any resulting legislation,
regulation and/or litigation may have a materia l adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations. In addition,
regulatory proceedings and litigation could result (and in some cases has resulted) in us being fined and/or having to pay civil
damages, the amount of which could be material.
Limitations on our ability to restrict merchant surcharging could materially and adversely impact our results of operations.
We have historically implemented policies, referr ed to as no-surcharge rules, in certain jurisdictio ns, including the United States, that
prohibit merchants from charging higher prices to consumers who pay using our products instead of other means. Authorities in
several jurisdictions have acted to end or limit the application of these no-surcharge rules (or indicated interest in doing so).
Additionally , we have modified our no-surchar ge rules to permit U.S. merchants to surcharge credit cards, subject to certain
limitations. It is possible that over time merchants in some or all merchant categories in these jurisdictions may choose to surcharge
as permitted by the rule change. This could result in consumers viewing our products less favorably and/or using alternative means
of payment instead of electronic products, which could result in a decrease in our overall transaction volumes, and which in turn
could materially and adversely impact our results of operations.
Preferential or Protective Government Actions
Preferential and protective government actions related to domestic payment services could adversely affect our ability to
maintain or increase our revenues.
Governments in some countries have acted, or in the future may act, to provide resources, prefe rential treatment or other protection
to selected national paym ent and switching providers, or have created, or may in the future create, their own national provider . This
action may displace us from, prevent us from entering into, or substantially restrict us from participating in, particular geographies,
and may prevent us from competing ef fectively against those providers. For example:
•Governments in some countries have implemented, or may implement, regulatory requirements that mandate switching of
domestic payments either entirely in that country or by only domestic companies.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 21
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
•Some jurisdictions are considering requirements to collect, process and/or store data within their borders, as well as prohibitions
on the transfer of data abroad, leading to technological and operational implications.
•Geopolitical events and resulting OFAC sanctions, adverse trade policies or other types of government actions could lead
jurisdictions af fected by those sanctions to take actions in response that could adversely af fect our business.
•Regional groups of countries are considering, or may consider , efforts to restrict our participa tion in the switching of regional
transactions.
Such developments prevent us from utilizing our global switching capabilities for domestic or regional customers. Our inability to
effect change in, or work with, these jurisdictions could adversely affect our ability to maintain or increase our revenues and extend
our global brand.
Additionally , some jurisdictions have implemente d, or may implement, foreign ownership restrictions, which could potentially have
the effect of forcing or inducing the transfer of our technology and proprietary information as a condition of access to their markets.
Such restrictions could adversely impact our ability to compete in these markets.
Privacy , Data and Security
Regulation of privacy , data, security and the digital economy could increase our costs, as well as negatively impact our
growth.
We are subject to increasingly complex regulations related to privacy , data and information security in the jurisdictions in which we
do business. These regulations could result in negative impacts to our business. As we continue to develop integrated and
personalized products and services to meet the needs of a changing marketplace, as well as acquire new companies, we have
expanded our information profile through the collection of additional data from additional sources and across multiple channels. This
expansion has amplified the impact of these regulations on our business. Regulation of privacy and data and information security
often times require monitoring of and changes to our data practices in regard to the collection , use, disclosure, storage, transfer
and/or secur ity of personal and sensitive information, as well as increased care in our data management, governance and quality
practices. While we make every effort to comply with all regulatory requirements and we deploy a privacy-by-design and data-by-
design approach to all of our product developm ent, the speed and pace of change may not allow us to meet rapidly evolving
expectations. We are also subject to enhanced compliance and operational requirements in the European Union, and policymakers
around the globe are using these requirements as a reference to adopt new or updated privacy  laws that could result in similar or
stricter requi rements in other jurisdictions. Some jurisdi ctions are also considering requirem ents to collect, process and/or store data
within their borders, as well as prohibitions on the transfer of data abroad, leading to technological and operational implications.
Other jurisd ictions are considering adopting sector-specific regulations for the payments industry, including forced data sharing
requirements or additional verification requirements that overlap or conflict with, or diverge from, general privacy rules. Failure to
comply with these laws, regulations and require ments could result in fines, sanctions or other penalties, which could materially and
adversely af fect our results of operations and overall business, as well as have an impact on our reputation.
New requirements or interpretations of existing requirements in these areas, or the development of new regulatory schemes related
to the digital  economy in general, may also increase our costs and/or restrict our ability to lever age data for innovation. This could
impact the products and services we offer and other aspects of our business, such as fraud monitoring, the need for improved data
management, governan ce and quality practices , the development of information-based products and solutions, and technology
operations. In addition, these requir ements may increase the costs to our customers of issuing payment products, which may, in
turn, decrease the number of our payment produ cts that they issue. Moreover , due to account data compromise events and privacy
abuses by other companies, as well as the disclosure of monitoring activities by certain governmental agencies in combination with
the use of artificial intelligence and new technolo gies, there has been heightened legislative and regulatory scrutiny around the world
that could lead to further regulation and requir ements and/or future enforcement. Those deve lopments have also raised public
attention on companies’ data practices and have changed consumer and societal expectations for enhanced privacy and data
protection. Any of these developments could materially and adversely af fect our overall business and results of operations.
In addition, fraudulent activity and increasing cyberattacks have encouraged legislative and regulatory intervention, which could
damage our reputation and reduce the use and acceptance of our integrated products and services or increase our compliance
costs. Criminals are using increasingly sophisticated methods to capture consumer personal information to engage in illegal
activities such as counterfeiting or other fraud. As outsourcing and specialization become common in the payments industry , there
are more third parties involved in processing transactions using our payment products. While we are taking measures to make card
and digital payments more secure, increased fraud levels involving our integrated products and services, or misconduct or
negligence by third parties switching or otherwise servicing our integrated products and services, could lead to legislative or
regulatory intervention, such as enhanced security requirements and liabilities, as well as damage to our reputation.
22 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Other Regulation
Regulations that directly or indirectly apply to Mastercard as a result of our participation  in the global payments industry
may materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operations.
We are subject to regulations that affect the payments industry in the many jurisdictions in which our integrated products and
services are used. Many of our customers are also subject to regulations applicable to banks and other financial institutions that, at
times, consequently affect us. Regulation of the payments industry , including regulations applicable to us and our customers, has
increased significantly in the last several years. See “Business - Government Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 for a detailed description
of such regulation and related legislation. Examples include:
•Anti-Money Laundering, Counter Financing of Terrorism, Economic Sanctions and Anti-Corruption  - We are subject to
AML and CFT laws and regulations globally . Economic sanctions programs administered by OFAC restrict financial transactions
and other dealings with certain countries and geographies, and persons and entities. We are also subject to anti-corruption laws
and regulations globally , which, among other things, generally prohibit giving or offering payments or anything of value for the
purpose of improperly influencing a business decision or to gain an unfair business advantage.
•Account-based Payment Systems  - In the U.K., aspects of our Vocalink business are subject to the U.K. payment system
oversight regime and are directly overseen by the Bank of England.
•Issuer Practice Legislation and Regulation  - Certain regulations (such as PSD2 in the EEA)  may impact various aspects of our
business. For example, PSD2’ s strong authentication requirement could increase the number of transactions that consumers
abandon if we are unable to secure a frictionless authentication experience under the new stand ards. An increase in the rate of
abandoned transactions could adversely impact our volumes or other operational metrics.
Increased regulatory focus on us, such as in connection with the matters discussed above, may result in costly compliance burdens
and/or may otherwise increase our costs. Similarly , increased regulatory focus on our customers may cause such customers to
reduce the volume of transactions processed through our systems, or may otherwise impact the competitiveness of our products.
Actions by regulators could influence other organizations around the world to enact or consider adopting similar measures,
amplifying any potential compliance burden. Finally , failur e to comply with the laws and regula tions discussed above to which we are
subject could result in fines, sanctions or other penalties. In particular , a violation and subsequent judgment or settlement against us,
or those with whom we may be associated, under economic sanctions and AML, CFT, and anti-corruption laws could subject us to
substantial monetary penalties, damages, and/or have a significant reputational impact. Each instance may individually or
collectively materially and adversely af fect our financial performance and/or our overall business and results of operations, as well as
have an impact on our reputation.
We could be subject to adverse changes in tax laws, regulations and interpretations or challenges to our tax positions.
We are subject to tax laws and regulations of the U.S. federal, state and local governments as well as various non-U.S. jurisdictions.
Potential changes in existing tax laws, including future regulatory guidance, may impact our effective income tax rate and tax
payments. There can be no assurance that changes in tax laws or regulations, both within the U.S. and the other jurisdictions in
which we operate, will not materially and adversely affect our effective income tax rate, tax paym ents, financial condition and results
of operations. Similarly , changes in tax laws and regulations that impact our customers and counterparties or the economy generally
may also impact our financial condition and results of operations.
In addition, tax laws and regulations are comple x and subject to varying interpretations, and any significant failure to comply with
applicable tax laws and regulations in all relevan t jurisdictions could give rise to substantial pena lties and liabilities. Any changes in
enacted tax laws, rules or regulatory or judicial interpretations; any adverse outcome in connectio n with tax audits in any jurisdiction;
or any chan ge in the pronouncements relating to accounting for income taxes could materially  and adversely impact our effective
income tax rate, tax payments, financial condition and results of operations.
Litigation
Liabilities we may incur or limitations on our business related to any litigation or litigation settlements could materially and
adversely affect our results of operations.
We are a defendant on a number of civil litigations and regulatory proceedings and investigati ons, including among others, those
alleging violations of competition and antitrust  law and those involving intellectual property claims. See Note 21 (Legal and
Regulatory Proceedings) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for more details regarding the allegations
contained in these comp laints and the status of these proceedings. In the event  we are found liable in any materia l litigations or
proceedings, particularly in the event we may be found liable in a large class-action lawsuit or on the basis of an antitrust claim
entitling the plaintif f to treble damages or under which we were jointly and severally liable, we could be subject to significant
damages, which could have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 23
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Certain limitations have been placed on our business in recent years because of litigation and litigation settlements, such as
changes to our no-surcharge rule in the United  States. Any future limitations on our business resulting from litigation or litigation
settlements could impact our relationships with our customers, including reducing the volume of business that we do with them,
which may materially and adversely af fect our overall business and results of operations.
Business and Operations
COVID-19
The global COVID-19 pandemic and containment measures taken in response to it have adversely impacted our business,
results of operations and financial condition, and may continue to do so depending on future developments, which are
uncertain.
Global health concerns relating to the COVID-19 outbreak have impacted the macroeconomic environment, and the outbreak has
significantly increased economic uncertainty . The outbrea k resulted in governments in countries across the globe implementing
measures to try to contain the virus, such as travel restrictions, social distancing, and restrictions  on business operations which have
impacted consumers and businesses. These measures have adversely impacted and may further impact our workforce and
operations and the operations of our customers, suppliers and business partners. While some of these measures have eased in
certain jurisdictions, others have remained in place. The extent to which current measures are removed or new measures are put in
place will depend how the pandemic evolves, as well as the progress of the global roll-out of vaccines.
The spread of COVID-19 has caused us to modify our business practices (including employee travel, employee work locations, and
working in a remote environment), and we may take further actions as required by government authorities or that are in the best
interests of our employees, customers and business partners. There is no certainty that such measures will be sufficient to mitigate
the risks posed by the virus or otherwise be satisfactory to government authorities.
The COVID-19 pandemic has adversely impacted our business, results of operations and financial condition. There are no
comparable recent events which may provide guidance as to the effect of the spread of COVID-19 and a global pandemic, and, as a
result, the ultimate impact of COVID-19 or a similar health epidemic is highly uncertain and subject to change. The extent to which
COVID-19 further impacts our business, results of operations and financial condition will depend on future developments, which are
uncertain, including, but not limited to, the duration and spread of the outbreak, its severity , the actions to contain the virus or treat its
impact, and how quickly and to what extent normal economic and operating conditions can resume. Even after the COVID-19
pandemic has subsided, we may continue to experience materially adverse impacts to our business and our result of operations as a
result of its global economic impact, including any recession that has occurred or may occur in the future.
Competition and T echnology
Substantial and intense competition worldw ide in the global payments industry may materially and adversely affect our
overall business and results of operations.
The global payments industry is highly competit ive. Our paymen t programs compete against all forms of payment, including cash
and checks; electronic, mobile and e-commerce payment platforms; cryptocurrencies; ACH payment services; and other payments
networks, which can have several competitive impacts on our business:
•Some of our traditional competitors, as well as alternative payment service providers, may have substantially greater financial and
other resour ces than we have, may offer a wider range of programs and services than we offer or may use more effective
advertising and marketing strategies to achieve broader brand recognition or merchant acceptance than we have.
•Our ability to compete may also be affected by the outcomes of litigation, competition-related regulatory proceedings, central
bank activity and legislative activity .
Certain of our competitors operate three-party payments systems with direct connections to both merchants and consumers and
these competitors may derive competitive advantages from their business models. If we continu e to attract more regulatory scrutiny
than these competitors because we operate a four-party system, or we are regulated because of the system we operate in a way in
which our competitors are not, we could lose business to these competitors. See “Business - Competition” in Part I, Item 1.
If we are not able to differentiate ourselves from our competitors, drive value for our customers and/or effectively align our resources
with our goals and objectives, we may not be able to compete effectively against these threats. Our competitors may also introduce
their own innovative programs and services that adversely impact our growth. Beyond our traditional competitors, we also compete
against new entrants that have developed alternative payments systems, e-commerce payments  systems and payments systems for
mobile devices, as well as physical store locations. A number of these new entrants rely principally on the Internet to support their
services and may enjoy lower costs than we do, which could put us at a competitive disadvantage. Our
24 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
failure to compete effectively against any of the foregoing competitive threats could material ly and adversely affect our overall
business and results of operations.
Disintermediation from stakeholders both within and outside of the payments value chain could harm our business.
As the payments industry continues to develop and change, we face disintermediation and related risks, including:
•Parties that process our transactions in certain countries may try to eliminate our position as an intermediary in the payment
process. For example, merchants could switch (and in some cases are switching) transactions directly with issuers. Additionally ,
processors could process transactions directly between issuers and acquirers. Large scale consolidation within processors could
result in these processo rs developing bilateral agreements or in some cases switching the entire transaction on their own
network, thereby disintermediating us.
•Regulation (such as PSD2 in the EEA) may disintermediate issuers by enabling third-party providers opportunities to route
payment transactions away from our network and products and towards other forms of payment  by offering account information
or payment initiation services directly to those  who currently use our products. This may also allow these processors to
commoditize the data that are included in the transactions. If our customers are disintermediated in their business, we could face
diminished demand for our integrated products and services.
•Although we partner with fintechs and technolo gy companies (such as digital players and mobile providers) that leverage our
technology , platforms and networks to deliver their products, they could develop platforms or networks that disintermediate us
from digital payments and impact our ability to compete in the digital economy . This risk is heightened when we have
relationships with these entities where we share Mastercard data. While we share this data in a controlled manner subject to
applicable anonymization and privacy and data standards, without proper oversight we could give the partner a competitive
advantage.
•Competitors, customers,  fintechs, technology companies, governments and other industry partici pants may develop products that
compete with or replace value-added products and services we currently provide to support our switched transaction and
payment offerings. These products could replace our own switching and payments offerings or could force us to change our
pricing or practices for these offerings. In addition, governments that develop or encou rage the creation of national payment
platforms may promote their platforms in such a way that could put us at a competitive disadvantage in those markets, or require
us to compete dif ferently .
•Participants in the paym ents industry may merge , create joint ventures or form other business combinations that may strengthen
their existing business services or create new payment products and services that compete with our products and services.
Our failure to compete effectively against any of the foregoing competitive threats could materia lly and adversely affect our overall
business and results of operations.
Continued intense pricing pressure may materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operations.
In order to increase transaction volumes, enter new markets and expand our Mastercard-branded cards and enabled products and
services, we seek to enter into business agreements with customers through which we offer incentives, pricing discounts and other
support that promote our products. In order to stay competitive, we may have to increase the amount of these incentives and pricing
discounts. We continue to experien ce pricing pressure. The demand  from our customers for better pricin g arrangements and greater
rebates and incentives moderates our growth. We may not be able to continue our expansion strategy to switch additional
transaction volumes or to provide additional services to our customers at levels sufficient to compensate for such lower fees or
increased costs in the future, which could mater ially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operations. In addition,
increased pressure on prices increases the importance of cost containment and productivity initiatives in areas other than those
relating to customer incentives.
In the future, we may not be able to enter into agreements with our customers if they require terms that we are unable or unwilling to
offer, and we may be required to modify existing agreements in order to maintain relationships and to compete with others in the
industry . Some of our competitors  are larger and have greater financial resources than we do and accordingly may be able to charge
lower prices to our customers. In addition, to the extent  that we offer discounts or incentives under such agreements, we will need to
further increase transaction volumes or the amount of services provided thereunder in order to benefit incrementally from such
agreements and to increase revenue and profit, and we may not be successful in doing so, particularly in the current regulatory
environment. Our custome rs also may implement cost reduction initiatives that reduce or eliminate payment product marketing or
increase requests for greater incentives or great er cost stability . These factor s could have a material adverse impact on our overall
business and results of operations.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 25
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Rapid and significant technological developments and changes could negatively impact our overall business and results
of operations or limit our future growth.
The payments industry is subject to rapid and significant technological changes, which can impact our business in several ways:
•Technological changes, including continuing developments of technologies in the areas of smart cards and devices, contactless
and mobile payments, e-commerce, cryptocurrency and block chain technology , machine learning and AI, could result in new
technologies that may be superior to, or render obsolete, the technologies we currently use in our programs and services.
Moreover , these change s could result in new and innovative payment methods and products that could place us at a competitive
disadvantage and that could reduce the use of our products.
•We rely in part on third parties, including some of our competitors and potential competitors, for the development of and access to
new technologies. The inability of these companies to keep pace with technological developments, or the acquisition of these
companies by competitors, could negatively impact our of ferings.
•Our ability to develop and adopt new services and technologies may be inhibited by industry-wide solutions and standards (such
as those related to EMV, tokenization or other safety and security technologies), and by resistan ce from customers or merchants
to such changes.
•Our ability to develop evolving systems and products may be inhibited by any difficulty we may experience in attracting and
retaining technology experts.
•Our ability to adopt these  technologies can also be inhibited by intellectual property rights of third parties. We have received, and
we may in the future receive, notices or inquiries  from patent holders (for example, other operat ing companies or non-practicing
entities) suggesting that we may be infringing certain patents or that we need to license the use of their patents to avoid
infringement. Such notices may, among other things, threaten litigation against us or our customers or demand significant license
fees.
•Our ability to develop new technologies and reflect technological changes in our payments offerings will require resources, which
may result in additional expenses.
•We work with fintechs and technology companies (such as digital players and mobile provid ers) that use our technology to
enhance payment safety and security and to deliver their payment-related products and services quickly and efficiently to
consumers. Our inability to keep pace technologically could negatively impact the willingness of these customers to work with us,
and could encourage them to use their own technology and compete against us.
•Regulatory or government requirements could require us to host and deliver certain products and services on-soil in certain
markets, which would require us to alter our technology and delivery model, potentially resulting in additional expenses.
•Various central banks are experimenting with digital currencies called Central Bank Digital Currencies (CBDC). CBDCs may be
launched with their own networks to transfer money between participants. Policy and design consi derations that governments
adopt could impact the extent of our role in facilitating CBDC-based payment transactions, potentially impacting the transactions
that we may process over our network.
We cannot predict the effect of technological changes on our business, and our future success will depend, in part, on our ability to
anticipate, develop or adapt to technological changes and evolving industry standards. Failure to keep pace with these technological
developments or otherwise bring to market products that reflect these technologies could lead to a decline in the use of our products,
which could have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations.
Operating a real-time account-based payment network presents risks that could materially affect our business.
U.K. regulators have designated Vocalink, our real-time account-based payment network platform, to be a “specified service
provider” and regulators in other countries may in the future expand their regulatory oversight of real-time account-based payment
systems in similar ways. In addition, any prolonged service outage on this network could result in quickly escalating impacts,
including potential intervention by the Bank of England and significant reputational risk to Vocalink and us. For a discussion of the
regulatory risks related to our real-time account -based payment platform, see our risk factor in “Risk Factors - Payments Industry
Regulation” in this Part I, Item 1A. Furthermore, the complexity of this payment technology requires careful management to address
security vulnerabilities that are different from those faced on our core network. Operational difficulties, such as the temporary
unavailability of our services or products, or security breaches on our real-time account-based payment network could cause a loss
of business for these products and services, result in potential liability for us and adversely af fect our reputation.
Working with new customers and end users as we expand our integrated products and services can present operational
and onboarding challenges, be costly and result in reputational damage if the new produc ts or services do not perform as
intended.
The payments markets in which we compete are characterized by rapid technological change, new product introductions, evolving
industry standards and changing customer and consumer needs. In order to remain competitive and meet the needs of the
26 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
payments markets, we are continually involved in diversifying our integrated products and services. These efforts carry the risks
associated with any diversification initiative, including cost overruns, delays in delivery and performance problems. These projects
also carry risks associat ed with working with different types of customers, for example organiza tions such as corporations that are
not financial institutions and non-governmental organizations (“NGOs”), and end users other than those we have traditionally worked
with. These differences may present new operational challenges in the development and implementation of our new products or
services. These new customers are typically less regulated, and as a result, enhanced infrastructure and monitoring is required.
Our failure to deliver these integrated products and services could make our other integrated products and services less desirable to
customers, or put us at a competitive disadvantage. In addition, if there is a delay in the implementation of our products or services
or if our products or services do not perform as anticipated, or we are unable to adequately anticipate risks related to new types of
customers, we could face additional regulatory scrutiny , fines, sanctions or other penalties, which could materially and adversely
affect our overall business and results of operations, as well as negatively impact our brand and reputation.
Information Security and Service Disruptions
Information security incidents or account data compromise events could disrupt our business, damage our reputation,
increase our costs and cause losses.
Information security risks for payments and technology companies such as ours have significantly increased in recent years in part
because of the proliferation of new technologies, the use of the Internet and telecommunication s technologies to conduct financial
transactions, and the increased sophistication and activities of organized crime, hackers, terrorists and other external parties. These
threats may derive from fraud or malice on the part of our employees or third parties, or may result from human error or accidental
technological failure. These threats include cyber-attacks such as computer viruses, malicious code, phishing attacks or information
security breaches and could lead to the misappropriation of consumer account and other information and identity theft. The advent of
the global COVID-19 pandemic has resulted in a significant rise in these types of threats due to a significant portion of our workforce
working from home in a mostly remote environment.
Our operations rely on the secure processing, transmission and storage of confidential, proprietary and other information and
technology in our comp uter system s and networks, as well as the systems of our third-party providers. Our customers and other
parties in the payments value chain, as well as account holders, rely on our digital technologie s, computer systems, software and
networks to conduct their operations. In addition, to access our integrated products and services, our customers and account holders
increasingly use personal smartphones, tablet PCs and other mobile devices that may be beyond our control. We, like other financial
technology organizations, routinely are subject to cyber-threats and our technologies, systems and networks, as well as the systems
of our third-p arty provide rs, have been subject to attempted cyber-attacks. Because of our position in the payments value chain, we
believe that we are likely to continue to be a target of such threats and attacks. Additionally , geopolitical events and resulting
government activity could also lead to information security threats and attacks by af fected jurisdictions and their sympathizers.
To date, we have not experienced any material impact relating to cyber-attacks or other inform ation security breaches. However ,
future attack s or breaches could lead to secur ity breaches of the networks, systems (including third-party provider systems) or
devices that our customers use to access our integrated products and services, which in turn could result in the unauthorized
disclosure, release, gathering, monitoring, misuse, loss or destruction of confidential, proprietary and other information (including
account data informatio n) or data security compromises. Such attacks or breaches could also cause service interruptions,
malfunctions or other failures in the physical infrastructure or operations systems that support our businesses and customers (such
as the lack of availability of our value-added services), as well as the operations of our customers or other third parties.  In addition,
they could lead to dama ge to our reputation with our customers and other parties and the market, additional costs to us (such as
repairing systems, adding new personnel or protection technologies or compliance costs), regulatory penalties, financial losses to
both us and our customers and partners and the loss of customers and business opportunitie s. If such  attacks are not detected
immediately , their ef fect could be compounded.
Despite vario us mitigatio n efforts that we undertake, there can be no assurance that we will be immune to these risks and not suffer
material breaches and resulting losses in the future, or that our insurance coverage would be sufficient to cover all losses. Our risk
and exposure to these matters remain heightened because of, among other things, the evolving nature of these threats, our
prominent size and scale and our role in the global payments and technology industries, our plans to continue to implement our
digital and mobile channel strategies and develop additional remote connectivity solutions to serve our customers and account
holders when and how they want to be served, our global presence, our extensive use of third-party vendors and future joint venture
and merger and acquisit ion opportunities. As a result, information security and the continued development and enhancement of our
controls, processes and practices designed to protect our systems, computers, software, data and networks
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 27
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
from attack, damage or unauthorized access remain a priority for us. As cyber-threats continue to evolve, we may be required to
expend significant additional resources to continue to modify or enhance our protective measures or to investigate and remediate
any information security vulnerabilities. Any of the risks describe d above could materially adversely affect our overall business and
results of operations.
In addition to information security risks for our systems, we also routinely encounter account  data compromise events involving
merchants and third-party payment processors that process, store or transmit payment transaction data, which affect millions of
Mastercard, Visa, Discover , American Express and other types of account holders. Further events of this type may subject us to
reputational damage and/or lawsuits involving payment products carrying our brands. Damage to our reputation or that of our brands
resulting from an account data breach of either  our systems or the systems of our customers, merchants and other third parties
could decrease the use and acceptance of our integrated products and services. Such events could also slow or reverse the trend
toward electronic payments. In addition to reputational concerns, the cumulative impact of multiple account data compromise events
could increase the impact of the fraud resulting from such events by, among other things, making it more difficult to identify
consumers. Moreover , while most of the lawsuits resulting from account data breaches do not involve direct claims against us and
while we have releases from many issuers and acquirers, we could still face damage claims, which, if upheld, could materially and
adversely affect our results of operations. Such events could have  a material adverse impact on our transaction volumes, results of
operations and prospects for future growth, or increase our costs by leading to additional regulatory burdens being imposed on us.
Service disruptions that cause us to be unable to process transactions or service our customers could materially affect our
overall business and results of operations.
Our transaction switching systems and other offerings have experienced in limited instances and may continue to experience
interruptions as a result of technology malfunctions, fire, weather events, power outages, telecom munications disruptions, terrorism,
workplace violence, accidents or other catastrop hic events. Our visibility in the global payments industry may also put us at greater
risk of attack by terrorists, activists, or hackers who intend to disrupt our facilities and/or systems. Additionally , we rely on third-party
service providers for the timely transmission of information across our global data network. Inadequate infrastructure in lesser-
developed markets could also result in service disruptions, which could impact our ability to do business in those markets. If one of
our service providers fails to provide the commu nications capacity or services we require, as a result of natural disaster , operational
disruptions, terrorism, hacking or any other reason, the failure could interrupt our services. Although we maintain a enterprise
resiliency program to analyze risk, assess potential impacts, and develop effective response strategies, we cannot ensure that our
business would be immune to these risks, because of the intrinsic importance of our switch ing systems to our business, any
interruption or degradation could adversely affect the perception of the reliability of products carrying our brands and materially
adversely af fect our overall business and our results of operations.
Stakeholder Relationships
Losing a significant portion of business from one or more of our largest customers could lead to significant revenue
decreases in the longer term, which could have a material adverse impact on our business and our results of operations.
Most of our customer relationships are not exclusive and may be terminated by our customers. Our customers can reassess their
commitments to us at any time in the future and/or develop their own competitive services. Accordingly , our business agreements
with these customers may not reduce the risk inherent in our business that customers may terminate their relationships with us in
favor of relationships with our competitors, or for other reasons, or might not meet their contractual obligations to us.
In addition, a significant portion of our revenue is concentrated among our five largest customer s. Loss of business from any of our
large customers could have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations.
Exclusive/near exclusi ve relationships certain customers have with our competitors may have a material adverse impact
on our business.
Certain customers have exclusive, or nearly-exclusive, relationships with our competitors to issue payment products, and these
relationships may make it difficult or cost-prohibi tive for us to do significant amounts of business with them to increase our revenues.
In addition, these customers may be more successful and may grow faster than the customers that primarily issue our payment
products, which could put us at a competitive disadvantage. Furthermore, we earn substantial revenue from customers with nearly-
exclusive relationships with our competitors. Such relationships could provide advantages to the customers to shift business from us
to the comp etitors with which they are principa lly aligned. A significant  loss of our existing revenue or transaction volumes from
these customers could have a material adverse impact on our business.
28 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Consolidation in the banking industry could materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operations.
The banking  industry has undergone substantial, accelerated consolidation in the past. Consolidations have included customers with
a substantial Mastercard portfolio being acquired by institutions with a strong relationship  with a competitor . If significant
consolidation among customers were to contin ue, it could result in the substantial loss of business for us, which could have a
material adverse impact on our business and prospects. In addition, one or more of our customers could seek to merge with, or
acquire, one of our competitors, and any such  transaction could also have a material advers e impact on our overall business.
Consolidation could also produce a smaller number of large customers, which could increase their bargaining power and lead to
lower prices and/or more favorable terms for our customers. These devel opments could materially and adversely affect our results of
operations.
Our business significantly depends on the continued success and competitiveness of our issuing and acquiring
customers and, in many jurisdictions, their ability to effectively manage or help manage our brands.
While we work directly with many stakeholders in the payments system, including merchants, governments, fintechs and large digital
companies and other technology companies, we are, and will continue to be, significantly dependent on our relationships with our
issuers and acquirers and their respective relatio nships with account holders and merchants to support our programs and services.
Furthermore, we depend on our issuing partners and acquirers to continue to innovate to main tain competitiveness in the market.
We do not issue cards or other payment devices, extend credit to account holders or determ ine the interest rates or other fees
charged to account holders. Each issuer determines these and most other competitive payment program features. In addition, we do
not establish the discount rate that merchants are charged for acceptance, which is the responsi bility of our acquiring customers. As
a result, our business significantly depends on the continued success and competitiveness of our issuing and acquiring customers
and the strength of our relationships with them. In turn, our customers’ success depends on a variety of factors over which we have
little or no influence, including economic conditions in global financial markets or their disinterme diation by competitors or emerging
technologies, as well as regulation. If our customers become financially unstable, we may lose revenue or we may be exposed to
settlement risk. See our risk factor in “Risk Factors - Settlement and Third-Party Obligations” in this Part I, Item 1A with respect to
how we guarantee certain third-party obligations for further discussion.
With the exception of the United States and a select number of other jurisdictions, most in-co untry (as opposed to cross-border)
transactions conducted using Mastercard, Maestro and Cirrus cards are authorized, cleared and settled by our customers or other
processors. Because we do not provide domestic switching services in these countries and do not, as described above, have direct
relationships with account holders, we depend on our close working relationships with our customers to effectively manage our
brands, and the percepti on of our payments system, among consumers in these countries. We also rely on these customers to help
manage our brands and perception among regulators and merchants in these countries, alongside our own relationships with them.
From time to time, our customers may take actio ns that we do not believe to be in the best intere sts of our payments system overall,
which may materially and adversely impact our business.
Merchants’ continued focus on acceptance costs may lead to additional litigation and regulatory proceedings and increase
our incentive program costs, which could materially and adversely affect our profitability .
Merchants are important constituents in our payments system. We rely on both our relationships with them, as well as their
relationships with our issuer and acquirer custom ers, to continue to expand the acceptance of our integrated products and services.
We also work with merchants to help them enable new sales channels, create better purchase experiences, improve efficiencies,
increase revenues and fight fraud. In the retail industry , there is a set of larger merchants with increasingly global scope and
influence. We believe that these merchants are having a significant impact on all participants in the global payments industry ,
including Mastercard. Some large merchants have supported the legal , regulatory and legislative challenges to interchange fees that
Mastercard has been defending, including the U.S. merchant litigations. Some merch ants are increasingly asking regulators to
review and potentially regulate our own netwo rk fees, in addition to interchange. See our risk factor in “Risk Factors – Other
Regulation” in this Part I, Item 1A with respect to payments industry regulation, including interchange fees. The continued focus of
merchants on the costs of accepting various forms of payment, including in connection with the growth of digital payments, may lead
to additional litigation and regulatory proceedings.
Certain larger merchants are also able to negotiate incentives from us and pricing concessions from our issuer and acquirer
customers as a condition to accepting our products. We also make payments to certain merchants to incentivize them to create co-
branded payment programs with us. As merchants consolidate and become even larger, we may have to increase the amount of
incentives that we provide to certain merchants, which could materially and adversely affect our results of operations. Competitive
and regulatory pressures on pricing could make it difficult to offset the costs of these incentives. Additionally , if the rate of merchant
acceptance growth slows our business could suf fer.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 29
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Our work with governm ents exposes us to unique risks that could have a material impac t on our business and results of
operations.
As we increase our work with national, state and local governments, both indirectly through financial institutions and with them
directly as our customers, we may face various risks inherent in associating or contracting directly with governments. These risks
include, but are not limited to, the following:
•Governmental entities typically fund projects through appropriated monies. Changes in government al priorities or other political
developments, including disruptions in governmental operations, could impact approved funding and result in changes in the
scope, or lead to the termination, of the arrang ements or contracts we or financial institutions enter into with respect to our
payment products and services.
•Our work with governments subjects us to U.S. and international anti-corruption laws, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt
Practices Act and the U.K. Bribery Act. A violation and subsequ ent judgment or settlem ent under these laws could subject us to
substantial monetary penalties and damages and have a significant reputational impact.
•Working or contracting with governments, either directly or via our financial institution customers, can subject us to heightened
reputational risks, including extensive scrutiny and publicity , as well as a potential association with the policies of a government
as a result of a business arrangement with that government. Any negative publicity or negative association with a government
entity , regardless of its accuracy , may adversely af fect our reputation.
Settlement and Third-Party Obligations
Our role as guarantor , as well as other contractual obligations, expose us to risk of loss or illiquidity .
We are a guarantor of certain third-party obligati ons, including those of certain of our customers.  In this capacity , we are exposed to
credit and liquidity risk from these customers and certain service providers. We may incur significant losses in connection with
transaction settlements if a customer fails to fund its daily settlement obligations due to technical problems, liquidity shortfalls,
insolvency or other reasons. Concurrent settlement failures of more than one of our larger customers or of several of our smaller
customers either on a given day or over a condensed period of time may exceed our available resources and could materially and
adversely af fect our results of operations.
We have significant contractual indemnification obligations with certain customers. Should an event occur that triggers these
obligations, such an event could materially and adversely af fect our overall business and result of operations.
Global Economic and Political Environment
Global economic, political, financial and societal events or conditions could result in a material and adverse impact on our
overall business and results of operations.
Adverse economic trends in key countries in which we operate may adversely affect our financial performance. Such impact may
include, but is not limited to, the following:
•Customers mitigating their economic exposure  by limiting the issuance of new Mastercard products and requesting greater
incentive or greater cost stability from us
•Consumers and businesses lowering spending, which could impact domestic and cross-border spend
•Government intervention (including the effect of laws, regulations and/or government investments on or in our financial institution
customers), as well as uncertainty due to changing political regimes in executive, legislative and/or judicial branches of
government, that may have potential negative effects on our business and our relationships with customers or otherwise alter
their strategic direction away from our products
•Tightening of credit availability that could impact the ability of participating financial institutions to lend to us under the terms of our
credit facility
Additionally , we switch substantially all cross-border transactions using Mastercard, Maestro and Cirrus-branded cards and generate
a significant amount of revenue from cross-border volume fees and fees related to switched transactions. Revenue from switching
cross-border and currency conversion transactions for our customers fluctuates with the levels and destinations of cross-border
travel and our customers’ need for transaction s to be converted into their base currency . Cross-border activity has, and may
continue to be, adversel y affected by world geopolitical, economic, health, weather and other conditions. These include COVID-19,
as well as the threat of terrorism and separate outbreaks of flu, viruses and other diseases, as well as major environmental events
(including those related to climate change). The uncertainty that could result from such even ts could decrease cross-border activity .
Additionally , any regulation of interregional interchange fees could also negatively impact our cross-border activity . In each case,
decreased cross-border activity could decrease the revenue we receive.
30 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Our operations as a global payments network rely in part on global interoperable standards to help facilitate safe and simple
payments. To the extent geopolitical events result in jurisdictions no longer participating in the creation or adoption of these
standards, or the creation of competing standards, the products and services we of fer could be negatively impacted.
Any of these developments could have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations.
Adverse currency fluctuations and foreign exchange controls could negatively impact our results of operations.
During 2020, approximately 67% of our revenu e was generated from activities outside the United States. This revenue (and the
related expense) could be transacted in a non-functional currency or valued based on a currenc y other than the functional currency
of the entity generating the revenues. Resulting exchange gains and losses are included in our net income. Our risk management
activities provide protection with respect to adve rse changes in the value of only a limited numb er of currencies and are based on
estimates of exposures to these currencies.
In addition, some of the revenue we generate outside the United States is subject to unpredictable currency fluctuations including
devaluation of currencies where the values of other currencies change relative to the U.S. dollar . If the U.S. dollar strengthens
compared to currencies in which we generate revenue, this revenue may be translated at a materially lower amount than expected.
Furthermore, we may become subject to exchange control regulations that might restrict or prohibit the conversion of our other
revenue currencies into U.S. dollars, such as what we have experienced in V enezuela.
The occurrence of currency fluctuations or exchange controls could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
Brand and Reputational Impact
Negative brand perception may materially and adversely affect our overall business.
Our brands and their attributes are key assets of our business. The ability to attract consumers to our branded products and retain
them depends upon the external perception of us and our industry . Our business may be af fected by actions taken by our customers,
merchants or other organizations that impact the perception of our brands or the payments industry in general. From time to time,
our customers may take actions that we do not believe to be in the best interests of our brands, such as creditor practices that may
be viewed as “predatory”. Moreover , adverse developments with respect to our industry or the industries of our customers or other
companies and organizations that use our products and services (including certain legally permissible but high risk merchant
categories, such as alcohol, tobacco, fire-arms and adult content) may also, by association, impa ir our reputation, or result in greater
public, regulatory or legislative scrutiny . We have also been pursuing the use of social media channels at an increasingly rapid pace.
Under some  circumstances, our use of social media, or the use of social media by others as a channel for criticism or other
purposes, could also cause rapid, widespread reputational harm to our brands by disseminating rapidly and globally actual or
perceived damaging information about us, our products or merchants or other end users who utilize our products. To the exten t any
of our publis hed sustain ability metrics are subs equently viewed as inaccurate or we are unab le to execute on our sustainability
initiatives, we may be viewed negatively by consumers, investors and other stakeholders concerned about these matters. Also, as
we are headquartered in the United States, a negative perception of the United States could impact the perception of our company ,
which could adversely af fect our business. Any of the above issues could have a material and adverse ef fect to our overall business.
Lack of visibility of our brand in our products and services, or in the products and services of our partners who use our
technology , may materially and adversely affect our business.
As more players enter the global payments system, the layers between our brand and consumers and merchants increase. In order
to compete with other powerful consumer brands that are also becoming part of the consumer payment experience, we often partner
with those brands on payment solutions. These brand s include large digital companies and other technology companies who are our
customers and use our networks to build their own acceptance brands. In some cases, our brand may not be featured in the
payment solution or may be secondary to other brands. Additionally , as part of our relationships with some issuers, our payment
brand is only included on the back of the card. As a result, our brand may either be invisible to consumers or may not be the primary
brand with which consumers associate the payment experience. This brand invisibility , or any consumer confusio n as to our role in
the consumer payment experience, could decrease the value of our brand, which could adversely af fect our business.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 31
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Talent and Culture
We may not be able to attract, hire and retain a highly qualified and diverse workforce, or maintain our corporate culture,
which could impact our ability to grow effectively .
Our perform ance largely depends on the talents and efforts of our employees, particular ly our key personnel and senior
management. We may be unable to retain or to attract highly qualified employees. The market  for key personnel is highly
competitive, particularly in technology and other skill areas significant to our business. Additionally , changes in immigration and work
permit laws and visa regulations and related enforcement have made it difficult for employe es to work in, or transfer among,
jurisdictions in which we have operations and could impair our ability to attract and retain qualifie d employees. Moreover , as a result
of the globa l COVID-19 pandemic, a significant portion of our workforce is working in a mostly  remote environment. This remote
environment may continue after the pandemic due to potential resulting trends, and could impact the quality of our corporate culture.
Failure to attract, hire, develop, motivate and retain highly qualified and diverse employee talent, or to maintain a corporate culture
that fosters innovation, creativity and teamwork could harm our overall business and results of operations.
We rely on key personnel to lead with integrity and decency . To the extent our leaders behave in a manner that is not consistent with
our values, we could experience significant impact to our brand and reputation, as well as to our corporate culture.
Acquisitions
Acquisitions, strategic investments or entry into new businesses could be impacted by regulatory scrutiny , and if
successful, could disrupt our business and harm our results of operations or reputation.
As we continue to evaluate our strategic acquisitions of, or acquiring interests in joint ventures or other entities related to,
complementary businesses, products or technologies, we face increasing regulatory scrutiny with respect to antitrust and other
considerations. Such scrutiny could prevent us from successfully completing such acquisitions in the future.
To the exten t we do make these acquisitions, we may not be able to successfully partner with or integrate them, despite original
intentions and focused efforts. In addition, such an integration may divert management’ s time and resources from our core business
and disrupt our operations. Moreover , we may spend time and money on acquisitions or projects that do not meet our expectations
or increase our revenue. To the extent we pay the purchase price of any acquisition in cash, it would reduce our cash reserves
available to us for other uses, and to the extent the purchase price is paid with our stock, it could be dilutive to our stockholders.
Furthermore, we may not be able to successfully finance the business following the acquisition as a result of costs of operations,
including any litigation risk which may be inherited from the acquisition.
Any acquisition or entry into a new business could subject us to new regulations, both directly as a result of the new business as well
as in the other existing parts of our business, with which we would need to comply . This compliance could increase our costs, and
we could be subject to liability or reputational harm to the extent we cannot meet any such comp liance requirements. Our expansion
into new businesses could also result in unanticipated issues which may be dif ficult to manage.
Class A Common Stock and Governance Structure
Provisions in our organizational documents and Delaware law could be considered anti-takeover provisions and have an
impact on change-in-control.
Provisions contained in our amended and resta ted certificate of incorporation and bylaws and Delaware law could be considered
anti-takeover provisions, including provisions that could delay or prevent entirely a merger or acquisition that our stockholders
consider favorable. These provisions may also discourage acquisition proposals or have the effect of delaying or preventing entirely
a change in control, which could harm our stock price. For example , subject to limited exceptions, our amended and restated
certificate of incorporation prohibits any person from beneficially owning more than 15% of any of the Class A common stock or any
other class or series of our stock with general voting power , or more than 15% of our total voting power . In addition:
•our stockholders are not entitled to the right to cumulate votes in the election of directors
•our stockholders are not entitled to act by written consent
•a vote of 80% or more of all of the outstanding shares of our stock then entitled to vote is required for stockholders to amend any
provision of our bylaws
•any representative of a competitor of Mastercard or of Mastercard Foundation is disqualified  from service on our board of
directors
32 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Mastercard Foundatio n’s substantial stock ownership, and restrictions on its sales, may impact corporate actions or
acquisition proposals favorable to, or favored by , the other public stockholders.
As of February 9, 2021, Mastercard Foundation owned 108,210,635 shares of Class A common stock, representing approximately
11.0% of our general voting power . Mastercard Foundation may not sell or otherwise transfer its shares of Class A common stock
prior to May 1, 2027, except to the extent necessary to satisfy its charitable disbursement requirements, for which purpose earlier
sales are permitted and have occurred. Mastercard Foundation is permitted to sell all of its remaining shares after May 1, 2027,
subject to certain conditions. The directors of Masterc ard Foundation are required to be independent of us and our customers. The
ownership of Class A common stock by Mastercard Foundation, together with the restrictions on transfer , could discourage or make
more difficult acquisition proposals favored by the other holders of the Class A common stock. In addition, because Mastercard
Foundation is restricted from selling its shares for an extended period of time, it may not have the same interest in short or medium-
term movements in our stock price as, or incentive to approve a corporate action that may be favorable to, our other stockholders.
Item 1B. Unresolved staf f comments
Not applicable.
Item 2. Properties
We own our corporate headquarters, located in Purchase, New York, and our principal technolog y and operations center , located in
O’Fallon, Missouri. As of December 31, 2020, Mastercard and its subsidiaries owned or leased commercial prope rties throughout
the U.S. and other countries around the world, consisting of corporate and regional of fices, as well as our operations centers.
We believe that our facilities are suitable and adequate for the business that we currently conduct. However , we periodically  review
our space requirements and may acquire or lease new space to meet the needs of our business, or consolidate and dispose of
facilities that are no longer required.
Item 3. Legal proceedings
Refer to Note 13 (Accrued Expenses and Accrued Litigation) and Note 21 (Legal and Regulato ry Proceedings) to the consolidated
financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 33
PART I
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Information about our executive of ficers
(as of February 12, 2021)
Name
Current Position Age Previous Mastercard Experience Previous Business Experience
Ajay Banga
Executive Chairman  
 since January 202161 Chief Executive Of ficer (2020)
President and Chief Executive Of ficer (2010-
2020)
President and COO (2009-2010)Several executive positions at Citigroup,
including CEO, Asia Pacific region and
Chairman and CEO, International Global
Consumer Group
Previous senior leadership experience at
Nestlé India and PepsiCo in roles of
increasing responsibility
Ajay Bhalla 
President, Cyber and 
 Intelligence Solutions 
 since November 201855 President, Enterprise Security Solutions
(2014-2018)
President, Digital Gateway Services (2011-
2013)
President, South Asia and Southeast Asia
(2008-2011)
Various senior leadership positions,
including President, Southeast Asia;
Country Manager , Singapore and Head of
Marketing, Southeast Asia; V ice PresidentVarious leadership positions at HSBC and Xerox
Corporation
Ann Cairns 
 Vice Chairman 
 since June 201864 President, International (2011-2018) Managing director , Alvarez & Marsal
CEO, ABN AMRO
Senior corporate and investment banking roles at
Citigroup
 
Gilberto Caldart 
 President, International 
 since June 201861 President, Latin America and Caribbean
region (2013-2018)
Division President, South Latin
America/Brazil (2008-2013)Various leadership positions at Citigroup,
including Country Business Manager , Brazil
Michael Fraccaro 
 Chief People Officer 
 since July 201655 Executive V ice President, Human
Resources, Global Products and Solutions
(2014-2016)
Senior V ice President, Human Resources,
Global Products and Solutions (2012-2014)Various executive-level human resources
positions at HSBC Group, Hong Kong (2000-
2012)
Various senior human resources positions in
banking and financial services in Australia and
the Middle East
Michael Froman
Vice Chairman and
President, Strategic
Growth
since April 201858 Mr. Froman joined the Company in 2018 in
his current roleU.S. T rade Representative in the Executive Of fice
of President Obama (2013-2017)
Assistant to the President and Deputy National
Security Advisor for International Economic
Policy (2009-2013)
Various senior leadership positions at Citigroup,
including CEO, CitiInsurance and COO of
Citigroup’ s alternative investments business
34 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART I
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Name
 Current Position Age Previous Mastercard Experience Previous Business Experience
Linda Kirkpatrick
President, North America
since January 202144 President, U.S. Issuers (2020)
Executive V ice President, Merchants and
Acceptance (2016-2020)
Senior V ice President, Core Merchants
(2013-2016)
Senior V ice President, Franchise
Development (2011-2013)
Vice President, U.S. Region (2008-2011)
Vice President, Investor Relations
Edward McLaughlin 
 President, Operations
and T echnology 
 since May 201755 Chief Information Of ficer (2016-2017)
Chief Emerging Payments Of ficer (2010-
2015)
Various senior leadership roles, including
Chief Franchise Development Of ficer and
Senior V ice President, Bill Payment and
HealthcareGroup V ice President, Product and Strategy ,
Metavante Corporation
Co-Founder and CEO, Paytrust, Inc.
Sachin Mehra 
 Chief Financial Officer 
since April 201950 Chief Financial Operations Of ficer (2018-
2019)
Executive V ice President, Commercial
Products (2015-2018)
Executive V ice President and Business
Financial Of ficer, North America (2013-
2015)
Corporate T reasurer (2010-2013)Various senior positions at Hess Corporation,
including V ice President and T reasurer
Various senior treasury and finance positions,
General Motors Corporation and GMAC
Michael Miebach
President and Chief
Executive Officer  since
January 202153 President (2020)
Chief Product Of ficer (2016-2020)
President, Middle East and Africa (2010-
2015)Managing Director , Middle East and North Africa
and Managing Director , Sub-Saharan Africa,
Barclays Bank PLC
Various executive positions at Citigroup in
Germany , Austria, U.K. and T urkey
Tim Murphy 
 General Counsel 
since April 201453 Chief Product Of ficer (2009-2014)
Various senior leadership roles, including
President, U.S. Region; Executive V ice
President, Customer Business Planning and
Analysis; and Senior V ice President and
Associate General CounselAssociate, Cleary , Gottlieb, Steen and Hamilton,
New Y ork and London
Raja Rajamannar 
 Chief Marketing and
Communications Officer
and President, Healthcare
since January 201659 Chief Marketing Of ficer (2013-2015) Executive V ice President-Senior Business and
Chief T ransformation Of ficer, Anthem (formerly ,
WellPoint, Inc.) (2012- 2013)
Senior V ice President and Chief Innovation and
Marketing Of ficer, Humana Inc. (2009-2012)
Various management positions at Citigroup,
including Executive V ice President and Chief
Marketing Of ficer-Citi Global Cards
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 35
PART I
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Name
 Current Position Age Previous Mastercard Experience Previous Business Experience
Raj Seshadri
 President, Data and
Services
 since January 202055 President, U.S. Issuers (2016-2019) Managing Director , Head of iShares U.S. W ealth
Advisory business, BlackRock (2014-2016)
Managing Director , Global Marketing Of ficer of
iShares, BlackRock, Inc. (2012-2014)
Various leadership positions at Citigroup, U.S.
Trust Company and McKinsey & Company , Inc.
Kevin Stanton 
 Chief T ransformation
Officer 
since January 202059 Chief Services Of ficer (2018-2019)
President, Mastercard Advisors (2010-2017)
Various senior leadership roles, including
President, Canada; Senior V ice President,
Strategy and Market Development; and V ice
President, Senior Counsel and North
America Region CounselVice President, Counsel, Shawmut National
Corporation
Craig Vosburg 
Chief Product Officer 
since January 202153President, North America (2016-2020)
Chief Product Of ficer (2014-2015)
Executive V ice President, U.S. Market
Development (2010-2014)
Various senior leadership roles, including
Head of Mastercard Advisors, U.S. and
Canada and Head of Mastercard Advisors,
Southeast Asia, Greater China and South
Asia/Middle East/Africa
 Senior member-financial services practice, Bain
& Company and A.T . Kearney
Vice president, CoreStates Financial Corporation
36 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
Item 5. Market for registrant’ s common equity , related
stockholder matters and issuer purchases of equity securities
Item 6. Selected financial data
Item 7. Management’ s discussion and analysis of financial
condition and results of operations
Item 7A. Quantitative and qualitative disclosures about market
risk
Item 8. Financial statements and supplementary data
Item 9. Changes in and disagreements with accountants on
accounting and financial disclosure
Item 9A. Controls and procedures
Item 9B. Other information
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUES PURCHASES OF
Item 5. Market for registrant’ s common equity , related stockholder
matters and issuer purchases of equity securities
Our Class A common stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “MA”. At February 9, 2021, we had 73
stockholders of record for our Class A common stock. We believe that the number of beneficial owners  is substantially greater than
the number of record holders because a large portion of our Class A common stock is held in “street name” by brokers.
There is currently no established public trading market for our Class B common stock. There were approximately 257 holders of
record of our non-voting  Class B common stock as of February 9, 2021, constituting approxim ately 0.8% of our total outstanding
equity .
Stock Performance Graph
The graph and table below compare the cumula tive total stockholder return of Mastercard’ s Class A common stock, the S&P 500
and the S&P 500 Financ ials for the five-year period ended December 31, 2020. The graph assumes a $100 investment in our Class
A common stock and both of the indices and the reinvestment of dividends. Mastercard’ s Class B common stock is not publicly
traded or listed on any exchange or dealer quotation system.
Comparison of cumulative five-year total return
Total returns to stockholders for each of the years presented were as follows:
Base periodIndexed Returns
For the Years Ended December 31,
Company/Index 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020
Mastercard $100.00 $106.91 $157.88 $197.86 $314.91 $378.44 
S&P 500 100.00 111.96 136.40 130.42 171.49 203.04 
S&P 500 Financials 100.00 122.80 150.04 130.49 172.41 169.49 
38 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUES PURCHASES OF
Dividend Declaration and Policy
On Decemb er 8, 2020, our Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.44 per share paid on February 9, 2021 to
holders of record on January 8, 2021 of our Class A common stock and Class B common stock.  On February 8, 2021, our Board of
Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.44 per share payable on May 7, 2021 to holders of record on April 9, 2021 of our
Class A common stock and Class B common stock.
Subject to legally available funds, we intend to continue to pay a quarterly cash dividend on our outstanding Class A common stock
and Class B common stock. However , the declaration and payment of future dividends is at the sole discretion of our Board of
Directors after taking into account various factors, including our financial condition, operating results, available cash and current and
anticipated cash needs.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
During the fourth quarter  of 2020, we repurchased a total of approximately 3.1 million shares for $1.03 billion at an average price of
$330.34 per share of Class A common stock. See Note 16 (Stockholde rs' Equity) to the consolidated financial statements included in
Part II, Item 8 for furthe r discussion with respec t to our share repurchase programs. The following table presents our repurchase
activity on a cash basis during the fourth quarter of 2020:
PeriodTotal Number
 of Shares
 PurchasedAverage Price
 Paid per Share
 (including
 commission cost)Total Number of
 Shares Purchased as
 Part of Publicly
 Announced Plans or
 ProgramsDollar Value of
Shares that may yet
be Purchased under
the Plans or
Programs 
October 1 – 31 1,552,273 $ 335.39 1,552,273 $ 4,340,730,451 
November 1 – 30 779,892 314.13 779,892 4,095,745,017 
December 1 – 31 785,846 336.44 785,846 9,831,351,292 
Total 3,118,011 330.34 3,118,011 
Dollar value of shares that may yet be purchased under the share repurchase programs are as of the end of each period presented.1
1
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 39
PART II
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
Item 6. Selected financial data
The stateme nt of operations data and the cash  dividends declared per share for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, and the balance  sheet data as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, are presented in the audited consolidated financial
statements of Mastercard Incorporated included in Part II, Item 8. The statement of operat ions data and the cash dividends declared
per share for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016, and the balance sheet data as of December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016,
are not included in this Report, and are provided in Part II, Item 8 of our Annual Reports on Form 10-K for the years ended
December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016.
40 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Item 7. Management’ s discussion and analysis of financial
condition and results of operations
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and notes of Mastercard
Incorporated and its consolidated subsidiaries, including Mastercard International Incorporated (“Mastercard International”) (together ,
“Mastercard” or the “Company”), included elsewhere in this Report. Percentage changes provided throughout “Management’ s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” were calculated on amounts rounded to the nearest
thousand. For discussion related to the results of operations for the year ended December 31, 2019 compared to the year ended
December 31, 2018, please see Part II, Item 7 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2019.
Business Overview
Mastercard is a technology company in the global payments industry that connects consumers, financial institutions, merchants,
governments, digital partners, businesses and other organizations worldwide, enabling them to use electronic forms of payment
instead of cash and checks. We make payments easier and more efficient by providing a wide range of payment solution s and
services using our family of well-known brands, including Mastercard®, Maestro® and Cirrus®. We operate a multi-rail network that
offers custom ers one partner to turn to for their domestic and cross-border payment needs. Through our unique and proprietary
global payments network, which we refer to as our core network, we switch (authorize, clear and settle) payment transactions and
deliver related products and services. We have additional payment capabilities that include automated clearing house (“ACH”)
transactions (both batch and real-time account-based payments). We also provide integrated value-added offerings such as cyber
and intellige nce produc ts, information and analytics services, consulting, loyalty and reward programs, processing and open
banking. Our payment solutions offer customers choice and flexibility and are designed to ensure safety and security for the global
payments system.
A typical transaction on our core network involves four participants in addition to us: account holder (a person or entity who holds a
card or uses another device enabled for paym ent), issuer (the account holder ’s financial institution), merchant and acquirer (the
merchant’ s financial institution). We do not issue cards, extend credit, determine or receive revenue from interest rates or other fees
charged to account holders by issuers, or establish the rates charged by acquirers in connection with merchants’ acceptance of our
products. In most cases, account holder relationships belong to, and are managed by , our customers.
COVID-19
The coronavirus (“COVID-19”) pandemic has spread rapidly across the globe and has had significant negative effects on the global
economy . This outbreak has affected business activity , adversely impacting consumers, our customers,  suppliers and business
partners, as well as our workforce. We continue to monitor the effects of the pandemic and actions taken by governments as they
relate to travel restrictions, social distancing measures and restrictions on business operations,  as well as the continued impact of
these actions on consumers and businesses. While some of these measures have eased in certain jurisdictions, others have
remained in place. The extent to which current measures are remov ed or new measures are put in place will depend upon how the
pandemic evolves, as well as the progress of the global roll-out of vaccines.
The COVID-19 outbreak affected our 2020 performance, during which we noted unfavorable trends compared to historical periods.
The following table provides a summary of trends in our key metrics for 2020 as compared to the respective periods in 2019:
Quarter endedYear ended
 December 31 March 31 June 30 September 30 December 31
Increase/(Decrease)
Gross dollar volume (local currency basis) 8 % (10)% 1 % 1 % — %
Cross-border volume (local currency basis) (1)% (45)% (36)% (29)% (29)%
Switched transactions 13 % (10)% 5 % 4 % 3 %
The impact of this outbreak started in the first quarter of 2020 as we experienced declines in our key metrics compared to historical
periods, primarily due to travel restrictions and stay-at-home orders implemented by governments in many regions and countries
across the globe. Our key metrics continued to be impacted throughout 2020 as follows:
•Gross dollar volumes were flat in 2020 as comp ared to 2019, recovering gradually in the secon d half of the year from a decline
during the second quart er in part due to the global relaxation of both restrictions on business operations and social distancing
measures.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 41
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
•Cross-border volumes were negatively impacted  by the pandemic during 2020 due to a significant decrease in global travel as a
result of compliance with travel restrictions and quarantine requirements. While cross- border volumes are still lower compared to
prior year periods, these volumes have improved throughout the second half of 2020.
•Switched transactions were negatively impacte d by the pandemic primarily in the second quarter . Subsequently , switched
transactions improved during the third quarter in part due to the global relaxation of both restricti ons on business operations and
social distan cing measu res. During the fourth quarter , switched transactions growth slowed slightly as compared to the third
quarter .
The full extent to which the pandemic, and measures taken in response, affect our business,  results of operations and financial
condition will depend on future developments, including the duration of the pandemic and its impact on the global economy , which
are uncertain,  and cannot be predicted at this time.
Financial Results Overview
The following table provides a summary of our key GAAP operating results, as reported: 
Year ended December 31,2020
Increase/
 (Decrease)2019
Increase/
 (Decrease) 2020 2019 2018
($ in millions, except per share data)
Net revenue $ 15,301 $ 16,883 $ 14,950 (9)% 13%
Operating expenses $ 7,220 $ 7,219 $ 7,668 —% (6)%
Operating income $ 8,081 $ 9,664 $ 7,282 (16)% 33%
Operating margin 52.8 % 57.2 % 48.7 % (4.4) ppt 8.5 ppt
Income tax expense $ 1,349 $ 1,613 $ 1,345 (16)% 20%
Effective income tax rate 17.4 % 16.6 % 18.7 % 0.8 ppt (2.1) ppt
Net income $ 6,411 $ 8,118 $ 5,859 (21)% 39%
Diluted earnings per share $ 6.37 $ 7.94 $ 5.60 (20)% 42%
Diluted weighted-average shares outstanding 1,006 1,022 1,047 (2)% (2)%
The following table provi des a summary of our key non-GAAP operating results , adjusted to exclude the impact of gains and losses
on our equity investments, special items (which represent litigation judgments and settlements and certain one-time items) and the
related tax impacts on our non-GAAP adjustments. In addition, we have presented growth rates, adjusted for the impact of currency:
Year ended December 31,2020
 Increase/(Decrease)2019
 Increase/(Decrease)
2020 2019 2018As
adjustedCurrency-
neutralAs
adjustedCurrency-
neutral
($ in millions, except per share data)
Net revenue $ 15,301 $ 16,883 $ 14,950 (9)% (8)% 13% 16%
Adjusted operating expenses $ 7,147 $ 7,219 $ 6,540 (1)% (1)% 10% 12%
Adjusted operating margin 53.3 % 57.2 % 56.2 % (4.0) ppt (3.7) ppt 1.0 ppt 1.3 ppt
Adjusted ef fective income tax
rate 17.2 % 17.0 % 18.5 % 0.2 ppt 0.3 ppt (1.5) ppt (1.3) ppt
Adjusted net income $ 6,463 $ 7,937 $ 6,792 (19)% (17)% 17% 20%
Adjusted diluted earnings per
share $ 6.43 $ 7.77 $ 6.49 (17)% (16)% 20% 23%
Note: Tables may not sum due to rounding.
See “Non-GAAP Financial Information” for further information on our non-GAAP adjustments and the reconciliation to GAAP reported amounts.1
1  
42 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Key highlights for 2020 as compared to 2019 were as follows:
Net revenue
GAAPNon-GAAP 
 (currency-neutral)Net revenue decreased 8% on a currency-neutral basis due to COVID-19 impacts, and
includes a 1 percentage point benefit from acquisitions. Gross dollar volume was flat
on a local currency basis. The primary drivers of net revenue were:down 9% down 8%      - Cross-border volume decline of 29% on a local currency basis
     - Rebates and incentives growth of 3%, or 4% on a currency-neutral basis
These decreases to net revenue were partially of fset by:
     - Switched transactions growth of 3%
     - Other revenues growth of 14%, or 15% on a currency-neutral basis, which
        includes 3 percentage points of growth due to acquisitions
Operating
expensesAdjusted
 operating
expenses
GAAPNon-GAAP 
 (currency-neutral)Adjusted operating expense decreased 1% on a currency-neutral basis, which included
a 4 percent age point increase due to acquisitions. Excluding acquisitions, expenses
declined 5 percentage points primarily due to reduced spending on advertising and
marketing, travel and professional fees, partially offset by higher personnel and data
processing costs to support continued investment in our strategic initiatives. flat down 1%
Effective income
tax rateAdjusted effective
income tax rate
GAAPNon-GAAP 
 (currency-neutral)Adjusted effective income tax rate of 17.2% was higher than prior year primarily due to
a discrete tax benefit related to a favorable court ruling in 2019.
17.4% 17.2%
Other 2020 financial highlights were as follows:
•We generated net cash flows from operations of $7.2 billion.
•We completed the acquisitions of businesses for total consideration of $1.1 billion.
•We repurchased 14.3 million shares of our common stock for $4.5 billion and paid dividends of $1.6 billion.
•We completed debt of ferings for an aggregate principal amount of $4.0 billion.
Non-GAAP Financial Information
Non-GAAP financial information is defined as a numerical measure of a company’ s performance  that excludes or includes amounts
so as to be different than the most comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States (“GAAP ”). Our non-GAAP financial measures exclude the impact of special items, where
applicable, which represent litigation judgments and settlements and certain one-time items, as well as the related tax impacts
(“Special Items”). Starting in 2019, our non-GAAP financial measures also exclude the impact of gains and losses on our equity
investments which primarily includes mark-to-market fair value adjustments, impairments and gains and losses upon disposition and
the related tax impacts. The 2018 amounts were  not restated, as the impact of the change was immaterial in relation to our non-
GAAP results. Our non-GAAP financial measures for the comparable periods exclude the impact of the following:
Gains and Losses on Equity Investments
•During 2020  and 2019, we recorded net gains of $30 million ($15 million after tax, or $0.01 per diluted share) and $167 million
($124 million  after tax, or $0.12 per diluted share), respectively . The net gains were primarily related to unrealiz ed fair market
value adjustments on marketable and non-marketable equity securities.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 43
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Special Items
Litigation provisions
•During 2020 , we recorded pre-tax charges of $73 million ($67 million after tax, or $0.07 per diluted share) related to litigation
provisions which included pre-tax charges of:
◦$45 million related to an ongoing confidential legal matter associated with our prepaid cards in the U.K., and
◦$28 million related to estimated attorneys’ fees and litigation settlements with U.K. and Pan-European merchants.
•During 2018 , we recorded pre-tax charges of $1,128 million ($1,008 million after tax, or $0.96 per diluted share) related to
litigation provisions which included pre-tax charges of:
◦$654 million related to a fine issued by the European Commission,
◦$237 million related to both the U.S. merchant class litigation and the filed and anticipated opt-out U.S. merchant cases, and
◦$237 million related to litigation settlements with U.K. and Pan-European merchants.
Tax act
•During 2019 , we recorded a $57 million net tax benefit ($0.06 per diluted share), which included a $30 million benefit related to a
reduction to the 2017 one-time deemed repatriation tax on accumulated foreign earnings (the “Transition Tax”) resulting from final
tax regulations issued in 2019 and a $27 million benefit related to additional foreign tax credits which can be carried back under
transition rules.
•During 2018, we recorded a $75 million net tax benefit ($0.07 per diluted share), which included a $90 million benefit related to
the carryback of foreign tax credits due to transition rules, offset by a net $15 million expense primarily related to an increase to
our T ransition T ax.
See Note 7 (Investments), Note 20 (Income Taxes) and Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings) to the consolidated financial
statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion. We excluded these items because managem ent evaluates the
underlying operations and performance of the Company separately from these recurring and nonrecurring items.
We believe that the non-GAAP financial measures presented facilitate an understanding of our operating performance and provide a
meaningful comparison of our results between periods. We use non-GAAP finan cial measures to, among other things, evaluate our
ongoing operations in relation to historical results, for internal planning and forecasting purposes and in the calculation of
performance-based compensation.
In addition, we present growth rates adjusted for the impact of currency , which is a non-GAAP financial measure. Currency-neutral
growth rates are calculated by remeasuring the prior period’ s results using the current period’s exchange rates for both the
translational and transactional impacts on opera ting results. The impact of currency translation represents the effect of translating
operating results where the functional currency is different than our U.S. dollar reporting currency . The impact of the transactional
currency represents the effect of converting revenue and expenses occurring in a currency other than the functional currency . We
believe the presentation of currency-neutral growth rates provides relevant information to facilitate an understanding of our operating
results.
Net revenue, operating expenses, operating margin, other income (expense), effective income tax rate, net income and diluted
earnings per share adjusted for the impact of gains and losses on our equity investments, Special Items and/or the impact of
currency , are non-GAAP  financial measures and should not be relied upon as substitutes for measures calculated in accordance
with GAAP .
44 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following tables reconcile our reported financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP to the respective non-GAAP
adjusted financial measures:
Year ended December 31, 2020
 Operating 
 expensesOperating 
 marginOther
 income 
 (expense)Effective 
 income 
 tax rate Net 
 income Diluted 
 earnings 
 per share
($ in millions, except per share data)
Reported - GAAP $ 7,220 52.8 %$ (321) 17.4 %$6,411 $ 6.37 
(Gains) losses on equity investments ** ** (30) (0.1)% (15) (0.01)
Litigation provisions (73) 0.5 % ** (0.1)% 67 0.07 
Non-GAAP $ 7,147 53.3 %$ (351) 17.2 %$6,463 $ 6.43 
Year ended December 31, 2019
 Operating 
 expensesOperating 
 marginOther
income 
 (expense)Effective 
 income 
 tax rate Net 
 income Diluted 
 earnings 
 per share
($ in millions, except per share data)
Reported - GAAP $ 7,219 57.2 %$ 67 16.6 %$8,118 $ 7.94 
(Gains) losses on equity investments ** ** (167) (0.2)% (124) (0.12)
Tax act ** ** ** 0.6 % (57) (0.06)
Non-GAAP $ 7,219 57.2 %$ (100) 17.0 %$7,937 $ 7.77 
Year ended December 31, 2018
 Operating 
 expensesOperating 
 marginOther
income 
 (expense)Effective 
 income 
 tax rate Net 
 income Diluted 
 earnings 
 per share
($ in millions, except per share data)
Reported - GAAP $ 7,668 48.7 %$ (78) 18.7 %$5,859 5.60 
Ligitation provisions (1,128) 7.5 % ** (1.1)% 1,008 0.96 
Tax act ** ** ** 0.9 % (75) (0.07)
Non-GAAP $ 6,540 56.2 %$ (78) 18.5 %$6,792 $ 6.49 
Note: Tables may not sum due to rounding.
** Not applicable
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 45
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following tables represent the reconciliation of our growth rates reported under GAAP to our non-GAAP growth rates:
Year Ended December 31, 2020 as compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2019
Increase/(Decrease)
Net revenue Operating
expensesOperating
marginEffective
income tax
rate  Net income Diluted
earnings per
share
Reported - GAAP (9)% — % (4.4)  ppt 0.8 ppt (21)% (20)%
(Gains) losses on equity investments  **  **  ** — ppt 1 % 1 %
Litigation provisions  ** (1)% 0.5  ppt (0.1) ppt 1 % 1 %
Tax act  **  **  ** (0.6) ppt 1 % 1 %
Non-GAAP (9)% (1)% (4.0)  ppt 0.2 ppt (19)% (17)%
Currency impact 1 % — % 0.3  ppt 0.2 ppt 1 % 1 %
Non-GAAP - currency-neutral (8)% (1)% (3.7) ppt 0.3 ppt (17)% (16)%
Year Ended December 31, 2019 as compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2018
Increase/(Decrease)
Net revenue Operating
expensesOperating
marginEffective
income tax
rate  Net income Diluted
earnings per
share
Reported - GAAP 13 % (6)% 8.5 ppt (2.1) ppt 39 % 42 %
(Gains) losses on equity investments ** ** ** (0.2) ppt (2)% (2)%
Tax act ** ** ** (0.3) ppt 1 % 1 %
Litigation provisions ** 16 % (7.5) ppt 1.1 ppt (20)% (21)%
Non-GAAP 13 % 10 % 1.0 ppt (1.5) ppt 17 % 20 %
Currency impact 3 % 2 % 0.3 ppt 0.2 ppt 3 % 3 %
Non-GAAP - currency-neutral 16 % 12 % 1.3 ppt (1.3) ppt 20 % 23 %
Note: Tables may not sum due to rounding.
** Not applicable
In 2019 we updated our non-GAAP methodology to prospectively exclude the impact of gains and losses on our equity investments. The 2018
period was not restated as the impact of the change was immaterial in relation to our non-GAAP results.
Represents the translational and transactional impact of currency.
Key Metrics
In addition to the financial measures described above in “Financial Results Overview”, we revie w the following metrics to evaluate
and identify trends in our business, measure our performance, prepare financial projections and make strategic decisions. We
believe that the key metrics presented facilitate an understanding of our operating and financial performance and provide a
meaningful comparison of our results between periods. 
Gross Dollar Volume (“GDV”)  measures dollar volume of activity on cards carrying our brands during the period, on a local
currency basis and U.S. dollar-converted basis. Dollar volum e represents purchase volume plus cash volume and includes the
impact of balance transfers and convenience checks; “purchase volume” means the aggregate dollar amount of purchases made
with Mastercard-branded cards for the relevant period; and “cash volume” means the aggregate dollar amount of cash
disbursements and includes the impact of balance transfers and convenience checks obtained  with Mastercard-branded cards for
the relevant period. Information denominated in U.S. dollars relating to GDV is calculated by applying an established U.S. dollar/local
currency exchange rate for each local currency in which Mastercard volumes are reported. These exchange rates are calculated on
a quarterly basis using the average exchange rate for each quarter .  Mastercard reports period-over-period rates of change in
purchase volume and cash volume on the basis of local currency information, in order to eliminate the impact of changes in the
value of currencies against the U.S. dollar in calculating such rates of change.
Cross-border Volume  measures cross-border dollar volume initiated and switched through our network during the period, on a
local currency basis and U.S. dollar-converted basis, for all Mastercard-branded programs.2
1
2
1
2
1
2
46 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Switched Transactions  meas ures the number of transactions switched by Mastercard. We define transactions switched as the
number of transactions initiated and switched through our network during the period.
Operating Margin  measures how much profit we make on each dollar of sales after our operating costs but before other income
(expense) and income tax expense. Operating margin is calculated by dividing our operating income by net revenue.
Data used in the calculation of GDV is provided by Mastercard customers and is subject to verification by Mastercard and partial cross-checking
against information provided by Mastercard’s transaction switching systems. All data is subject to revision and amendment by Mastercard or
Mastercard’s customers.
Normalized to eliminate the effects of differing switching and carryover days between periods. Carryover days are those where transactions and
volumes from days where the company does not clear and settle are processed.
Foreign Currency
Currency Impact
Our primary revenue functional currencies are the U.S. dollar , euro, Brazilian real and the British pound. Our overall operating results
are impacted by currenc y translation, which represents the effect of translating operating results where the functional currency is
different than our U.S. dollar reporting currency .
Our operating results are also impacted by transactional currency . The impact of the transactional currency represents the effect of
converting revenue and expense transactions occurring in a currency other than the functional currency . Changes in currency
exchange rates directly impact the calculation of gross dollar volume (“GDV”) and gross euro volume (“GEV”), which are used in the
calculation of our domes tic assessments, cross-border volume fees and certain volume-related rebates and incentives. In most non-
European regions, GDV is calculated based on local currency spending volume converted to U.S. dollars using average exchange
rates for the period. In Europe, GEV is calculated based on local currency spending volume converted to euros using average
exchange rates for the period. As a result, certain of our domestic assessme nts, cross-border volume fees and volume-rela ted
rebates and incentives are impacted by the strengthening or weakening of the U.S. dollar versus  non-European local currencies and
the strengthening or weakening of the euro versus other European local currencies. For example, our billing in Australia is in the
U.S. dollar , however , consumer spend in Australia is in the Australian dollar . The currenc y transactional impact of convertin g
Australian dollars to our U.S. dollar billing currency will have an impact on the revenue generated. The strengthening or weakening
of the U.S. dollar is evident when GDV growth on a U.S. dollar-converted basis is compared to GDV growth on a local currency
basis. In 2020, GDV on a U.S. dollar-converted basis decreased 2.0%, while GDV on a local currency basis increased 0.1% versus
2019. In 2019, GDV on a U.S. dollar-converted basis increased 9.8%, while GDV on a local currency basis increased 13.1% versus
2018. Further , the impact from transactional currenc y occurs in transaction processing revenue, other revenue and operating
expenses when the local currency of these items is dif ferent than the functional currency of the entity .
The translat ional and transactional impact of currency (“Currency impact”) has been identified in our drivers of change tables and
has been excluded from our currency-neutral growth rates, which are non-GAAP financial measures. See “Financ ial Results -
Revenue and Operating Expenses” for our drivers of change impact tables and “Non-GAAP Financial Information” for further
information on our non-GAAP adjustments.
2021 Hedge Accounting Designation
Through December 31, 2020, our approach to manage our transactional currency exposure consisted of hedging a portion of
anticipated revenues impacted by transactional currencies by entering into foreign exchange derivative contracts, and recording the
related changes in fair value in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations. Beginning in
January 2021, we started to formally designate certain newly-executed foreign exchange derivative contracts, which meet the
established accounting criteria, as cash flow hedges. Starting in the first quarter of 2021, gains and losses resulting from changes in
fair value of these designated contracts will be deferred in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and subsequently
recognized in the respective component of net revenue when the underlying forecasted transactions impact earnings. The related
impact of our foreign exchange cash flow hedgi ng activities will be excluded from our currency-neutral growth rates as part of our
Currency impact.
Foreign Exchange Activity
We incur foreign currency gains and losses from remeasuring monetary assets and liabilities, including settlement receivables and
payables with our custo mers, that are denominated in a currency other than the functional currency of the entity . To manage this
foreign exchange risk, we may enter into foreign exchange derivative contracts to economically hedge the foreign currency exposure
of a portion of our nonfu nctional monetary assets and liabilities. The gains or losses resulting from changes in fair value of these
contracts are intended to reduce the potential ef fect of the underlying hedged exposure and are recorded net within general and2
1    
2    
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 47
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations. The impact of foreign exchange activity , including the related
hedging activities, has not been eliminated in our currency-neutral results.
Our foreign exchange risk management activiti es are discussed further in Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) to the
consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
Risk of Currency Devaluation
We are expo sed to currency devaluation in certa in countries. In addition, we are subje ct to exchange control regulations that restrict
the conversion of financial assets into U.S. dollars. While these revenues and assets are not material to us on a consolidated basis,
we can be negatively impacted should there be a continued and sustained devaluation of local currencies relative to the U.S. dollar
and/or a continued and sustained deterioration of economic conditions in these countries.
Financial Results
Revenue
Primary drivers of net revenue, versus the prior year , were as follows:
Gross revenue decreased 5%, or 4% on a currency-neutral basis, driven by decreased cross-b order volumes reflecting impacts of
the COVID-19 outbreak, partially offset by increases in our value-added products and services and the number of switched
transactions. Gross dollar volume of $6.3 trillion was flat.
Rebates and incentives increased 3%, or 4% on a currency-neutral basis, due to new and renewed deals partially offset by a
favorable mix of volume-based incentives.
Net revenue decreased 9%, or 8% on a currency-neutral basis, including 1 percentage point of growth from our acquisitions.
See Note 3 (Revenue) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for a further discussion of how we
recognize revenue.
The components of net revenue were as follows:
 For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease)
 2020 2019 2018 2020 2019
 ($ in millions)
Domestic assessments $ 6,656 $ 6,781 $ 6,138 (2)% 10%
Cross-border volume fees 3,512 5,606 4,954 (37)% 13%
Transaction processing 8,731 8,469 7,391 3% 15%
Other revenues 4,717 4,124 3,348 14% 23%
Gross revenue 23,616 24,980 21,831 (5)% 14%
Rebates and incentives (contra-revenue) (8,315) (8,097) (6,881) 3% 18%
Net revenue $ 15,301 $ 16,883 $ 14,950 (9)% 13%
48 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following table summarizes the drivers of change in net revenue:
For the Years Ended December 31,
Volume AcquisitionsCurrency
Impact Other Total
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Domestic assessments —% 13% —% —% (3)% (3)% 1 %31 %3(2)% 10 %
Cross-border volume fees (30)% 14% —% —% —% (3)% (7)% 2 % (37)% 13 %
Transaction processing 3% 14% —% —% —% (2)% — % 3 % 3 % 15 %
Other revenues ** ** 3% 2% (1)% (1)% 12 %422 %414 % 23 %
Rebates and incentives (6)%59%5—% —% (2)% (3)% 10 %611 %63 % 18 %
Net revenue (5)% 13% 1% 1% (1)% (3)% (4)% 2 % (9)% 13 %
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding
** Not applicable
Represents the translational and transactional impact of currency.
Includes impact from pricing, other non-volume based fees and geographic mix.
Includesimpact of the allocation of revenue to service deliverables, which are primarily recorded in other revenue when services are performed.
Includes impacts from cyber and intelligence fees, data analytics and consulting fees and other payment-related products and services.
Includes the impact from mix on volume-based incentives.
Includes the impact of new, renewed and expired agreements.
The following tables provide a summary of the trend in volumes and transactions.
For the Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019
Increase/(Decrease)
USD Local USD Local
Mastercard-branded GDV (2)% — % 10 % 13 %
Asia Pacific/Middle East/Africa (3)% (2)% 8 % 12 %
Canada (4)% (3)% 4 % 7 %
Europe (2)% 1 % 12 % 18 %
Latin America (17)% (2)% 9 % 15 %
United States 2 % 2 % 10 % 10 %
Cross-border volume (29)% 16 %
Excludes volume generated by Maestro and Cirrus cards.
For the Years Ended
December 31,
Increase/(Decrease)
2020 2019
Switched transactions 3 % 19 %
No individua l country , other than the United States, generated more than 10% of net revenu e in any such period. A significant
portion of our net revenue is concentrated among our five largest customers. In 2020, the net revenue from these customers was
approximately $3.4 billion, or 22%, of total net revenue. The loss of any of these customers or their significant card programs could
adversely impact our revenue.
Operating Expenses
Operating expenses were flat in 2020 versus the prior year. Adjusted operating expenses decreased 1% on both an as adjusted and
a currency-neutral basis versus the prior year. Current year results include growth of approximately 4 percentage points from
acquisitions. Excluding acquisitions, expenses declined 5% primarily due to reduced spending on advertising  and marketing, travel
and professi onal fees, partially offset by higher personnel and data processing costs to support continued investment in our strategic
initiatives.1 2
1
2
3  
4
5
6
1
1
1
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 49
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The components of operating expenses were as follows:
For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease)
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019
($ in millions)
General and administrative $5,910 $5,763 $5,174 3 % 11 %
Advertising and marketing      657 934 907 (30)% 3 %
Depreciation and amortization 580 522 459 11 % 14 %
Provision for litigation 73 — 1,128 ** **
Total operating expenses            7,220 7,219 7,668 — % (6)%
Special Items (73) — (1,128) ** **
Adjusted operating expenses (excluding Special Items ) $7,147 $7,219 $6,540 (1)% 10 %
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
** Not meaningful
See “Non-GAAP Financial Information” for further information on our non-GAAP adjustments and the reconciliation to GAAP reported amounts.
The following table summarizes the drivers of changes in operating expenses:
For the Years Ended December 31,
OperationalSpecial 
 Items Acquisitions Currency Impact Total
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
General and administrative (1)% 11 % ** ** 4 % 2 % — % (2)% 3 % 11 %
Advertising and marketing (30)% 5 % ** ** — % — % (1)% (2)% (30)% 3 %
Depreciation and amortization 5% 9 % ** ** 6 % 7 % — % (2)% 11 % 14 %
Provision for litigation ** ** ** ** ** ** ** ** ** **
Total operating expenses (5)% 10 % 1 % (16)% 4 % 2 % — % (2)% — % (6)%
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
** Not meaningful
See “Non-GAAP Financial Information” for further information on our non-GAAP adjustments and the reconciliation to GAAP reported amounts.
Represents the translational and transactional impact of currency.
General and Administrative
General and administrative expenses increased 3% on both an as reported and a currency-neutral basis in 2020 versus the prior
year. Current year results include growth of approxim ately 4 percentage points from acquisitions. Excluding acquisitions, expenses
declined 1% primarily due to reduced spending on travel and professional fees, partially offset by an increase in personnel and data
processing costs to support continued investment in our strategic initiatives.1
1
1
1 2
1
2
50 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The components of general and administrative expenses were as follows:
 For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease)
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019
 ($ in millions)
Personnel $3,787 $3,537 $3,214 7% 10%
Professional fees 384 447 377 (14)% 19%
Data processing and telecommunications 756 666 600 14% 11%
Foreign exchange activity 9 32 (36) ** **
Other 974 1,081 1,019 (10)% 6%
Total general and administrative expenses 5,910 5,763 5,174 3% 11%
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
** Not meaningful
Foreign exchange activity includes gains and losses on foreign exchange derivative contracts and the impact of remeasurement of assets and
liabilities denominated in foreign currencies. See Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) to the consolidated financial statements included
in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
Advertising and Marketing
Advertising and marketing expenses decreased 30%, or 29% on a currency-neutral basis in 2020 versus the prior year , primarily due
to lower advertising and sponsorship spend in response to COVID-19.
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization expenses increased 11% on both an as reported and a currency-neutral basis in 2020 versus the
prior year. Current year results include growth of approxim ately 6 percentage points from acquisitions. The remaining increase was
primarily due to higher depreciation from capital investments.
Provision for Litigation
In 2020, we recorded $73 million related to various litigation settlements and legal costs. There were no litigation charges in the prior
year. See Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings) to the consolidated financial statements includ ed in Part II, Item 8 for further
discussion.
Other Income (Expense)
Other incom e (expense) was unfavorable in 2020 versus the prior year primarily due to increased interest expense related to our
recent debt issuances, as well as lower net gains in the current year versus the prior year related to unrealized fair market value
adjustments on marketable and non-marketable equity securities and a decrease in our investment income.
The components of other income (expense) were as follows:
For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease)
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019
($ in millions)
Investment Income $ 24 $ 97 $ 122 (75)% (21)%
Gains (losses) on equity investments, net 30 167 — (82)% **
Interest expense (380) (224) (186) 70 % 20 %
Other income (expense), net 5 27 (14) (81)% **
Total other income (expense) (321) 67 (78) ** **
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
** Not meaningful
Income T axes
The effective  income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 were 17.4% and 16.6%, respectively . The ef fective
income tax rate for 2020 was higher than the prior year , primarily due to discrete tax benefits in 2019, partially of fset by a more1
1
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 51
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
favorable geographic mix of earnings in 2020. The 2019 discrete tax benefits related to a favorable court ruling, a reduction to the
Company’ s transition tax liability and additional foreign tax credits which can be carried back under U.S tax reform transition rules
issued by the Department of the T reasury and the Internal Revenue Service.
The adjusted effective income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 were 17.2% and 17.0%, respectively . The
adjusted effective income tax rate was higher than the prior year, primarily due to a discrete tax benefit related to a favorable court
ruling in 2019.
See Note 20 (Income T axes) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
Liquidity and Capital Resources
We rely on existing liquidity, cash generated from operations and access to capital to fund our global operations, credit and
settlement exposure, capital expenditures, investments in our business and current and poten tial obligations. The following table
summarizes the cash, cash equivalents, investments and credit available to us at December 31:
2020 2019
(in billions)
Cash, cash equivalents and investments $ 10.6 $ 7.7 
Unused line of credit 6.0 6.0 
Investments include available-for-sale securities and held-to-maturity securities. This amount excludes restricted cash and restricted cash
equivalents of $2.3 billion and $2.0 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
We believe that our existing cash, cash equivalents and investment securities balances, our cash flow generating capabilities, and
our access to capital resources are sufficient to satisfy our future operating cash needs, capital asset purchases, outstanding
commitments and other liquidity requirements associated with our existing operations and potential obligations.
Our liquidity and access  to capital could be negatively impacted by global credit market conditio ns. We guarantee the settlement of
many of the transactions between our customers. Historically , payments under these guarantees have not been significant; however ,
historical trends may not be an indication of potential future losses. The risk of loss on these guarantees is specific to individual
customers, but may also be driven by regional or global economic conditions, including, but not limited to the health of the financial
institutions in a country or region. See Note 22 (Settlement and Other Risk Management) to the consolidated financial statements in
Part II, Item 8 for a description of these guarantees.
Our liquidity and access  to capital could also be negatively impacted by the outcome of any of the legal or regulatory proceedings to
which we are a party . For addition al discussion  of these and other risks facing our business, see Part I, Item 1A - Risk Factors -
Legal and Regulatory Risks and Note 21 (Lega l and Regulatory Proceedings) to the consolidated financial statements included in
Part II, Item 8.
Cash Flow
The table below shows a summary of the cash flows from operating, investing and financing activities:
For the Years Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Net cash provided by operating activities $7,224 $8,183 $6,223 
Net cash used in investing activities (1,879) (1,640) (506)
Net cash used in financing activities (2,152) (5,867) (4,966)
Net cash provided by operating activities decreased $1.0 billion in 2020 versus the prior year, primarily due to lower net income
adjusted for non-cash items, partially of fset by a decrease in litigation payments.
Net cash used in investi ng activities increased $239 million in 2020 versus the prior year, primarily due to lower net proceeds from
our investments in available-for-sale and held-to-maturity securities, partially of fset by higher prior year acquisition payments.
Net cash used in financing activities decreased $3.7 billion in 2020 versus the prior year, primar ily due to lower repurchases of our
Class A common stock, higher net debt proceeds in the current period and the repayment of debt that matured in the prior year .1
1
52 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Debt and Credit A vailability
In March 2020, we issued $1 billion principal amount of notes due March 2027, $1.5 billion principal amount of notes due March
2030 and $1.5 billion principal amount notes due March 2050. Our total debt outstandin g was $12.7 billion at December 31, 2020,
with the earliest maturity of $650 million of principal occurring in November 2021.
As of December 31, 2020, we have a commercial paper program (the “Commercial Paper Progra m”), under which we are authorized
to issue up to $6 billion  in outstanding notes, with maturities up to 397 days from the date of issuance. In conjunction with the
Commercial Paper Program, we have a committed unsecured $6 billion revolving credit facility (the “Credit Facility”) which, in 2020,
was extended for an additional year and now expires in November 2025.
Borrowings under the Commercial Paper Program and the Credit Facility are to provide liquid ity for general corporate purposes,
including providing liquidity in the event of one or more settlement failures by our customers. In addition, we may borrow and repay
amounts under these facilities for business continuity purposes. We had no borrowings outstanding under the Commercial Paper
Program or the Credit Facility at December 31, 2020.
See Note 15 (Debt) to the consolidated financ ial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion on our debt, the
Commercial Paper Program and the Credit Facility .
Dividends and Share Repurchases
We have historically paid quarterly dividends on our outstanding Class A common stock and Class B common stock. Subject to
legally availa ble funds, we intend to continue to pay a quarterly cash dividend. The declaration and payment of future dividends is at
the sole discretion of our Board of Directors after taking into account various factors, includin g our financial condition, operating
results, available cash and current and anticipated cash needs.
The following table summarizes the annual, per share dividends paid in the years reflected:
For the Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
(in millions, except per share data)
Cash dividend, per share $ 1.60 $ 1.32 $ 1.00 
Cash dividends paid $ 1,605 $ 1,345 $ 1,044 
On Decemb er 8, 2020, our Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.44 per share paid on February 9, 2021 to
holders of record on January 8, 2021 of our Class A common stock and Class B common stock. The aggregate amount of this
dividend was $439 million.
On February 8, 2021, our Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.44 per share payable on May 7, 2021 to
holders of record on April 9, 2021 of our Class A common stock and Class B common stock. The aggregate amount of this dividend
is estimated to be $437 million.
Repurchased shares of our common stock are considered treasury stock. In Decembe r 2020, 2019 and 2018, our Board of Directors
approved share repurchase programs authorizing us to repurchase up to $6.0 billion, $8.0 billion and $6.5 billion, respectively , of our
Class A common stock. The program  approved in 2020 will become effective after completion of the share repurchase program
authorized in 2019. The timing and actual number of additional shares repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including
cash require ments to meet the operating needs of the business, legal requirements, as well as the share price and economic and
market conditions. The followin g table summarizes our share repurchase activity of our Class A common stock through
December 31, 2020, under the plans approved in 2019 and 2018:
(in millions, except per share
data)
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2019 $ 8,304 
Dollar-value of shares repurchased in 2020 $ 4,473 
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2020 $ 9,831 
Shares repurchased in 2020 14.3 
Average price paid per share in 2020 $ 312.68 
See Note 16 (Stockholders' Equity) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 53
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Critical Accounting Estimates
The application of GAAP  requires us to make estimates and assumptions about certain items and future events that directly affect
our reported financial condition. Our significant accounting policies, including recent accounting pronouncements, are described in
Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting Policies) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
Revenue Recognition - Rebates and Incentives
We enter into business agreements with certain customers that provide for rebates or support when customers meet certain volume
thresholds as well as other support incentives, which are tied to customer performance. We consider  various factors in estimating
customer performance, including forecasted transactions, card issuance and card conversion  volumes, expected payments and
historical experience with that customer . Rebates and incentives are recorded as a reduction to gross revenue based on these
estimates primarily when  volume- and transaction- based revenues are recognized over the contractual term. Differences between
actual results and our estimates are adjusted in the period the customer reports actual performance. If our customers’ actual
performance is not consistent with our estimates of their performance, net revenue may be materially dif ferent.
Loss Contingencies
We are currently involved in various claims and legal proceedings. We regularly review the status of each significa nt matter and
assess its potential financial exposure. If the potential loss from any claim or legal proceeding is considered probable and the
amount can be reasonably estimated, we accrue a liability for the estimated loss. Significant judgment is required in both the
determination of probability and whether an expo sure is reasonably estimable. Our judgments are subjective based on the status of
the legal or regulatory proceedings, the merits of our defenses and consultation with in-house and outside legal counsel. Because of
uncertainties related to these matters, accruals are based only on the best information available at the time. As additional
information becomes available, we reassess the potential liability related to pending claims and litigation and may revise our
estimates. Due to the inherent uncertainties of the legal and regulatory process in the multiple jurisdictions in which we operate, our
judgments may be materially dif ferent than the actual outcomes.
Income T axes
In calculating our effectiv e income tax rate, estimates are required regarding the timing and amount of taxable and deductible items
which will adjust the pretax income earned in various tax jurisdictions. Through our interpretation of local tax regulations,
adjustments to pretax income for income earned in various tax jurisdictions are reflected within various tax filings. Although we
believe that our estimat es and judgments discussed herein are reasonable, actual results may be materially different than the
estimated amounts.
We record a valuation allowance to reduce our deferred tax assets to the amount that is more likely than not to be realized.
Significant judgment is required in determining the valuation allowance. In assessing the need for a valuation allowance, we consider
all sources of taxable income including, projected future taxable income, reversing taxable temporary differences and ongoing tax
planning strategies. If it is determ ined that we are able to realize deferred tax assets in excess of the net carrying value or to the
extent we are unable to realize a deferred tax asset, we would adjust the valuation allowan ce in the period in which such a
determination is made, with a corresponding increase or decrease to earnings.
We record tax liabilities  for uncertain tax positions taken, or expected to be taken, which may not be sustained or may only be
partially sustained, upon examination by the relevant taxing authorities. We consider all relevant  facts and current authorities in the
tax law in assessing whether any benefit resulti ng from an uncertain tax position is more likely than not to be sustained and, if so,
how current law impacts the amount reflected within these financial statements. If upon examination, we realize a tax benefit which
is not fully sustained or is more favorably sustained, this would decrease or increase earnings in the period. In certain situations, we
will have of fsetting tax credits or taxes in other jurisdictions.
Deferred taxes are established on the estimated foreign exchange gains or losses for foreign earnings that are not considered
permanently reinvested,  which will be recognized through cumulative translation adjustments as incurred. Ultimately , the working
capital requirements of foreign af filiates will determine the amount of cash to be remitted from respective jurisdictions.
Business Combinations
We account for our business combinations using the acquisition method of accounting. The acquisition purchase price, including
contingent consideration, is allocated to the underlying identified, tangible and intangible assets, liabilities assumed and any non-
controlling interest in the acquiree, based on their respective estimated fair values on the acquisition date. Any excess of purchase
price over the fair value of net assets acquired, including identifiable intangible assets, is recorded as goodwill. The amounts and
useful lives assigned to acquisition-related tangible and intangible assets impact the amount and timing of future amortization
54 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
expense. We use various valuation techniques to determine fair value, primarily discounted cash flows analysis, relief-from-royalty
and multi-period excess earnings for estimating  the value of intangible assets. These valuation techniques included comparable
company multiples, discount rates, growth projections and other assumptions of future business conditions. Determining the fair
value of assets acquired, liabilities assumed, any non-controlling interest in the acquiree and the expected useful lives, requires
management’ s judgment. The significa nce of management’ s estimates and assumptions is relative to the size of the acquisition. Our
estimates are based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable, but which are inherently uncertain and unpredictable.
Item 7A. Quantitative and qualitative disclosures about market risk
Market risk is the potent ial for economic losses to be incurred on market risk sensitive instruments arising from adverse changes in
factors such as interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. Our exposur e to market risk from changes in interest rates and
foreign exch ange rates is limited. Management monitors risk exposures on an ongoing basis and establishes and oversees the
implementation of policies governing our funding, investments and use of derivative financial instruments to manage these risks.
Foreign currency and interest rate exposures are managed through our risk management activities, which are discussed further in
Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
Foreign Exchange Risk
We enter into foreign exchange derivative contracts to manage currency exposure associated with anticipated receipts and
disbursements occurring in a currency other than the functional currency of the entity . We may also enter into foreign currency
derivative contracts to offset possible changes in value of assets and liabilities due to foreign exchange fluctuations. The objective of
these activiti es is to reduce our exposure to transaction gains and losses resulting from fluctuations of foreign currencies against our
functional and reporting currencies, principally the U.S. dollar and euro. The effect of a hypothetical 10% adverse chan ge in the
value of the functional currencies could result in a fair value loss of approximately $58 million and $144 million on our foreign
exchange derivative contracts outstanding at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively , before considering the offsetting effect of
the underlying hedged activity .
We are also subject to foreign exchange risk as part of our daily settlement activities. To manage this risk, we enter into short
duration foreign exchange contracts based upon  anticipated receipts and disbursements for the respective currency position. This
risk is typically limited to a few days between when a payment transaction takes place and the subsequent settlement with our
customers. The effect of a hypothetical 10% adverse change  in the value of the functional currencies could result in a fair value loss
of approximately $23 million on our short duration foreign exchange derivative contracts outsta nding at December 31, 2020. The
Company did not have any outstanding short duration foreign exchange derivative contracts related to this activity at December 31,
2019.
Interest Rate Risk
Our availabl e-for-sale debt investments include fixed and variable rate securities that are sensitive to interest rate fluctuations. Our
policy is to invest in high quality securities, while providing adequate liquidity and maintaining diversification to avoid significant
exposure. A hypothetic al 100 basis point adverse change in interest rates would not have a material impact to the fair value of our
investments at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 55
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Item 8. Financial statements and supplementary data
Mastercard Incorporated
Index to consolidated financial statements
Page
  As of December 31, 2020 and 2019 and for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018
Management’ s report on internal control over financial reporting 57
Report of independent registered public accounting firm 58
Consolidated Statement of Operations 60
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income 61
Consolidated Balance Sheet 62
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity 63
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows 65
Notes to consolidated financial statements 66
56 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Management’ s report on internal control over financial reporting
The manage ment of Mastercard Incorporated (“Mastercard”) is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal
control over financial reporting. Internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external reporting purposes in
accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Because of its inherent limitations,
internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. As required by Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxl ey
Act of 2002, management has assessed the effectiveness of Mastercard’ s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2020. In making its assessment, management has utilized the criteria set forth in Internal Control  - Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Com mission (COSO). Management has
concluded that, based on its assessment, Mast ercard’ s internal control over financial reporting  was effective as of December 31,
2020. The effectiveness of Mastercard’ s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020 has been audited by
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, as stated in their report which appears on the next
page.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 57
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Mastercard Incorporated
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Mastercard Incorporated and its subsidiaries (the “Company”)
as of Decem ber 31, 2020 and 2019 and the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, changes in
equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, including the related notes (collectively
referred to as the “conso lidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting
as of Decem ber 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framewo rk (2013) issued by the Committee
of Sponsoring Organizations of the T readway Commission (COSO).
In our opinio n, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all mater ial respects, the financial position of
the Compan y as of Dece mber 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2020 in conform ity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’ s management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the
accompanying Managem ent’s Report on interna l control over financial reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions on the
Company’ s consolidated financial statements and on the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting based on our audits. We
are a public accounting  firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board  (United States) (PCAOB) and are
required to be independe nt with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules
and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reason able assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud, and whether ef fective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial stateme nts included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included  evaluating the account ing principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessin g the risk that a material weakness
exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits
also included performing such other procedure s as we considered necessary in the circumst ances. We believe that our audits
provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’ s internal control over financial repor ting is a process designed to provide reasonabl e assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’ s internal control over financial repor ting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain to
the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made  only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’ s assets that
could have a material ef fect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections
of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes
in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
58 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matte r communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that was communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relates to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consoli dated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below , providing a separate opinion on the
critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Revenue Recognition - Rebates and Incentives
As described in Notes 1 and 3 to the consolida ted financial statements, the Company provides  certain customers with rebates or
incentives which totaled  $8.3 billion for the year ended December 31, 2020. The Company has busin ess agreements with certain
customers that provide for rebates or other support when customers meet certain volume hurdles as well as other support
incentives, which are tied to performance. Rebates and incentives are recorded as a reduction of gross revenue primarily when
volume- and transaction-based revenues are recognized over the contractual term. Rebates and incentives are calculated based
upon estimated customer performance and the terms of the related business agreements. As disclosed by management, various
factors are considered in estimating customer performance, including forecasted transactions, card issuance and card conversion
volumes, expected payments and historical experience with that customer .
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to rebat es and incentives is a critical audit
matter are (i) the significant judgment by management when developing estimates related to rebates and incentives based on
customer performance; and (ii) a high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity and effort in performing procedures and evaluating
management’ s estimate s related to customer  performance, including the reasonableness of the various applicable factors
considered by management in the estimate.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall opinion
on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effective ness of controls relating to rebates and
incentives, including controls over evaluating estimated customer performance. These procedures also included, among others,
evaluating the reasonab leness of estimated customer performance for a sample of customer agreements, including (i) evaluating
rebate and incentive contracts to identify whether all incentives are identified and recorded accurately; (ii) testing management’ s
process for developing estimated customer performance, including evaluating the reasonableness of the various applicable factors
considered by managem ent; and (iii) evaluating estimated customer performance as compared to actual results in the period the
customer reports actual performance.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
New Y ork, New Y ork
February 12, 2021
We have served as the Company’ s auditor since 1989.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 59
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Operations
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018
 (in millions, except per share data)
Net Revenue $ 15,301  $ 16,883  $ 14,950  
Operating Expenses
General and administrative 5,910  5,763  5,174  
Advertising and marketing 657 934 907 
Depreciation and amortization 580 522 459 
Provision for litigation 73 — 1,128  
Total operating expenses 7,220  7,219  7,668  
Operating income 8,081  9,664  7,282  
Other Income (Expense)
Investment income 24 97 122 
Gains (losses) on equity investments, net 30 167 — 
Interest expense (380) (224) (186)
Other income (expense), net 5 27 (14)
Total other income (expense) (321) 67 (78)
Income before income taxes 7,760  9,731  7,204  
Income tax expense 1,349  1,613  1,345  
Net Income $ 6,411  $ 8,118  $ 5,859  
Basic Earnings per Share $ 6.40 $ 7.98 $ 5.63 
Basic weighted-average shares outstanding 1,002  1,017  1,041  
Diluted Earnings per Share $ 6.37 $ 7.94 $ 5.60 
Diluted weighted-average shares outstanding 1,006  1,022  1,047  
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
60 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Net Income $6,411  $8,118  $5,859  
Other comprehensive income (loss):
Foreign currency translation adjustments 345 10 (319)
Income tax ef fect (59) 13 40 
Foreign currency translation adjustments, net of income tax ef fect 286 23 (279)
Translation adjustments on net investment hedge (177) 36 96 
Income tax ef fect 40 (8) (21)
Translation adjustments on net investment hedge, net of income tax ef fect (137) 28 75 
Cash flow hedges (189) 14 — 
Income tax ef fect 42 (3) — 
Reclassification adjustment for cash flow hedges 4 — — 
Income tax ef fect (1) — — 
Cash flow hedges, net of income tax ef fect (144) 11 — 
Defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans (12) (21) (16)
Income tax ef fect 2 3 3 
Reclassification adjustment for defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans (1) (1) (2)
Income tax ef fect — — — 
Defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans, net of income tax ef fect (11) (19) (15)
Investment securities available-for-sale (1) 3 (3)
Income tax ef fect — (1) 1 
Investment securities available-for-sale, net of income tax ef fect (1) 2 (2)
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of income tax ef fect (7) 45 (221)
Comprehensive Income $6,404  $8,163  $5,638  
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 61
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Balance Sheet
December 31,
2020 2019
(in millions, except per share data)
Assets
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 10,113  $ 6,988  
Restricted cash for litigation settlement 586 584 
Investments 483 688 
Accounts receivable 2,646  2,514  
Settlement due from customers 1,706  2,995  
Restricted security deposits held for customers 1,696  1,370  
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 1,883  1,763  
Total current assets 19,113  16,902  
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net 1,902  1,828  
Deferred income taxes 491 543 
Goodwill 4,960  4,021  
Other intangible assets, net 1,753  1,417  
Other assets 5,365  4,525  
Total Assets $ 33,584  $ 29,236  
Liabilities, Redeemable Non-controlling Interests and Equity
Current liabilities:
Accounts payable $ 527 $ 489 
Settlement due to customers 1,475  2,714  
Restricted security deposits held for customers 1,696  1,370  
Accrued litigation 842 914 
Accrued expenses 5,430  5,489  
Current portion of long-term debt 649 — 
Other current liabilities 1,228  928 
Total current liabilities 11,847  11,904  
Long-term debt 12,023  8,527  
Deferred income taxes 86 85 
Other liabilities 3,111  2,729  
Total Liabilities 27,067  23,245  
Commitments and Contingencies
Redeemable Non-controlling Interests 29 74 
Stockholders’ Equity
Class A common stock, $ 0.0001  par value; authorized 3,000  shares, 1,396  and 1,391
shares issued and 987 and 996 shares outstanding, respectively — — 
Class B common stock, $ 0.0001  par value; authorized 1,200  shares, 8 and 11 shares
issued and outstanding, respectively — — 
Additional paid-in-capital 4,982  4,787  
Class A treasury stock, at cost, 409 and 395 shares, respectively (36,658 ) (32,205 )
Retained earnings 38,747  33,984  
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) (680) (673)
Mastercard Incorporated Stockholders' Equity 6,391  5,893  
Non-controlling interests 97 24 
Total Equity 6,488  5,917  
Total Liabilities, Redeemable Non-controlling Interests and Equity $ 33,584  $ 29,236  
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
62 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity
Stockholders’ Equity
  
Common StockAdditional
 Paid-In
 CapitalClass A
 Treasury
 StockRetained
 EarningsAccumulated
 Other
 Comprehensive
 Income (Loss)Mastercard
Incorporated
Stockholders'
EquityNon-
 Controlling
 InterestsTotal
 Equity  Class AClass B
 (in millions, except per share data)
Balance at
December 31,
2017 $ — $ — $4,365  $(20,764 )$22,364  $ (497)$ 5,468  $ 29 $5,497  
Adoption of
revenue standard — — — — 366 — 366 — 366 
Adoption of intra-
entity asset
transfers
standard — — — — (183) — (183) — (183)
Net income — — — — 5,859  — 5,859  — 5,859  
Activity related to
non-controlling
interests — — — — — — — (6) (6)
Redeemable non-
controlling
interest
adjustments — — — — (3) — (3) — (3)
Other
comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — (221) (221) — (221)
Dividends — — — — (1,120 ) — (1,120 ) — (1,120 )
Purchases of
treasury stock — — — (4,991 ) — — (4,991 ) — (4,991 )
Share-based
payments — — 215 5 — — 220 — 220 
Balance at
December 31,
2018 — — 4,580  (25,750 )27,283  (718) 5,395  23 5,418  
Net income — — — — 8,118  — 8,118  — 8,118  
Activity related to
non-controlling
interests — — — — — — — 1 1 
Redeemable non-
controlling
interest
adjustments — — — — (9) — (9) — (9)
Other
comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — 45 45 — 45 
Dividends — — — — (1,408 ) — (1,408 ) — (1,408 )
Purchases of
treasury stock — — — (6,463 ) — — (6,463 ) — (6,463 )
Share-based
payments — — 207 8 — — 215 — 215 
Balance at
December 31,
2019 — — 4,787  (32,205 )33,984  (673) 5,893  24 5,917  
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 63
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity (Continued)
Stockholders’ Equity
  
 Common StockAdditional
 Paid-In
 CapitalClass A
 Treasury
 StockRetained
 EarningsAccumulated
 Other
 Comprehensive
 Income (Loss)Mastercard
Incorporated
Stockholders'
EquityNon-
 Controlling
 InterestsTotal
 Equity  Class AClass B
 (in millions, except per share data)
Balance at
December 31,
2019 — — 4,787  (32,205 )33,984  (673) 5,893  24 5,917  
Net income — — — — 6,411  — 6,411  — 6,411  
Activity related to
non-controlling
interests — — — — — — — 73 73 
Redeemable non-
controlling
interest
adjustments — — — — (7) — (7) — (7)
Other
comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — (7) (7) — (7)
Dividends — — — — (1,641 ) — (1,641 ) — (1,641 )
Purchases of
treasury stock — — — (4,459 ) — — (4,459 ) — (4,459 )
Share-based
payments — — 195 6 — — 201 — 201 
Balance at
December 31,
2020 $ — $ — $4,982  $(36,658 )$38,747  $ (680)$ 6,391  $ 97 $6,488  
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
64 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Operating Activities
Net income $ 6,411 $ 8,118 $ 5,859 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Amortization of customer and merchant incentives 1,072 1,141 1,235 
Depreciation and amortization 580 522 459 
(Gains) losses on equity investments, net (30) (167) — 
Share-based compensation 254 250 196 
Deferred income taxes 73 (7) (244)
Other 14 24 31 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Accounts receivable (86) (246) (317)
Income taxes receivable (2) (202) (120)
Settlement due from customers 1,288 (444) (1,078)
Prepaid expenses (1,552) (1,661) (1,769)
Accrued litigation and legal settlements (73) (662) 869 
Restricted security deposits held for customers 326 290 (6)
Accounts payable 26 (42) 101 
Settlement due to customers (1,242) 477 849 
Accrued expenses (114) 657 439 
Long-term taxes payable (37) 2 (20)
Net change in other assets and liabilities 316 133 (261)
Net cash provided by operating activities 7,224 8,183 6,223 
Investing Activities
Purchases of investment securities available-for-sale (220) (643) (1,300)
Purchases of investments held-to-maturity (198) (215) (509)
Proceeds from sales of investment securities available-for-sale 361 1,098 604 
Proceeds from maturities of investment securities available-for-sale 140 376 379 
Proceeds from maturities of investments held-to-maturity 121 383 929 
Purchases of property and equipment (339) (422) (330)
Capitalized software (369) (306) (174)
Purchases of equity investments (214) (467) (91)
Acquisition of businesses, net of cash acquired (989) (1,440) — 
Settlement of interest rate derivative contracts (175) — — 
Other investing activities 3 (4) (14)
Net cash used in investing activities (1,879) (1,640) (506)
Financing Activities
Purchases of treasury stock (4,473) (6,497) (4,933)
Dividends paid (1,605) (1,345) (1,044)
Proceeds from debt, net 3,959 2,724 991 
Payment of debt — (500) — 
Acquisition of redeemable non-controlling interests (49) — — 
Contingent consideration paid — (199) — 
Tax withholdings related to share-based payments (150) (161) (80)
Cash proceeds from exercise of stock options 97 126 104 
Other financing activities 69 (15) (4)
Net cash used in financing activities (2,152) (5,867) (4,966)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash
equivalents 257 (44) (6)
Net increase in cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents 3,450 632 745 
Cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents - beginning of period 8,969 8,337 7,592 
Cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents - end of period $12,419 $ 8,969 $ 8,337 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 65
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 1. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Organization
Mastercard Incorporated and its consolidated subsidiaries, including Mastercard International Incorporated (“Mastercard
International” and together with Mastercard Incorporated, “Mastercard” or the “Company”), is a technology company in the global
payments industry that connects consumers, financial institutions, merchants, governments, digital partners, businesses and other
organizations worldwide, enabling them to use electronic forms of payment instead of cash and checks. The Company makes
payments easier and more efficient by providing a wide range of payment solutions and servic es through its family of well-known
brands, including Maste rcard®, Maestro® and Cirrus®. The Compa ny operates  a multi-rail network that offers customers one
partner to turn to for their domestic and cross-border payment needs. Through its unique and proprietary global payme nts network,
which is referred to as the core network, the Company switches (authorizes, clears and settles)  payment transactions and delivers
related products and services. Mastercard has additional payment capabilities  that include automated clearing house (“ACH”)
transactions (both batch and real-time account-based payments). The Compan y also provides integrated value-ad ded offerings such
as cyber and intelligence products, information and analytics services, consulting, loyalty and reward programs, processing and
open banking. The Compa ny’s payment solutions offer custom ers choice and flexibility and are designed to ensure safety and
security for the global payments system.
A typical transaction on the Company’ s core network involves four participants in addition to the Company: account holder (a person
or entity who holds a card or uses another device enabled for payment), issuer (the account holder’s financial institution), merchant
and acquirer (the merch ant’s financial institution). The Company does not issue cards, extend credit, determine or receive revenue
from interest rates or other fees charged to account holders by issuers, or establish the rates charged by acquirers in connection
with merchants’ acceptance of the Company’ s products. In most cases, account holder relationships belong to, and are managed by,
the Company’ s financial institution customers.
Significant Accounting Policies
Consolidation and basis of presentation  - The consolidated finan cial statements include the accounts of Mastercard and its majority-
owned and controlled entities, including any variable interest entities (“VIEs”) for which the Company is the primary beneficiary .
Investments in VIEs for which the Company is not considered the primary beneficiary are not consolidated and are accounted for as
equity metho d or measurement alternative method investments and recorded in other assets on the consolidated balance sheet.  At
December 31, 2020 and 2019, there were no significant VIEs which required consolidation and the investments were not considered
material to the consolidated financial statements. The Company consolidates acquisitions as of the date in which the Company has
obtained a controlling financial interest. Intercompany transactio ns and balances have  been eliminated in consolidation. The
Company follows accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (“GAAP”).
Non-controlling interests represent the equity interest not owned by the Company and are record ed for consolidated entities in which
the Company owns less than 100% of the interests. Changes in a parent’ s ownership interest while the parent retains its controlling
interest are accounted for as equity transactions, and upon loss of control, retained ownership interests are remeasured at fair value,
with any gain or loss recognized in earnings. For 2020, 2019 and 2018, net losses from non-controlling interests were not material
and, as a result, amounts are included on the consolidated statement of operations within other income (expense).
Use of estimates  - The preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires management to make estimates and
assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of
the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting periods. Future events and their
effects cann ot be predicted with certainty , including the potential impacts and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as other
factors; accordingly , accounting estimates require the exercise of judgment. These finan cial statements were prepared using
information reasonably available as of December 31, 2020 and through the date of this Report. The accounting estimates used in
the preparation of the Company’ s consolidated  financial statements may change as new events occur , as more experience is
acquired, as additional information is obtained and as the Company’ s operating environment changes. Actual results may differ from
these estimates.
Revenue recognition  - Revenue is recognize d to depict the transfer of promised goods or services to customers in an amount that
reflects the consideration to which the Company expects to be entitled to in exchange for those goods or services. Revenue is
primarily generated from assessing customers based on the dollar volume of activity , or gross dollar volume, on the products that
carry the Company’ s brands, from fees to issuer s, acquirers and other stakeholders for providing switching services, as well as from
value-added products and services that are typically integrated and sold with the Company’ s payment of ferings.
66 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Volume-based revenue (domestic assessments  and cross-border volume fees) is recorded as revenue in the period it is earned,
which is primarily based on the related volume generated on the cards. Certain volume-based revenue is based upon information
reported by customers. Transaction-based revenue (transaction processing) is primarily based on the number and type of
transactions and is recognized as revenue in the same period in which the related transactions occur . Other payment-related
products and services are recognized as revenue in the period in which the related services are performed or transactions occur . For
services provided to customers where delivery involves the use of a third-party , the Company recognizes revenue on a gross basis if
it acts as the principal, controlling the service to the customer and on a net basis if it acts as the agent, arranging for the service to
be provided.
Mastercard has business agreements with certa in customers that provide for rebates or other support when the customers meet
certain volum e hurdles as well as other support incentives, which are tied to performance. Rebates and incentives are recorded as a
reduction of gross revenue primarily when volume- and transaction-based revenues are recognized over the contractual term.
Rebates and incentives are calculated based upon estimated customer performance and the terms of the related business
agreements. In addition, Mastercard may make payments to a customer directly related to entering into an agreement, which are
generally capitalized and amortized over the life of the agreement on a straight-line basis.
Contract assets include unbilled consideration typically resulting from executed data analytic and consulting services performed for
customers in connection with Mastercard’ s payment network service arrangements. Collection for these services typically occurs
over the contractual term. Contract assets are included in prepaid expenses and other current assets and other assets  on the
consolidated balance sheet.
The Company defers the recognition of revenue when consideration has been received prior to the satisfaction of performance
obligations. As these performance obligations are satisfied, revenue is subsequently recognized. Deferred revenue is primarily
derived from data analyt ic and consulting service s. Deferred revenue is included in other current liabilities and other liabilities on the
consolidated balance sheet.
Business combinations  - The Com pany accou nts for business combinations under the acquisition method of accounting. The
Company measures the tangible and intangible identifiable assets acquired, liabilities assumed, any non-controlling interest in the
acquiree and contingent consideration at fair value as of the acquisition date. Acquisition-related costs are expensed as incurred and
are included  in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operation s. Any excess purchase price over
the fair value of net assets acquired, including identifiable intangible assets, is recorded as goodwill. Measurement period
adjustments, if any, to the preliminary estimated fair value of the intangibles assets as of the acquisition date are recorded in
goodwill.
Goodwill and other intangible assets  - Indefinite-lived intangible assets consist of goodwill, which represents the synergies expected
to arise after the acquisition date and the assembled workforce, and customer relationships. Finite-lived intangible assets consist of
capitalized software costs, customer relationship s and other intangible assets. Intangible assets with finite useful lives are amortized
over their estimated useful lives, on a straight-line basis, which range from one to twenty years . Capitalized software includes
internal and external costs incurred directly related to the design, development and testing phases of each capitalized software
project.
Impairment of assets - Good will and indefinite -lived intangible assets are not amortized but tested annually for impairment at the
reporting unit level in the fourth quarter , or sooner when circumstances indicate an impairment may exist. The impairment evaluation
for goodwill utilizes a qualitative assessment to determine whether it is more likely than not that goodwill is impaired. The qualitative
factors may include, but are not limited to, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market conditions, operating environment,
financial performance and other relevant events . If it is determined that it is more likely than not that goodwill is impaired, then the
Company is required to perform a quantitative goodwill impairment test. If the fair value of a reporting unit exceeds the carrying
value, goodwill is not impaired. If the fair value of the reporting unit is less than its carrying value, then goodwill is impaired and the
excess of the reporting unit’ s carrying value over the fair value is recognized as an impairment charge.
The impairment test for indefinite-lived intangible assets consists of a qualitative assessment to evaluate relevant events and
circumstances that could affect the significant inputs used to determine the fair value of indefinite-lived intangible assets. If the
qualitative assessment indicates that it is more likely than not that indefinite-lived intangible assets are impaired, then a quantitative
assessment is required. 
Long-lived assets, other than goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets, are tested for impairment whenever events or
circumstances indicate that their carrying amou nt may not be recoverable. If the carrying value of the asset cannot be recovered
from estimated future cash flows, undiscounted and without interest, the fair value of the asset is calculated using the present value
of estimated net future cash flows. If the carrying amount of the asset exceeds its fair value, an impairment is recorded.
Impairment charges, if any , are recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 67
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Litigation  - The Comp any is a party to certain legal and regulatory proceedings with respect to a variety of matters. The Company
evaluates the likelihood of an unfavorable outcome of all legal or regulatory proceedings to which it is a party and accrues a loss
contingency when the loss is probable and reasonably estimable. Loss conting encies are recorded in provision for litigation on the
consolidated statement of operations. These judgm ents are subjective based on the status of the legal or regulatory proceedings,
the merits of its defenses and consultation with in-house and external legal counsel. Legal costs are expensed as incurred and
recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations.
Settlement and other risk management  - Masterca rd’s rules guarantee the settlement of many of the transactions between its
customers. Settlement exposure is the outstanding settlement risk to customers under Mastercard’ s rules due to the difference in
timing between the payment transaction date and subsequent settlement. While the term and amount of the guarantee are unlimited,
the duration of settlement exposure is short term and typically limited to a few days.
The Compan y also enters into agreements in the ordinary course of business under which the Company agrees to indemnify third
parties again st damages , losses and expenses incurred in connection with legal and other proce edings arising from relationships or
transactions with the Company . As the extent of the Company’ s obligations under these agreements depends entirely upon the
occurrence of future events, the Company’ s potential future liability under these agreements is not determinable.
The Compan y accounts  for each of its guarantees by recording the guarantee at its fair value at the inception or modification date
through earnings.
Income taxes  - The Comp any follows an asset and liability based approach in accounting for income taxes as required under GAAP .
Deferred income tax assets and liabilities are recorded to reflect the tax consequences on future years of temporary differences
between the financial statement carrying amounts and income tax bases of assets and liabilities. Deferred income taxes are
displayed separately as noncurrent assets and liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet. Valuation allowances are provided
against asse ts which are not more likely than not to be realized. The Company recognizes all material tax positions, including
uncertain tax positions in which it is more likely than not that the position will be sustained based on its technical merits and if
challenged by the relevant taxing authorities. At each balance sheet date, unresolved uncertain tax positions are reassessed to
determine whether subs equent developments require a change in the amount of recognized tax benefit. The allowance for uncer tain
tax positions  is recorded in other current and noncurrent liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet. The Company records interest
expense related to income tax matters as interest expense on the consolidated statement of operations. The Company includes
penalties related to income tax matters in the income tax provision.
Cash and cash equivale nts - Cash and cash equivalents include certain investments with daily liquidity and with an original maturity
of three months or less from the date of purchase. Cash equivalents are recorded at cost, which approximates fair value.
Restricted cash  - The Company classifies cash and cash equivalents as restricted when it is unavailable for withdrawal or use in its
general operations. The Company has the following types of restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents which are included in
the reconciliation of beginning-of-period and end-of-period amounts shown on the consolidated statement of cash flows:
•Restricted cash for litigation settlement  - The Company has restricted cash for litigation within a qualified settlement fund related
to the settle ment agreem ent for the U.S. merchant class litigation. The funds continue to be restricted for paymen ts until the
litigation matter is resolved.
•Restricted security deposits held for customers  - The Company require s collateral from certain  customers for settlement of their
transactions. The majority  of collateral for settlement is in the form of standby letters of credit and bank guarantees which are not
recorded on the consolidated balance sheet. Additionally , the Company holds cash deposits and certificates of deposit from
certain customers as collateral for settlement of their transactions, which are recorded as asse ts on the consolidated balance
sheet. These assets are fully offset by corresponding liabilities included on the consolidated balanc e sheet. These security
deposits are typically held for the duration of the agreement with the customers.
•Other restricted cash balances  - The Company has other restricted cash balances which include contractually restricted deposits,
as well as cash balance s that are restricted based on the Company’ s intention with regard to usage. These funds  are classified
on the consolidated balance sheet within prepaid expenses and other current assets and other assets.
Fair value  - The Company measures certain financial assets and liabilities at fair value on a recurring basis by estimating the price
that would be received upon the sale of an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants.
The Company classifies these recurring fair value measurements into a three-level hierarchy (“V aluation Hierarchy”).
The V aluation Hierarchy is based upon the transparency of inputs to the valuation of an asset or liability as of the measurement date.
A financial instrument’ s categorization within the Valuation Hierarchy is based upon the lowest level of input that is significant to the
fair value measurement. The three levels of the V aluation Hierarchy are as follows: 
•Level 1 - inputs to the valuation methodology are quoted prices (unadjusted) for identical assets or liabilities in active markets
68 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
•Level 2 - inputs to the valuation methodology include quoted prices for similar assets and liabilities in active markets, quoted
prices for identical or similar assets and liabilities in inactive markets and inputs that are observable for the asset or liability
•Level 3 - inputs to the valuation methodology are unobservable and cannot be directly corroborated by observable market data
Certain assets are meas ured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis. The Company’ s non-financial assets measured at fair value on a
nonrecurring basis include property , equipment  and right-of-use assets, goodwill and other intangible assets. These assets are
subject to fair value adjustments in certain circumstances, such as when there is evidence of impairment.
The valuatio n methods for goodwill and other intangible assets acquired in business combinations involve assumptions concerning
comparable company multiples, discount rates , growth projections and other assumptions of future business conditions. The
Company uses various valuation techniques to determine fair value, primarily discounted cash flows analysis, relief-from-royalty , and
multi-period excess earnings for estimating the fair value of its intangible assets. As the assumptions employed to measure these
assets are based on management’ s judgment using internal and external data, these fair value determinations are classified in Level
3 of the V aluation Hierarchy .
Contingent consideration  - Certain business comb inations involve the potential for future payment of consideration that is contingent
upon the achievement of performance milestones. These liabilities are classified within Level 3 of the Valuation Hierarchy as the
inputs used  to measure fair value are unobservable and require management’ s judgment. The fair value of the contingent
consideration at the acquisition date and subsequent periods is determined utilizing an income approach based on a Monte Carlo
technique and is recorded in other current liabilities and other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet. Changes to projected
performance milestones of the acquired businesses could result in a higher or lower contingent consideration liability . The changes
in fair value as a result of updated assumptions are recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement
of operations.
Investment securities  - The Company classifies investments as available-for-sale or held-to-maturity at the date of acquisition.
•Available-for-sale debt securities:
◦Investments in debt securities that are available to meet the Company’ s current operational needs are classified as current
assets and the securitie s that are not available for current operational needs are classified as non-current assets on the
consolidated balance sheet.
The debt securities are carried at fair value, with unrealized gains and losses, net of tax, recorded as a separate component
of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) on the consolidated statement of comprehensive income. Net realized
gains and losses on debt securities are recogniz ed in investment income on the consolidated statement of operations. The
specific identification method is used to determine realized gains and losses.
The Company evaluates its debt securities for impairment on an ongoing basis. When there has been a decline in fair value
of a debt security below  the amortized cost basis, the Company recognizes an impairment if: (1) it has the intent to sell the
security; (2) it is more likely than not that it will be required to sell the security before recovery of the amortized cost basis; or
(3) it does not expect to recover the entire amortized cost basis of the security . The credit loss compone nt of the impairment
is recognized as an allowance and recorded in other income (expense), net on the consolidat ed statement of operations
while the non-credit related loss remains in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) until realized from a sale or
subsequent impairment.
•Held-to-maturity securities:
◦Time deposits - The Company classifies time deposits with original maturities greater than three months as held-to-maturity .
Held-to-maturity securit ies that mature within one year are classified as current assets within investments on the
consolidated balance sheet while held-to-maturity securities with maturities of greater than one year are classified as non-
current assets. Time deposi ts are carried at amortized cost on the consolidated balance sheet and are intended to be held
until maturity .
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 69
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Equity investments - The Company holds equity securities of publicly traded and privately held companies.
•Marketable equity securities - Marketable equity securities are strategic investments in publicly traded companies and are
measured at fair value using quoted prices in their respective active markets with changes recorded through gain (losses) on
equity inves tments, net on the consolidated statement of operations. Securities that are not for use in current operations are
classified in other assets on the consolidated balance sheet.
•Nonmarketable equity investments - The Company’ s nonmarketable equity investments, which are reported in other assets on
the consolidated balance sheet, include investm ents in privately held companies without readily determinable market values.
The Company uses discounted cash flows and market assumptions to estimate the fair value of its nonmarketable equity
investments when certain events or circumstances indicate that impairment may exist. The Company’ s nonmarketable equity
investments are accounted for under the equity method or measurement alternative method.
◦Equity method - The Company accounts for investments in common stock or in-substance common stock under the equity
method of accounting when it has the ability to exercise significant influence over the investee, generally when it holds
between 20% and 50% ownership in the entity . The excess of the cost over the underlying net equity of investments
accounted for under the equity method is allocated to identifiable tangible and intangible assets and liabilities based on fair
values at the date of acquisition. The amortization of the excess of the cost over the underlying net equity of investments and
Mastercard’ s share of net earnings or losses of entities accounted for under the equity method of accounting is included in
other income  (expense), net on the consolidated statement of operations. In addition, investments in flow-through entities
such as limited partner ships and limited liabilit y companies are also accounted for under the equity method when the
Company has the ability to exercise significant influence over the investee, generally when the investment ownership
percentage is equal to or greater than 5% of the outstanding ownership interest. The Company’ s share of net earnings or
losses for these investments are included in gains (losses) on equity investments, net on the consolidated statement of
operations.
◦Measurement alternative  method - The Company accounts for investments in common stock or in-substance common stock
under the measurement alternative method of accounting when it does not exercise significant influence, generally when it
holds less than 20% ownership in the entity or when the interest in a limited partnership or limited liability company is less
than 5% and the Company has no significant influenc e over the operation of the investee. Investments in companies that
Mastercard does not control, but that are not in the form of common stock or in-substance common stock, are also
accounted for under the measurement altern ative method of accounting. Measurement alternativ e investments are
measured at cost, less any impairment and adjusted for changes resulting from observable price changes in orderly
transactions for identical or similar investments  of the same issuer . Fair value adjustments, as well as impairments, are
included in gain (losses) on equity investments, net on the consolidated statement of operations.
Derivative and hedging instruments  - The Company’ s deriva tive financial instruments are recorded as either assets or liabilities on
the balance sheet and measured at fair value. The Compan y’s foreign exchange and interest rate derivative contracts are included
in Level 2 of the Valuatio n Hierarchy as the fair value of the contracts are based on inputs, which are observable based on broker
quotes for the same or similar instruments. The Company does not enter into derivative contracts for trading or speculative
purposes. For derivative contracts that are not designated as hedging instruments, realized and unrealized gains and losses from
the change in fair value of the contracts are recognized in current earnings.
The Company’ s derivatives that are designated as hedging instruments are required to meet established accounting criteria. In
addition, an effectiveness assessment is required to demonstrate that the derivative is expected to be highly effective at offsetting
changes in fair value or cash flows of the underlying exposure both at inception of the hedging relationship and on an ongoing basis.
The method of assessing hedge effectiveness and measuring hedge results is formally documented at hedge inception and
assessed at least quarterly throughout the desig nated hedge period. For cash flow hedges, the fair value adjustments  are recorded,
net of tax, in other comprehensive income (loss ) on the consolidated statement of comprehensive income. Any gains and losses
deferred in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) are subsequently reclassified to the corresponding line item on the
consolidated statement of operations when the underlying hedged transactions impact earnings. For hedging instruments that are no
longer deemed highly effective, hedge accounting is discontinued prospectively , and any gains and losses remaining in accumulated
other compr ehensive income (loss) are reclassified to earnings when the underlying forecasted  transaction occurs. If it is probable
that the forecasted transaction will no longer occur , the associated gains or losses in accumu lated other comprehensive income
(loss) are reclassified to the corresponding line item on the consolidated statement of operations in current earnings.
The Company has nume rous investments in its foreign subsidiaries. The net assets of these subsidiaries are exposed to volatility in
foreign currency exchange rates. The Company may use foreign currency denominated debt and/or derivative instruments to hedge
a portion of its net investment in foreign opera tions against adverse movements in exchange rates. The effective portion of the
foreign currency gains and losses related to the hedging instruments are reported in accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss) on the consolidated balance sheet as a cumulative translation adjustment component of equity . Amounts excluded from
70 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
effectiveness testing of net investment hedges are recognized in earnings over the life of the hedging instrument. The Company
evaluates the ef fectiveness of the net investment hedge each quarter .
Settlement due from/due to customers  - The Company operates systems for clearing and settling payment transactions among
customers. Net settlements are generally cleared daily among customers through settlement cash accounts by wire transfer or other
bank clearing means. However , some transactions may not settle until subsequent business days, resulting in amounts due from
and due to customers.
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets  - Property and equipm ent are stated at cost less accumulated depreciation and
amortization. Depreciation and amortization is computed using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the assets.
Depreciation of leasehold improvements and amortization of finance leases is included in depreciation and amortization expense on
the consolidated statement of operations. Operating lease amortization expense is included in general and administrative expenses
on the consolidated statement of operations.
The useful lives of the Company’ s assets are as follows:
Asset Category Estimated Useful Life
Buildings 30 years
Building equipment 10 - 15 years
Furniture and fixtures and equipment 3 - 5 years
Leasehold improvements Shorter of life of improvement or lease term
Right-of-use assets Shorter of life of the asset or lease term
The Compan y determine s if a contract is, or contains, a lease at contract inception. The Company’ s right-of-use (“ROU”) assets are
primarily related to operating leases for office space, automobiles and other equipment. Leases are included in property , equipment
and right-of-use assets, other current liabilities and other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet.
ROU assets represent the right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilitie s represent the obligation to make
lease payme nts arising from the lease. ROU assets and lease liabilities are recognized at the commencement date based on the
present value of lease payments over the lease term. In addition, ROU assets  include initial direct costs incurred by the lessee as
well as any lease payments made at or before the commencement date, and exclude lease incentives. As most of the Company's
leases do not provide an implicit rate, the Company uses its incremental borrowing rate based  on the information available at the
commencement date in determining the present value of lease payments. The incremental borrowing rate is determined by using the
rate of interest that the Company would pay to borrow on a collateralized basis an amount equal to the lease payments for a similar
term and in a similar economic environment. Lease terms include options to extend or terminate the lease when it is reasonably
certain that the Company will exercise that option. Leases with a term of one year or less are excluded from ROU assets and
liabilities.
The Company excludes variable lease payments  in measuring ROU assets and lease liabilities, other than those that depend on an
index, a rate or are in-substance fixed payments. Lease and nonlease components are generally accounted for separately . When
available, consideration is allocated to the separate lease and nonlease components in a lease contract on a relative standalone
price basis using observable standalone prices.
Pension and other postretirement plans  - The Comp any recogni zes the funded status of its single-employer defined benefit pension
plans and postretirement plans as assets or liabilities on its consolidated balance sheet and recognizes changes in the funded status
in the year in which the changes occur through accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). The funded status is measured as
the differenc e between the fair value of plan assets and the projected benefit obligation at December 31, the measurement date.
Overfunded plans, if any, are aggregated and recorded in other assets, while underfunded plans are aggregated and recorded as
accrued expenses and other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet.
Net periodic pension and postretirement benefit cost/(income), excluding the service cost component, is recognized in other income
(expense) on the cons olidated statement of operations. These costs  include interest cost, expected return on plan assets,
amortization of prior service costs or credits and gains or losses previously recognized as a component of accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss). The service cost component is recognized in general and administrative expenses on the
consolidated statement of operations.
Defined contribution plans  - The Comp any’s contri butions to defined contribution plans are recorded as employees render service to
the Company . The charge is recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 71
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Advertising and marketing  - Expenses incurred to promote Mastercard’ s brand, products and services are recognized in advertising
and marketing on the consolidated statement of operations. The timing of recognition is dependent on the type of advertising or
marketing expense .
Foreign currency remeasurement and translation  - Monetary  assets and liabilities are remeasured to functional currencies using
current exch ange rates in effect at the balance sheet date. Non-monetary assets and liabilities are recorded at historical exchange
rates. Revenue and expense accounts are remeasure d at the weighted-average exchange rate for the period. Resulting exchange
gains and losses related to remeasurement are included in general and administrative expense s on the consolidated statement of
operations.
Where a non-U.S. curre ncy is the functional currency , translation from that functional currenc y to U.S. dollars is performed for
balance sheet accounts using current exchange  rates in effect at the balance sheet date and for revenue and expense accounts
using a weighted-average exchange rate for the period. Resulting translation adjustments are reported as a component of
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
Treasury stock  - The Company records the repurchase of shares of its common stock at cost on the trade date of the transaction.
These share s are considered treasury stock, which is a reduction to stockholders’ equity . Treasury stock is included in authorized
and issued shares but excluded from outstanding shares.
Share-based payments  - The Company measu res share-based compensation expense at the grant date, based on the estimated
fair value of the award and uses the straight-lin e method of attribution, net of estimated forfeitures, for expensing awards over the
requisite employee service period. The Company estimates the fair value of its non-qualified stock option awards (“Options”) using a
Black-Scholes valuation model. The fair value of restricted stock units (“RSUs”) is determined and fixed on the grant date based  on
the Company’ s stock price, adjusted for the exclusion of dividend equivalents. The Monte Carlo simula tion valuation model is used
to determine the grant date fair value of performance stock units (“PSUs”) granted. All share-based compensation expenses are
recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations.
Redeemable non-controlling interests  - The Com pany’ s business combinations may include provisions allowing non-controlling
equity owne rs the ability to require the Company to purchase additional interests in the subsidiary at their discretion. The interests
are initially recorded at fair value and in subsequent reporting periods are accreted or adjusted to the estimated redemption value.
The adjustments to the redemption value are recorded to retained earnings or additional paid-in capital on the consolidated balance
sheet. The redeem able non-co ntrolling interests are considered temporary and reported outside of permanent equity on the
consolidated balance sheet at the greater of the carrying amount adjusted for the non-controlling interest’ s share of net income (loss)
or its redemption value.
Earnings per share  - The Company calculates basic earnings per share (“EPS”) by dividing net income by the weighted-average
number of common shares outstanding during the year. Diluted EPS is calculate d by dividing net income by the weighted-average
number of common shares outstanding during the year, adjusted for the potentially dilutive effect of stock options and unvested
stock units using the treasury stock method. The Compan y may be required to calculate EPS using the two-class method as a result
of its redeemable non-controlling interests. If redemption value exce eds the fair value of the redeemable non-controlling interests,
the excess would be a reduction to net income for the EPS calculation.
Accounting pronouncements not yet adopted
Simplifying the accountin g for income taxes - In December 2019, the FASB issued accounting guidance to simplify the accounting
for income taxes. This guidance includes the removal of certain exceptions to the general income tax accounting principles and
provides clarity and simplification to other areas of income tax accounting by amending the existing guidance. The guidance is
effective for periods beginning after December 15, 2020. The Company will adopt this guidance effective January 1, 2021 and does
not expect the impacts to be material.
Reference Rate Reform - In March 2020, the FASB issued accounting guidance to provide temporary optional expedients and
exceptions to the current contract modifications and hedge accounting guidance in light of the expected market transition from
LIBOR to alternative rates. The new guidance provides optional expedients and exceptions to transactions af fected by reference rate
reform if certain criteria are met. The transactions primarily include (1) contract modifications, (2) hedging relationships, and (3) sale
or transfer of debt securities classified as held-to-maturity . The amendments were effective immediately upon issuance of the
update. Companies may elect to adopt the amendments prospectively to transactions existing as of or entered from the date of
adoption through December 31, 2022. The Company does not expect the impacts to be material.
72 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 2. Acquisitions
In 2020 and 2019, the Company acquired several businesses for total consideration of $1.1 billion and $1.5 billion, respectively ,
representing both cash and contingent consideration. There were  no acquisitions in 2018. These acquisitions align with the
Company’ s strategy to grow , diversify and build the Company’ s business. Refer to Note 1 (Summary of Significant Acco unting
Policies) for the valuation techniques Mastercard utilizes to fair value the respective components of business combinations and
contingent consideration. The residual value allocated to goodwill is primarily attributable to the synergies expected to arise after the
acquisition date and a majority of the goodwill is not expected to be deductible for local tax purposes.
In 2020, the Company finalized the purchase accounting for businesses acquired during 2019 and $185 million of the businesses
acquired in 2020. The Compan y is evaluating and finalizing the purchase accounting for the remainder of the businesses acquired
during 2020. The preliminary estimated and final fair values of the purchase price allocations in aggregate, as of the acquisition
dates, are noted below for the years ended December 31.
2020 2019
(in millions)
Assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 6 $ 54 
Other current assets 14 143 
Other intangible assets 237 395 
Goodwill 844 1,076  
Other assets 11 48 
Total assets 1,112  1,716  
Liabilities:
Other current liabilities 15 121 
Deferred income taxes 23 52 
Other liabilities 8 32 
Total liabilities 46 205 
Net assets acquired $ 1,066  $ 1,511  
The following table summarizes the identified intangible assets acquired during the years ended December 31:
2020 2019 2020 2019
Acquisition Date Fair Value Weighted-Average Useful Life
(in millions) (in years)
Developed technologies $ 122 $ 199 6.3 7.7
Customer relationships 114 178 12.0 12.6
Other 1 18 1.0 5.0
Other intangible assets $ 237 $ 395 9.0 9.7
Pro forma information related to the acquisitions was not included because the impact on the Company's consolidated results of
operations was not considered to be material.
Among the businesses acquired in 2020, the largest acquisition relates to Finicity Corporation (“Finicity”), an open-banking provider ,
headquartered in Salt Lake City, Utah. On November 18, 2020, Mastercard acquired 100% equity interest in Finicity for cash
consideration of $ 809 million. In addition, the Finicity sellers have the potential to earn contingent consideration of up to $160 million
if certain revenue targets are met in 2021. As of the acquisition date, the fair value of the contingent consideration was $71 million.
The businesses acquired in 2019 were not individually significant to Mastercard.
Pending Acquisition
In August 2019, Mastercard entered into a defin itive agreement to acquire the majority of the Corporate Services business of Nets
Denmark A/S, for € 2.85 billion (approximately $ 3.5 billion as of December 31, 2020 ) after adjusting for cash and certain other
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 73
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
liabilities at closing. The pending acquisition primarily comprises the clearing and instant payment services, and e-billing solutions of
Nets Denmark A/S’s Corporate Services business. The Company has secured conditional approval  from the European Commission
and, subject to other closing conditions, anticipates completing the acquisition in the first quarter of 2021, or shortly thereafter .
Note 3. Revenue
Mastercard’ s core network involves four particip ants in addition to the Company: account holde rs (a person or entity who holds a
card or uses another device enabled for paymen t), issuers (the account holders’ financial institutions), merchants and acquirers (the
merchants’ financial institutions). Revenue from contracts with customers is recognized when services are performed in an amou nt
that reflects the conside ration to which the Company expects to be entitled to in exchange for those services. Revenue recognized
from domest ic assessme nts, cross-border volume fees and transaction processing are derived from Mastercard’ s payment network
services. Revenue is primarily generated by charging fees to issuers, acquirers and other stakeholders for providing switching
services, as well as by assessing customers based primarily on the dollar volume of activity , or gross dollar volume, on the products
that carry the Company’ s brands. Revenue is generally derived from information accumulated by Mastercard’ s systems or reported
by customers. In addition, the Company generates other revenues from value-added products and service s that are typically
integrated and sold with the Company’ s payment offerings and are recognized as revenue in the period in which the related
transactions occur or services are performed.
The price structure for Mastercard’ s products and services is dependent on the nature of volume s, types of transactions and type of
products and services of fered to customers. Net revenue can be impacted by the following:
•domestic or cross-border transactions
•geographic region or country in which the transaction occurs
•volumes/transactions subject to tiered rates
•processed or not processed by the Company
•amount of usage of the Company’ s other products or services
•amount of rebates and incentives provided to customers
The Company classifies its net revenue into the following five categories:
Domestic assessments  are fees charged to issuers and acquirers based primarily on the dollar volume of activity on cards and
other devices that carry  the Company’ s brands where the merchant country and the country of issuance are the same. Revenue
from domest ic assessme nts is recorded as revenue in the period it is earned, which is when the related volume is generated on the
cards or other devices that carry the Company’ s brands.
Cross-border volume fees  are charged to issuers and acquirers based primarily on the dollar volume of activity on cards and other
devices that carry the Company’ s brands where the merchant country and the country of issuance are different. Revenue from
cross-border volume is recorded as revenue in the period it is earned, which is when the related volume is generated on the cards or
other devices that carry the Company’ s brands.
Transaction processing  revenue is recognized for both domestic and cross-border transactions in the period in which the related
transactions occur . Transaction processing includes the following:
•Switched transaction  revenue is generated from the following products and services:
◦Authorization is the process by which a transaction is routed to the issuer for approval. In certain circumstances, such as
when the issuer ’s system s are unavailable or cannot be contacted, Mastercard or others approve such transactions on behalf
of the issuer in accordance with either the issuer ’s instructions or applicable rules (also known as “stand-in”).
◦Clearing is the determination and exchange of financial transaction information between issuers and acquirers after a
transaction has been successfully conducted at the point of interaction. Transactions are cleared among customers through
Mastercard’ s central and regional processing systems.
◦Settlement is facilitating the exchange of funds between parties.
•Connectivity fees are charged to issuers, acquirers and other financial institutions for network access, equipment and the
transmission of authorization and settlement messages. These fees are based on the size of the data being transmitted and the
number of connections to the Company’ s network.
•Other processing fees includ e issuer and acquirer processing solutions; payment gateways for e-commerce merchan ts; mobile
gateways for mobile-initiated transactions; and safety and security .
74 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Other revenues  consist of value-added products and services that are typically sold with the Company’ s payment service offerings
and are recognized in the period in which the related services are performed or transactions occur . Other revenues include the
following:
•Data analytics and consulting fees.
•Cyber and intelligence fees are for products and services offered to prevent, detect and respond to fraud and to ensure the safety
of transactions made primarily on Mastercard products.
•Loyalty and rewards solutions fees are charged to issuers for benefits provided directly to consumers with Mastercard-branded
cards, such as access to a global airline lounge network, global and local concierge services, individual insurance coverages,
emergency card replacement, emergency cash advance services and a 24-hour cardholder service center . Loyalty and reward
solution fees also include rewards campaigns and management services.
•Program management services provided to prepaid card issuers consist of foreign exchange margin, commissions, load fees and
ATM withdrawal fees paid by cardholders on the sale and encashment of prepaid cards.
•Batch and real-time account-based payment services relating to ACH transactions and other ACH related services.
•Other payment-related products and services and platforms, including account and transaction enhancement services, open
banking solutions, rules compliance and publications.
Rebates and incentives  (contra-revenue)  are provided to customers that meet certain volume targets and can be in the form of a
rebate or other support incentives, which are tied to performance. Rebates and incentives  are recorded as a reduction of gross
revenue primarily when volume- and transaction -based revenues are recognized over the contractual term. In addition, Mastercard
may make incentive payments to a customer directly related to entering into an agreement, which are generally capitalized and
amortized over the life of the agreement on a straight-line basis.
The Company’ s disaggregated net revenue by source and geographic region were as follows for the years ended December 31:
 2020 2019 2018
(in millions)
Revenue by source:
Domestic assessments $ 6,656  $ 6,781  $ 6,138  
Cross-border volume fees 3,512  5,606  4,954  
Transaction processing 8,731  8,469  7,391  
Other revenues 4,717  4,124  3,348  
Gross revenue 23,616  24,980  21,831  
Rebates and incentives (contra-revenue) (8,315 ) (8,097 ) (6,881 )
Net revenue $ 15,301  $ 16,883  $ 14,950  
Net revenue by geographic region:
North American Markets $ 5,424  $ 5,843  $ 5,312  
International Markets 9,701  10,869  9,514  
Other 176 171 124 
Net revenue $ 15,301  $ 16,883  $ 14,950  
Includes revenues managed by corporate functions.
Receivables from contracts with customers of $2.5 billion and $2.3 billion as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively , are
recorded within accounts receivable on the consolidated balance sheet. The Compa ny’s custom ers are generally billed  weekly ,
however , the frequency is dependent upon the nature of the performance obligation and the underlying contractual terms. The
Company does not typically of fer extended payment terms to customers.
Contract assets are included in prepaid expense s and other current assets and other assets on the consolidated balance sheet at
December 31, 2020 in the amounts of $59 million and $245 million, respectively . The comparable amounts included in prepaid
expenses and other current assets and other assets at December 31, 2019 were $ 48 million and $ 152 million, respectively .
Deferred revenue is included in other current liabilities and other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2020
in the amounts of $ 355 million and $ 143 million, respectively . The comparable amounts included in other current liabilities and1
1
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 75
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
other liabilities at Decem ber 31, 2019 were $238 million and $106 million, respectively . In 2020, 2019 and 2018 revenue recognized
from the satisfaction of such performance obligations was $ 1.1 billion, $ 994 million and $ 904 million, respectively .
The Company’ s remaining performance periods for its contracts with customers for its payment network services are typically long-
term in nature (generally up to 10 years). As a payme nt network service provider , the Company provides its customers with
continuous access to its global payments network and stands ready to provide transaction proce ssing and related services over the
contractual term. Consideration is variable as the Company gene rates volume- and transaction-based revenues from assessing its
customers’ current period activity . The Company has elected the optional exemption to not disclose the remaining performance
obligations related to its payment network servi ces. The Company also earns revenues primarily from other value-added services
comprised of both batch and real-time accoun t-based payment services, consulting fees, gateway services, processing, loyalty
programs and other payment-related products and services. At December 31, 2020, the estimated aggregate consideration allocated
to unsatisfie d performance obligations for these other value-added services is $1.3 billion, which is expected to be recognized
through 2023. The estimated remaining performance obligations related to these revenues are subject to change and are af fected by
several factors, including modifications and terminations and are not expected to be material to any future annual period.
Note 4. Earnings Per Share
The components of basic and diluted EPS for common shares for each of the years ended December 31 were as follows:
 2020 2019 2018
 (in millions, except per share data)
Numerator
Net income $ 6,411  $ 8,118  $ 5,859  
Denominator
Basic weighted-average shares outstanding 1,002  1,017  1,041  
Dilutive stock options and stock units 4 5 6 
Diluted weighted-average shares outstanding 1,006  1,022  1,047  
Earnings per Share
Basic $ 6.40 $ 7.98 $ 5.63 
Diluted $ 6.37 $ 7.94 $ 5.60 
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
For the years presented, the calculation of diluted EPS excluded a minimal amount of anti-dilutive share-based payment awards.
Note 5. Cash, Cash Equivalents, Restricted Cash and Restricted Cash Equivalents
The following table provides a reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents reported on
the consolidated balance sheet that total to the amounts shown on the consolidated statement of cash flows for the years ended
December 31:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Cash and cash equivalents $ 10,113  $ 6,988  
Restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents
Restricted cash for litigation settlement 586 584 
Restricted security deposits held for customers 1,696  1,370  
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 24 27 
Cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents $ 12,419  $ 8,969  1
1
76 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 6. Supplemental Cash Flows
The following table includes supplemental cash flow disclosures for each of the years ended December 31:
2020 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Cash paid for income taxes, net of refunds $ 1,349  $ 1,644  $ 1,790  
Cash paid for interest 311 199 153 
Cash paid for legal settlements 149 668 260 
Non-cash investing and financing activities
Dividends declared but not yet paid 439 403 340 
Accrued property , equipment and right-of-use assets 154 468 10 
Fair value of assets acquired, net of cash acquired 1,106  1,662  — 
Fair value of liabilities assumed related to acquisitions 46 205 — 
Note 7. Investments
The Company’ s investments on the consolidate d balance sheet include both available-for-sale and held-to-maturity securities (see
Investments section below). The Compa ny classifies its investments in equity securities of publicly traded and privately  held
companies within other assets on the consolidated balance sheet (see Equity Investments section below).
Investments
Investments on the consolidated balance sheet consisted of the following at December 31:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Available-for-sale securities $ 321 $ 591 
Held-to-maturity securities 162 97 
Total investments $ 483 $ 688 
Available-for-Sale Securities
The major classes of the Company’ s available-for-sale investment securities and their respective amortized cost basis and fair
values were as follows:
 December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
 Amortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainGross
Unrealized
Loss Fair ValueAmortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainGross
Unrealized
Loss Fair Value
(in millions)
Municipal securities $ 10 $ — $ — $ 10 $ 15 $ — $ — $ 15 
Government and agency
securities 64 — — 64 108 — — 108 
Corporate securities 246 1 — 247 381 1 — 382 
Asset-backed securities — — — — 85 1 — 86 
Total $ 320 $ 1 $ — $ 321 $ 589 $ 2 $ — $ 591 
The Company’ s available-for-sale investment securities held at December 31, 2020  and 2019, primarily carried a credit rating of A-
or better with unrealized gains and losses recorded as a separate component of other comprehensive income (loss) on the
consolidated statement of comprehensive income. The municip al securities are comprised of state tax-exempt bonds and are
diversified across states and sectors. Government and agency securities include U.S. government bonds, U.S. government
sponsored agency bonds and foreign government bonds. Corporate securities are comprised of commercial paper and corporate
bonds. The asset-backed securities are investments in bonds which are collateralized primarily by automobile loan receivables.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 77
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The maturity distribution based on the contract ual terms of the Company’ s investment securities at December 31, 2020  was as
follows:
Available-For-Sale
Amortized
 Cost Fair Value
(in millions)
Due within 1 year $ 115 $ 115 
Due after 1 year through 5 years 205 206 
Total $ 320 $ 321 
Investment income on the consolidated statement of operations primarily consists of interest income generated from cash, cash
equivalents, time deposits, and realized gains and losses on the Company’ s debt securities. The realized gains and losses from the
sale of available-for-sale securities for 2020, 2019 and 2018 were not significant.
Held-to-Maturity Securities
The Compa ny classifies time deposits with maturities greater than three months but less than one year as held-to-maturity . Time
deposits are carried at amortized cost on the consolidated balance sheet and are intended to be held until maturity . The cost of
these securities approximates fair value.
Equity Investments
Included in other assets on the consolidated balance sheet are equity investments with readily determinable fair values (“Marketable
securities”) and equity investments without readily determinable fair values (“Nonmarketable securities”). Marketable securities are
publicly traded companies and are measured using unadjusted quoted prices in their respective active markets. Nonmarketable
securities that do not qualify for equity method accounting are measured at cost, less any impairment and adjusted for changes
resulting from observable price changes in orderly transactions for the identical or simila r investments of the same issuer
(“measurement alternative”).
The following table is a summary of the activity related to the Company’ s equity investments:
 Balance at
December 31,
2019Purchases
(Sales), netChanges in
Fair Value OtherBalance at
December 31,
2020
(in millions)
Marketable securities $ 479 $ 1 $ (5)$ 1 $ 476 
Nonmarketable securities 435 204 35 22 696 
Total equity investments $ 914 $ 205 $ 30 $ 23 $ 1,172  
Recorded in gains (losses) on equity investments, net on the consolidated statement of operations
Includes translational impact of currency
At December 31, 2020 , the total carrying value of Nonmarketable securities included $157 million of measurement alternative
investments and $539 million of equity metho d investments. At December 31, 2019,  the total carrying value of Nonmarketable
securities included $ 317 million of measurement  alternative investments and $118 million of equity method investments. Cumulative
impairments and downward fair value adjustments on measurement alternative investments were $ 14 million and cumulative upward
fair value adjustments were $ 86 million as of December 31, 2020 .
Note 8. Fair V alue Measurements
The Company classifies its fair value measurements of financial instruments into a three-level hierarchy within the Valuation
Hierarchy . Financial instruments are categorized for fair value measurement purposes as recurring or non-r ecurring in nature. There
were no transfers made among the three levels in the V aluation Hierarchy for 2020 and 2019.1 2
1
2
78 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Financial Instruments - Recurring Measurements
The distribut ion of the Company’ s financial instruments measured at fair value on a recurring basis within the Valuation Hierarchy
were as follows:
 December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
 Quoted Prices
 in Active
 Markets
 (Level 1)Significant
 Other
 Observable
 Inputs
 (Level 2)Significant
 Unobservable
 Inputs
 (Level 3) TotalQuoted Prices
 in Active
 Markets
 (Level 1)Significant
 Other
 Observable
 Inputs
 (Level 2)Significant
 Unobservable
 Inputs
 (Level 3) Total
(in millions)
Assets
Investment securities
available for sale :
Municipal securities $ — $ 10 $ — $10 $ — $ 15 $ — $15 
Government and
agency securities 26 38 — 64 66 42 — 108 
Corporate securities — 247 — 247 — 382 — 382 
Asset-backed
securities — — — — — 86 — 86 
Derivative
instruments :
Foreign exchange
contracts — 19 — 19 — 12 — 12 
Interest rate contracts — — — — — 14 — 14 
Marketable securities
:
Equity securities 476 — — 476 479 — — 479 
Deferred
compensation plan :
Deferred
compensation assets 78 — — 78 67 — — 67 
Liabilities
Derivative
instruments :
Foreign exchange
derivative liabilities $ — $ (28)$ — $(28)$ — $ (32)$ — $(32)
Deferred
compensation plan :
Deferred
compensation
liabilities (81) — — (81) (67) — — (67)
The Company’s U.S. government securities are classified within Level 1 of the Valuation Hierarchy as the fair values are based on unadjusted
quoted prices for identical assets in active markets. The fair value of the Company’s available-for-sale municipal securities, government and
agency securities, corporate securities and asset-backed securities are based on observable inputs such as quoted prices, benchmark yields and
issuer spreads for similar assets in active markets and are therefore included in Level 2 of the Valuation Hierarchy.
The Company’s foreign exchange and interest rate derivative asset and liability contracts have been classified within Level 2 of the Valuation
Hierarchy as the fair value is based on observable inputs such as broker quotes relating to foreign currency exchange rates for similar derivative
instruments. See Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) for further details.
The Company’s Marketable securities are publicly held and classified within Level 1 of the Valuation Hierarchy as the fair values are based on
unadjusted quoted prices in their respective active markets.
The Company has a nonqualified deferred compensation plan where assets are invested primarily in mutual funds held in a rabbi trust, which is
restricted for payments to participants of the plan. The Company has elected to use the fair value option for these mutual funds, which are
measured using quoted prices of identical instruments in active markets and are included in prepaid expenses and other current assets on the
consolidated balance sheet.
The deferred compensation liabilities are measured at fair value based on the quoted prices of identical instruments to the investment vehicles
selected by the participants. These are included in other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet.1
2
3
4
2
5
1
2
3
4
5
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 79
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Financial Instruments - Non-Recurring Measurements
Nonmarketable Securities
The Compan y’s Nonmarketable securities are recorded at fair value on a non-recurring basis in periods after initial recognition under
the equity method or measurement alternative  method. Nonmarketable securities are classified within Level 3 of the Valuation
Hierarchy due to the absence of quoted market prices, the inherent lack of liquidity and unobservable inputs used to measure fair
value that require manag ement’ s judgment. The Company uses discounted cash flows and market assumptions to estimate the fair
value of its Nonmarketable securities when certain events or circumstances indicate that impairment may exist. See Note 7
(Investments) for further details.
Debt
The Company estimates the fair value of its long-term debt based on market quotes. These debt instruments are not traded in active
markets and are classified as Level 2 of the Valuation Hierarchy . At Decembe r 31, 2020, the carrying value and fair value of total
long-term debt (including the current portion) was $12.7 billion and $14.8 billion, respectively . At Decembe r 31, 2019, the carrying
value and fair value of long-term debt (includin g the current portion) was $8.5 billion and $9.2 billion, respectively . See Note 15
(Debt) for further details.
Other Financial Instruments
Certain financial instruments are carried on the consolidated balance sheet at cost or amortized cost basis, which approximates fair
value due to their short-term, highly liquid nature. These instruments include cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash, time
deposits, accounts receivable, settlement due from customers, restricted security deposits held for customers, accounts payable,
settlement due to customers and other accrued liabilities.
Note 9. Prepaid Expenses and Other Assets
Prepaid expenses and other current assets consisted of the following at December 31:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Customer and merchant incentives $ 1,086  $ 872 
Prepaid income taxes 78 105 
Other 719 786 
Total prepaid expenses and other current assets $ 1,883  $ 1,763  
Other assets consisted of the following at December 31:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Customer and merchant incentives $ 3,220  $ 2,838  
Equity investments 1,172  914 
Income taxes receivable 553 460 
Other 420 313 
Total other assets $ 5,365  $ 4,525  
Customer and merchant incentives represent payments made to customers and merchants under business agreements. Costs
directly related to entering into such an agreement are generally deferred and amortized over the life of the agreement.
See Note 7 (Investments) for further information on the Company’ s equity investments.
80 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 10. Property , Equipment and Right-of-Use Assets
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets consisted of the following at December 31:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Building, building equipment and land $ 522 $ 505 
Equipment 1,321  1,218  
Furniture and fixtures 99 92 
Leasehold improvements 380 303 
Operating lease right-of-use assets 970 810 
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets 3,292  2,928  
Less: Accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,390 ) (1,100 )
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net $ 1,902  $ 1,828  
Depreciation and amortization expense for the above property , equipment and right-of-use assets was $400 million, $ 336 million and
$209 million for 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
Operating lease ROU assets and operating lease liabilities are recorded on the consolid ated balance sheet as follows at
December 31:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Balance sheet location
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net $ 748 $ 711 
Other current liabilities 125 106 
Other liabilities 726 656 
Operating lease amortiz ation expense for 2020 and 2019 was $123 million  and $99 million , respectively . As of December 31, 2020
and 2019, the weighted- average remaining lease term of operating leases was 9.1 years and 9.5 years and the weighted-average
discount rate for operating leases was 2.7% and 2.9%, respectively .
The following table summarizes the maturity of the Company’ s operating lease liabilities at December 31, 2020 based on lease term:
Operating Leases
(in millions)
2021 $ 137 
2022 130 
2023 108 
2024 95 
2025 72 
Thereafter 383 
Total operating lease payments 925 
Less: Interest (74)
Present value of operating lease liabilities $ 851 
Prior to adoption of the lease accounting standard in 2019, consolidated rental expense for the Company’ s leased office space was
$94 million for 2018. Consolidated lease expense for automobiles, computer equipment and office equipment was $20 million for
2018, respectively .
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 81
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 11. Goodwill
The changes in the carrying amount of goodwill for the years ended December 31 were as follows:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Beginning balance $ 4,021  $ 2,904  
Additions 844 1,076  
Foreign currency translation 95 41 
Ending balance $ 4,960  $ 4,021  
The Company performed its annual qualitative assessment of goodwill during the fourth quarter of 2020 and determined a
quantitative assessment was not necessary . The Company concluded that goodwill was not impaired and had no accumulated
impairment losses at December 31, 2020.
Note 12. Other Intangible Assets
The following table sets forth net intangible assets, other than goodwill, at December 31:
2020 2019
Gross Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationNet Carrying
AmountGross Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationNet Carrying
Amount
(in millions)
Finite-lived intangible assets
Capitalized software $ 2,276  $ (1,126 )$ 1,150  $ 1,884  $ (988)$ 896 
Customer relationships 743 (322) 421 621 (264) 357 
Other 44 (41) 3 44 (44) — 
Total 3,063  (1,489 ) 1,574  2,549  (1,296 ) 1,253  
Indefinite-lived intangible assets
Customer relationships 179 — 179 164 — 164 
Total $ 3,242  $ (1,489 )$ 1,753  $ 2,713  $ (1,296 )$ 1,417  
The increase  in the gross carrying amount of amortized intangible assets in 2020 was primaril y related to software additions and
businesses acquired in 2020. See Note 2 (Acquisitions) for further details. Certain intangible assets are denominated in foreign
currencies. As such, the change in intangible assets includes a component attributable to foreign currency translation. Based on the
qualitative assessment performed in 2020, it was determined that the Company’ s indefinite-lived intangible assets were not
impaired.
Amortization on the assets above amounted to $ 303 million, $ 285 million and $ 250 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively . The
following table sets forth the estimated future amortization expense on finite-lived intangible assets on the consolidated balance
sheet at December 31, 2020 for the years ending December 31:
(in millions)
2021 $ 332 
2022 260 
2023 211 
2024 194 
2025 and thereafter 577 
$ 1,574  
82 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 13. Accrued Expenses and Accrued Litigation
Accrued expenses consisted of the following at December 31:
2020 2019
 (in millions)
Customer and merchant incentives $ 3,998  $ 3,892  
Personnel costs 727 713 
Income and other taxes 208 332 
Other 497 552 
Total accrued expenses $ 5,430  $ 5,489  
Customer and merchant incentives represent amounts to be paid to customers under business agreements. As of Decem ber 31,
2020 and 2019, the Company’ s provision for litigation was $842 million and $914 million, respectively . These amou nts are not
included in the accrued expenses table above and are separately reported as accrued litigation on the consolidated balance sheet.
See Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings) for additional information regarding the Company’ s accrued litigation.
Note 14. Pension, Postretirement and Savings Plans
The Company and certa in of its subsidiaries maintain various pension and other postretireme nt plans that cover substantially all
employees worldwide.
Defined Contribution Plans
The Company sponsors defined contribution retirement plans. The primary  plan is the Mastercard Savings Plan, a 401(k) plan for
substantially all of the Company’ s U.S. employees, which is subject to the provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security
Act of 1974,  as amended. In addition, the Compan y has several defined contribution plans outside of the U.S. The Company’ s total
expense for its defined contribution plans was $ 150 million, $ 127 million and $ 98 million in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
Defined Benefit and Other Postretirement Plans
The Company sponsors pension and postretirement plans for certain non-U.S. employees (the “non-U.S. Plans”) that cover various
benefits specific to their country of employment. Additionally , Vocalink has a defined benefit pens ion plan (the “Vocalink Plan”) which
was permanently closed to new entrants and future accruals as of July 21, 2013, however , plan participants’ obligations are adjusted
for future salary changes. The Company has agreed to make contributions of £15 million (approximately $20 million as of
December 31, 2020) annually until September 2022. The term “Pension Plans” includes the non-U.S. Plans and the V ocalink Plan.
The Compan y maintains a postretirement plan providing health coverage and life insurance benefits for substantially all of its U.S.
employees hired before July 1, 2007 (the “Postretirement Plan”).
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 83
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The Company uses a December 31 measurement date for the Pension Plans and its Postretirement Plan (collectively the “Plans”).
The Compan y recognizes the funded status of its Plans, measured as the difference between the fair value of the plan assets and
the projecte d benefit obligation, in the consolidated balance sheet. The following table sets forth the Plans’ funded status, key
assumptions and amounts recognized in the Company’ s consolidated balance sheet at December 31:
 Pension Plans Postretirement Plan
 2020 2019 2020 2019
 ($ in millions)
Change in benefit obligation
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 531 $ 438 $ 64 $ 57 
Service cost 13 11 1 1 
Interest cost 9 13 2 2 
Actuarial (gain) loss 43 73 7 9 
Benefits paid (18) (15) (4) (5)
Transfers in 3 2 — — 
Foreign currency translation 23 9 — — 
Benefit obligation at end of year 604 531 70 64 
Change in plan assets
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year 518 410 — — 
Actual (loss) gain on plan assets 56 79 — — 
Employer contributions 34 32 4 5 
Benefits paid (18) (15) (4) (5)
Transfers in 5 2 — — 
Foreign currency translation 22 10 — — 
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 617 518 — — 
Funded status at end of year $ 13 $ (13) $ (70) $ (64)
Amounts recognized on the consolidated balance sheet consist of:
Noncurrent assets $ 28 $ — $ — $ — 
Other liabilities, short-term — — (4) (3)
Other liabilities, long-term (15) (13) (66) (61)
$ 13 $ (13) $ (70) $ (64)
Accumulated other comprehensive income consists of:
Net actuarial (gain) loss $ 12 $ 7 $ 9 $ 2 
Prior service credit 1 1 (4) (5)
Balance at end of year $ 13 $ 8 $ 5 $ (3)
Weighted-average assumptions used to determine end of year benefit
obligations
Discount rate
Non-U.S. Plans 0.70 % 0.70 % * *
Vocalink Plan 1.55 % 2.00 % * *
Postretirement Plan * * 2.50 % 3.25 %
Rate of compensation increase
Non-U.S. Plans 1.50 % 1.50 % * *
Vocalink Plan 2.75 % 2.50 % * *
Postretirement Plan * * 3.00 % 3.00 %
* Not applicable
84 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
At Decembe r 31, 2020, the Company’ s aggrega ted Pension Plan assets exceed the benefit oblig ations. For plans where the benefit
obligations exceeded plan assets, the projected  benefit obligation was $112 million, the accumulate d benefit obligation was $111
million and plan assets were $97 million. At Decembe r 31, 2019, all of the Pension Plans had benefit obligations in excess of plan
assets. Information on the Pension Plans were as follows as of December 31:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Projected benefit obligation $ 604 $ 531 
Accumulated benefit obligation 601 524 
Fair value of plan assets 617 518 
For the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company’ s projected benefit oblig ation related to its Pension Plans
increased $73 million and $93 millio n, respectively , primarily attributable to actuarial losses related to lower discount rate
assumptions.
Components of net periodic benefit cost recorded in earnings were as follows for the Plans for each of the years ended
December 31:
Pension Plans Postretirement Plan
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
(in millions)
Service cost $13 $11 $ 9 $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
Interest cost 9 13 12 2 2 2 
Expected return on plan assets (18) (18) (20) — — — 
Amortization of actuarial loss — 1 — — — — 
Amortization of prior service credit — — — (1) (1) (2)
Net periodic benefit cost $ 4 $ 7 $ 1 $ 2 $ 2 $ 1 
The service cost compon ent is recognized in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations. Net
periodic benefit cost, excluding the service cost component, is recognized in other income (expense) on the consolidated statement
of operations.
Other changes in plan assets and benefit obliga tions recognized in other comprehensive income for the years ended December 31
were as follows:
Pension Plans Postretirement Plan
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
(in millions)
Current year actuarial loss (gain) $ 5 $12 $17 $ 7 $ 9 $ (2)
Current year prior service credit — — 1 — — — 
Amortization of prior service credit — — — 1 1 2 
Total other comprehensive loss (income) $ 5 $12 $18 $ 8 $10 $ — 
Total net periodic benefit cost and other comprehensive loss (income) $ 9 $19 $19 $10 $12 $ 1 
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 85
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Assumptions
Weighted-average assumptions used to determine net periodic benefit cost were as follows for the years ended December 31:
Pension Plans Postretirement Plan
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Discount rate
Non-U.S. Plans 0.70 % 1.80 % 1.80 % * * *
Vocalink Plan 1.55 % 2.00 % 2.80 % * * *
Postretirement Plan * * * 3.25 % 4.25 % 3.50 %
Expected return on plan assets
Non-U.S. Plans 1.60 % 2.10 % 3.00 % * * *
Vocalink Plan 3.20 % 3.75 % 4.75 % * * *
Rate of compensation increase
Non-U.S. Plans 1.50 % 1.50 % 2.60 % * * *
Vocalink Plan 2.75 % 2.50 % 3.85 % * * *
Postretirement Plan * * * 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
* Not applicable
The Company’ s discount rate assumptions are based on yield curves derived from high quality corporate bonds, which are matched
to the expec ted cash flows of each respective plan. The expected return on plan assets assumptions are derived using the current
and expecte d asset allocations of the Pension  Plans’ assets and considering historical as well as expected returns on various
classes of plan assets. The rates of compensation increases are determined by the Company , based upon its long-ter m plans for
such increases.
The following additional assumptions were used at December 31 in accounting for the Postretirement Plan:
2020 2019
Healthcare cost trend rate assumed for next year 7.00 % 6.00 %
Ultimate trend rate 5.00 % 5.00 %
Year that the rate reaches the ultimate trend rate 8 2
Assets
Plan assets are managed taking into account the timing and amount of future benefit payments. The Vocalink Plan assets are
managed with the following target asset allocations: fixed income 35%, U.K. government securities 23%, equity 22%, cash and cash
equivalents 12% and real estate 8%. For the non-U.S. Plans, the assets are concentrated primarily in insurance contracts.
The Valuation Hierarchy of the Pension Plans’ assets is determined using a consistent application of the categorization
measurements for the Company’ s financial instruments. See Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting Policies) for additional
information.
86 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following tables set forth by level, within the V aluation Hierarchy , the Pension Plans’ assets at fair value:
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Quoted
Prices in
Active
Markets
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
 Unobservable
 Inputs
 (Level 3)Fair
ValueQuoted
Prices in
Active
Markets
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
 Unobservable
 Inputs
 (Level 3)Fair
Value
(in millions)
Cash and cash equivalents $ 59 $ — $ — $59 $ 16 $ — $ — $16 
Mutual funds 270 117 — 387 153 193 — 346 
Insurance contracts — 96 — 96 — 75 — 75 
Total $ 329 $ 213 $ — $542 $ 169 $ 268 $ — $437 
Investments at Net Asset Value
(“NAV”) 75 81 
Total Plan Assets $617 $518 
Cash and cash equivalents are valued at quoted market prices, which represent the net asset value of the shares held by the Plans.
Certain mutual funds are valued at quoted market prices, which represent the value of the shares held by the Plans, and are therefore included in
Level 1. Certain other mutual funds are valued at unit values provided by investment managers, which are based on the fair value of the
underlying investments utilizing public information, independent external valuation from third-party services or third-party advisors, and are
therefore included in Level 2.
Insurance contracts are valued at unit values provided by investment managers, which are based on the fair value of the underlying investments
utilizing public information, independent external valuation from third-party services or third-party advisors.
Investments at NAV include mutual funds (comprised primarily of credit investments) and other investments (comprised primarily of real estate
investments) and are valued using the net asset value provided by the administrator as a practical expedient, and therefore these investments
are not included in the valuation hierarchy. These investments have quarterly redemption frequencies with redemption notice periods ranging
from 60 to 90 days.
The following table summ arizes expected benefit payments (as of December 31, 2020 ) through 2030 for the Pension Plans and the
Postretirement Plan, including those payments expected to be paid from the Company’ s gene ral assets. Actual benefit payments
may dif fer from expected benefit payments.
Pension Plans Postretirement Plan
(in millions)
2021 $ 19 $ 4 
2022 12 4 
2023 14 4 
2024 15 4 
2025 15 4 
2026 - 2030 77 20 1
2
3
4
1
2
3
4
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 87
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 15. Debt
Long-term debt consisted of the following at December 31:
2020 2019Effective
 Interest Rate
(in millions)
2020 USD Notes 3.300  %Senior Notes due March 2027 $ 1,000  $ — 3.420  %
3.350  %Senior Notes due March 2030 1,500  — 3.430  %
3.850  %Senior Notes due March 2050 1,500  — 3.896  %
2019 USD Notes 2.950  %Senior Notes due June 2029 1,000  1,000  3.030  %
3.650  %Senior Notes due June 2049 1,000  1,000  3.689  %
2.000  %Senior Notes due March 2025 750 750 2.147  %
2018 USD Notes 3.500  %Senior Notes due February 2028 500 500 3.598  %
3.950  %Senior Notes due February 2048 500 500 3.990  %
2016 USD Notes 2.000  %Senior Notes due November 2021 650 650 2.236  %
2.950  %Senior Notes due November 2026 750 750 3.044  %
3.800  %Senior Notes due November 2046 600 600 3.893  %
2015 EUR Notes1.100  %Senior Notes due December 2022 859 785 1.265  %
2.100  %Senior Notes due December 2027 982 896 2.189  %
2.500  %Senior Notes due December 2030 184 169 2.562  %
2014 USD Notes 3.375  %Senior Notes due April 2024 1,000  1,000  3.484  %
12,775  8,600  
Less: Unamortized discount and debt issuance costs (103) (73)
Total debt outstanding 12,672  8,527  
Less: Current portion (649) — 
Long-term debt $ 12,023  $ 8,527  
Relates to euro-denominated debt issuance of €1.650 billion in December 2015
Relates to current portion of the 2016 USD Notes, due in November 2021, classified as current portion of long-term debt on the consolidated
balance sheet
In March 2020, the Com pany issued $1 billion principal amount of notes due March 2027, $1.5 billion principal amount of notes due
March 2030 and $ 1.5 billion principal amount notes due March 2050 (collectively the “2020 USD Notes”). The net proceeds from the
issuance of the 2020 USD Notes, after deducting the original issue discount, underwriting discount and offering expenses, were
$3.959  billion.
In May 2019 , the Company issued $1 billion principal amount of notes due June 2029  and $1 billion princ ipal amount of notes due
June 2049 and in December 2019, the Compan y issued $750 millio n principal amoun t of notes due March 2025 (collectively the
“2019 USD Notes”). The net proceeds from the issuance of the 2019 USD Notes, after deducting the original issue discount,
underwriting discount and of fering expenses, were $ 2.724  billion.
The net proceeds, after deducting the original issue discount, underwriting discount and offering  expenses, from the issuance of the
2018 USD Notes were $ 991 million.1
2
1
2
88 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The outstand ing debt, described above, is not subject to any financial covenants and it may be redeemed in whole, or in part, at the
Company’ s option at any time for a specified make-whole amount. These notes are senior unsecured obligations and would rank
equally with any future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness. The proceeds of the notes are to be used for general corporate
purposes.
Scheduled annual maturities of the principal portion of long-term debt outstanding at December 31, 2020 are summarized below .
(in millions)
2021 $ 650 
2022 859 
2023 — 
2024 1,000
2025 750 
Thereafter 9,516  
Total $ 12,775  
On November 14, 2019, the Company increased its commercial paper program (the “Commercial Paper Program”) from $4.5 billion
to $6 billion under which the Company is authorized to issue unsecured commercial paper notes with maturities of up to 397 days
from the date of issuance. The Commercial Paper Program is available in U.S. dollars.
In conjunction with the Commercial Paper Program, the Company entered into a committed five-year unsecured $6 billion revolving
credit facility  (the “Credit Facility”) on November 14, 2019. The Credit Facility , which  previously expired on November 14, 2024, was
extended on November 14, 2020 for an additional year and now expires on November 13, 2025. The extension did not result in
material changes to the terms and conditions of the Credit Facility . Borrowings under the Credit Facility are available in U.S. dollars
and/or euros. The facility fee under the Credit Facility is determined according to the Company’ s credit rating and is payable on the
average daily commitment, regardless of usage, per annum. In addition to the facility  fee, interest rates on borrowings under the
Credit Facility would be based on prevailing market interest rates plus applicable margins that fluctuate based on the Company’ s
credit rating. The Credit Facility contains customary representations, warranties, affirmative and negative covenants, events of
default and indemnification provisions. The Company was in compliance in all material respects with the covenants of the Credit
Facility at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Borrowings under the Commercial Paper Prog ram and the Credit Facility are used to provide liquidity for general corporate
purposes, including providing liquidity in the event of one or more settlement failures by the Company’ s customers. The Company
may borrow and repay amounts under the Com mercial Paper Program and Credit Facility from time to time. The Company had no
borrowings under the Credit Facility and the Commercial Paper Program at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Note 16. Stockholders' Equity
Classes of Capital Stock
Mastercard’ s amended and restated certificate of incorporation authorizes the following classes of capital stock:
ClassPar Value
Per ShareAuthorized
Shares 
 (in millions) Dividend and Voting Rights
A $0.0001 3,000  One vote per share 
Dividend rights
B $0.0001 1,200  Non-voting
 Dividend rights
Preferred $0.0001 300 No shares issued or outstanding at December 31, 2020 and 2019. Dividend and voting
rights are to be determined by the Board of Directors of the Company upon issuance.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 89
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Dividends
The Company declared a quarterly cash dividen d on its Class A and Class B Common Stock during each of the four quarters of
2020, 2019 and 2018.
The Company declared total per share dividends on its Class A and Class B Common Stock during the years ended December 31
as summarized below: 
2020 2019 2018
(in millions, except per share data)
Dividends declared per share $ 1.64 $ 1.39 $ 1.08 
Total dividends declared $ 1,641  $ 1,408  $ 1,120  
Ownership and Governance Structure
Equity ownership and voting power of the Company’ s shares were allocated as follows as of December 31:
2020 2019
Equity
OwnershipGeneral Voting
PowerEquity
OwnershipGeneral Voting
Power
Public Investors (Class A stockholders) 88.2 % 88.9 % 87.8 % 88.8 %
Principal or Af filiate Customers (Class B stockholders) 0.8 % — % 1.1 % — %
Mastercard Foundation (Class A stockholders) 11.0 % 11.1 % 11.1 % 11.2 %
Class B Common Stock Conversions
Shares of Class B common stock are convertibl e on a one-for-one basis into shares of Class A common stock.  Entities eligible to
hold Masterc ard’s Class B common stock are defined in the Company’ s amended and restated certificate of incorporation (generally
the Company’ s principal or affiliate customers),  and they are restricted from retaining ownership of shares of Class A common
stock.  Class B stockholders are required to subsequently sell or otherwise transfer any shares of Class A common stock received
pursuant to such a conversion. 
Mastercard Foundation
In connection and simult aneously with its 2006 initial public offering (the “IPO”), the Company issued and donated 135 million newly
authorized shares of Class A common stock to Mastercard Foundation. Mastercard Foundation is a private charitable foundation
incorporated in Canada that is controlled by directors who are independent of the Company and its principal customers. Under the
terms of the donation, Mastercard Foundation became able to resell the donated shares in May 2010 to the extent necessary to
meet charitable disbursement requirements pursuant to Canadian tax law. Under such current law, Mastercard Foundation must
annually disburse at least 3.5% of its assets not used in its charitable activities and administration in the previous eight quarters
(“Disbursement Quota”). However , Mastercard Foundation obtained permission from the Canada Revenue Agency to, until
December 31, 2021, meet its cumulative Disbursement Quota obligations over a period of time that, on average, demonstrates
compliance with the requirement for such established time period. Mastercard Foundation will be permitted to sell all of its remaining
shares beginning May 1, 2027, subject to certain conditions.
Stock Repurchase Programs
The Compan y’s Board of Directors have approve d share repurchase programs authorizing the Company to repurchase shares of its
Class A Common Stock.  These programs become effective after the completion of the previously authorized share repurchase
program. 
90 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table summarizes the Company’ s share repurchase authorizations of its Class A common stock through December 31,
2020, as well as historical purchases:
Board authorization datesDecember
2020December
2019December 
 2018December 
 2017December 
 2016
Date program became effectiveNot yet
effectiveJanuary
2020January
2019 March 2018 April 2017 Total
(in millions, except average price data)
Board authorization $ 6,000  $ 8,000  $ 6,500  $ 4,000  $ 4,000  $28,500  
Dollar-value of shares repurchased in 2018 $ — $ — $ — $ 3,699  $ 1,234  $4,933  
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2018 $ — $ — $ 6,500  $ 301 $ — $6,801  
Dollar-value of shares repurchased in 2019 $ — $ — $ 6,196  $ 301 $ — $6,497  
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2019 $ — $ 8,000  $ 304 $ — $ — $8,304  
Dollar-value of shares repurchased in 2020 $ — $ 4,169  $ 304 $ — $ — $4,473  
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2020 $ 6,000  $ 3,831  $ — $ — $ — $9,831  
Shares repurchased in 2018 — — — 19.0 7.2 26.2 
Average price paid per share in 2018 $ — $ — $ — $194.77  $171.11  $188.26  
Shares repurchased in 2019 — — 24.8 1.6 — 26.4 
Average price paid per share in 2019 $ — $ — $249.58  $188.38  $ — $245.89  
Shares repurchased in 2020 — 13.3 1.0 — — 14.3 
Average price paid per share in 2020 $ — $313.26  $304.89  $ — $ — $312.68  
Cumulative shares repurchased through December
31, 2020 — 13.3 25.8 20.6 28.2 87.9 
Cumulative average price paid per share $ — $313.26  $251.72  $194.27  $141.99  $212.41  
The followin g table presents the changes in the Company’ s outstanding Class A and Class B common stock for the years ended
December 31:
 Outstanding Shares
 Class A Class B
(in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2017 1,039.7  14.1 
Purchases of treasury stock (26.2) — 
Share-based payments 2.8 — 
Conversion of Class B to Class A common stock 2.3 (2.3)
Balance at December 31, 2018 1,018.6  11.8 
Purchases of treasury stock (26.4) — 
Share-based payments 3.2 — 
Conversion of Class B to Class A common stock 0.6 (0.6)
Balance at December 31, 2019 996.0  11.2 
Purchases of treasury stock (14.3) — 
Share-based payments 2.3 — 
Conversion of Class B to Class A common stock 2.9 (2.9)
Balance at December 31, 2020 986.9  8.3 
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 91
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 17. Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
The changes  in the balances of each componen t of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax, for the years ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019 were as follows:
December 31,
2019Increase /
(Decrease) ReclassificationsDecember 31,
2020
(in millions)
Foreign currency translation adjustments $ (638)$ 286 $ — $ (352)
Translation adjustments on net investment hedge (38) (137) — (175)
Cash flow hedges
Interest rate contracts 11 (147) 3 (133)
Defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans (9) (10) (1) (20)
Investment securities available-for-sale 1 (1) — — 
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) $ (673)$ (9)$ 2 $ (680)
December 31,
2018Increase /
(Decrease) ReclassificationsDecember 31,
2019
(in millions)
Foreign currency translation adjustments $ (661)$ 23 $ — $ (638)
Translation adjustments on net investment hedge (66) 28 — (38)
Cash flow hedges
Interest rate contracts — 11 — 11 
Defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans 10 (17) (2) (9)
Investment securities available-for-sale (1) 2 — 1 
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) $ (718)$ 47 $ (2)$ (673)
During 2020, the decrease in the accumulated other comprehensive loss related to foreign currency translation adjustments was driven primarily
by the appreciation of the Euro and British pound partially offset by the depreciation of the Brazilian real. During 2019, the decrease in the
accumulated other comprehensive loss related to foreign currency translation adjustments was driven primarily by the appreciation of the British
pound partially offset by the depreciation of the euro.
The Company uses foreign currency denominated debt to hedge a portion of its net investment in foreign operations against adverse movements
in exchange rates. Changes in the value of the debt are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). During 2020, the increase
in the accumulated other comprehensive loss related to the net investment hedge was driven by the appreciation of the euro. During 2019, the
decrease in the accumulated other comprehensive loss related to the net investment hedge was driven by the depreciation of the euro. See Note
23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) for additional information.
In 2019, the Company entered into treasury rate locks which are accounted for as cash flow hedges. In the first quarter of 2020, in connection
with the issuance of the 2020 USD Notes, these contracts were settled for a loss of $175 million, or $136 million net of tax, recorded in
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). The cumulative loss will be reclassified as an adjustment to interest expense over the
respective terms of the 2020 USD Notes. See Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) for additional information.
During 2020, the increase in the accumulated other comprehensive loss related to the Company’s Plans was driven primarily by an actuarial loss
within the Postretirement Plan. During 2019, the decrease in the accumulated other comprehensive gain related to the Company’s Plans was
primarily driven by actuarial losses within the Vocalink and non-U.S. Plans. See Note 14 (Pension, Postretirement and Savings Plans) for
additional information.
Note 18. Share-Based Payments
In May 2006, the Company implemented the Mastercard Incorporated 2006 Long Term Incent ive Plan, which was amended and
restated as of June 5, 2012 (the “LTIP”). The LTIP is a stockhold er-approved plan that permits the grant of various types of equity
awards to employees. The Compa ny has granted Options, RSUs and PSUs under the LTIP. The Company uses the straight-line
method of attribution for expensing all equity awards. Compensation expense is recorded net of estimated forfeitures, with estimates
adjusted as appropriate.1
2
3
4
1
2
3
4
1.
2.
3.
4.
92 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
There are approximately  116 millio n shares of Class A common stock authorized for equity awards under the LTIP. Although the
LTIP permits  the issuance of shares of Class B common stock, no such shares have been authorized for issuance. Shares issued as
a result of Option exercis es and the conversions of RSUs and PSUs were funded primarily with the issuance of new shares of Class
A common stock.
Stock Options
Options expire ten years  from the date of grant and vest ratably over four years . For Options granted, a participant’ s unvested
awards are forfeited upon termination. In the event  a participant terminates employment due to disability or retirement more than
seven months  after receivi ng the award, however , the participa nt retains all of their awards without providing additional service to the
Company . Retirement eligibility is dependent upon age and years of service. Compensation expense is recognized over the vesting
period as stated in the L TIP.
The fair value of each Option is estimated on the date of grant using a Black-Scholes option  pricing model. The following table
presents the weighted-average assumptions used in the valuation and the resulting weighted-average fair value per option granted
for the years ended December 31:
2020 2019 2018
Risk-free rate of return 1.0 % 2.6 % 2.7 %
Expected term (in years) 6.00 6.00 6.00
Expected volatility 19.3 % 19.6 % 19.7 %
Expected dividend yield 0.6 % 0.6 % 0.6 %
Weighted-average fair value per Option granted $ 80.92  $ 53.09  $ 40.90  
The risk-free rate of return was based on the U.S. Treasury yield curve in effect on the date of grant. The expected term and the
expected volatility were based on historical Mastercard information. The expected dividend yields were based on the Company’ s
expected annual dividend rate on the date of grant.
The following table summarizes the Company’ s option activity for the year ended December 31, 2020:
OptionsWeighted-
Average
Exercise
PriceWeighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
TermAggregate
Intrinsic
Value
(in millions) (in years) (in millions)
Outstanding at January 1, 2020 6.6 $ 117 
Granted 0.4 $ 263 
Exercised (1.3)$ 75 
Forfeited/expired — $ 229 
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 5.7 $ 137 6.0 $ 1,259  
Exercisable at December 31, 2020 3.8 $ 106 5.1 $ 962 
Options vested and expected to vest at December 31, 2020 5.7 $ 137 6.0 $ 1,257  
As of December 31, 2020, there was $37 million of total unrecognized compensation cost related to non-vested Options. The cost is
expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 2.1 years.
Restricted Stock Units
For RSUs granted on or after March 1, 2020, the awards generally vest ratably over four years.  For RSUs granted befor e March 1,
2020, the awards generally vest after three years . A participant’ s unvested awards are forfeited upon termination of employment. In
the event of termination due to job elimination (as defined by the Company), however , a partici pant will retain a pro-rata portion of
the unvested awards for services performed through the date of termination. In the event a participant terminates employment due to
disability or retirement more than seven months  after receiving the awar d, the participant retains all of their awards without providing
additional service to the Company . Compensation expense is recognized over the shorter of the vesting periods stated in the LTIP or
the date the individual becomes eligible to retire but not less than seven months .
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 93
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table summarizes the Company’ s RSU activity for the year ended December 31, 2020:
UnitsWeighted-
Average
Grant-Date
Fair ValueAggregate
Intrinsic
Value
(in millions) (in millions)
Outstanding at January 1, 2020 2.9 $ 166 
Granted 0.9 $ 288 
Converted (1.2)$ 116 
Forfeited (0.1)$ 218 
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 2.5 $ 231 $ 898 
RSUs expected to vest at December 31, 2020 2.4 $ 230 $ 861 
The fair value of each RSU is the closing stock price on the New York Stock Exchange of the Company’ s Class A common stock on
the date of grant, adjusted for the exclusion of dividend equivalents. Upon vesting, a portion of the RSU award may be withheld to
satisfy the minimum statutory withholding taxes. The remaini ng RSUs will be settled in shares of the Company’ s Class A common
stock after the vesting period. As of Decem ber 31, 2020, there was $233 million of total unrecognized compensation cost related to
non-vested RSUs. The cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 2.4 years.
Performance Stock Units
PSUs vest after three years , however , awards granted on or after March 1, 2019 are subject to a mandatory one-year post-vest hold.
A participant’ s unvested awards are forfeited upon termination of employment. In the event of terminatio n due to job elimination (as
defined by the Company ), however , a participant will retain a pro-rata portion of the unvested awards for services performed through
the date of termination. In the event a participan t terminates employment due to disability or retirement more than seven months
after receiving the award, the participant retains all of their awards without providing additional service to the Company .
The following table summarizes the Company’ s PSU activity for the year ended December 31, 2020:
UnitsWeighted-
Average 
 Grant-Date
Fair ValueAggregate
Intrinsic
Value
(in millions) (in millions)
Outstanding at January 1, 2020 0.5 $ 167 
Granted 0.2 $ 291 
Converted (0.3)$ 126 
Outstanding at December 31, 2020 0.4 $ 259 $ 148 
PSUs expected to vest at December 31, 2020 0.4 $ 259 $ 148 
Since 2013, PSUs containing performance and market conditions have been issued. Performance measures used to determine the
actual number of shares  that vest after three years include net revenue growth, EPS growth and relative total shareholder return
(“TSR”).  Relative TSR is considered a market condition, while net revenue and EPS growth are considered performance
conditions.  The Monte Carlo simulation valuation model is used to determine the grant-date fair value. 
Compensation expense for PSUs is recognized over the requisite service period, or the date the individual becomes eligible to retire
but not less than seven months , if it is probable that the performance target will be achieved and subsequently adjusted if the
probability assessment changes. During the year ended December 31, 2020, performance targets related to PSU awards granted in
2018, and scheduled to vest in 2021 (“2018 PSU Awards”), were adjusted to exclude certain pandemic-related financial impacts
deemed outside of the Company’ s control. The adjustment required the Company to apply modification accounting to the 2018 PSU
Awards. The modification had an immaterial impact on compensation expense expected to be recognized over the remaining service
period. As of December 31, 2020, there was $38 million of total unrecogn ized compensation cost related to non-vested PSUs. The
cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.4 years.
94 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Additional Information
The following table includes additional share-based payment information for each of the years ended December 31:
2020 2019 2018
(in millions, except weighted-average
fair value)
Share-based compensation expense: Options, RSUs and PSUs $ 254 $ 250 $ 196 
Income tax benefit recognized for equity awards 53 53 41 
Income tax benefit realized related to Options exercised 68 69 53 
Options:
Total intrinsic value of Options exercised 317 317 242 
RSUs:
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of awards granted 288 226 171 
Total intrinsic value of RSUs converted into shares of Class A common stock 330 394 194 
PSUs:
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of awards granted 291 231 226 
Total intrinsic value of PSUs converted into shares of Class A common stock 92 85 40 
Note 19. Commitments
At December 31, 2020, the Company had the following future minimum payments due under noncancelable agreements, primarily
related to sponsorships to promote the Masterca rd brand and licensing arrangements and a commitment to purchase the remaining
shares of a majority-owned joint venture. The Company has accrued $ 22 million of these future payments as of December 31, 2020.
(in millions)
2021 $ 573 
2022 255 
2023 117 
2024 78 
2025 1 
Thereafter — 
Total $ 1,024  
Note 20. Income T axes
Components of Income and Income tax expense
The domestic and foreign components of income before income taxes for the years ended December 31 are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
(in millions)
United States $ 3,304  $ 4,213  $ 3,510  
Foreign 4,456  5,518  3,694  
Income before income taxes $ 7,760  $ 9,731  $ 7,204  
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 95
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The total income tax provision for the years ended December 31 is comprised of the following components:
2020 2019 2018
(in millions)
Current
Federal $ 439 $ 642 $ 649 
State and local 56 81 69 
Foreign 781 897 871 
1,276  1,620  1,589  
Deferred
Federal 106 40 (228)
State and local 9 — (11)
Foreign (42) (47) (5)
73 (7) (244)
Income tax expense $ 1,349  $ 1,613  $ 1,345  
Effective Income Tax Rate
A reconciliat ion of the effective income tax rate to the U.S. federal statutory income tax rate for the years ended December 31, is as
follows:
2020 2019 2018
Amount Percent Amount Percent Amount Percent
(in millions, except percentages)
Income before income taxes $ 7,760  $ 9,731  $ 7,204  
Federal statutory tax 1,630  21.0 % 2,044  21.0 % 1,513  21.0 %
State tax ef fect, net of federal benefit 57 0.7 % 65 0.7 % 46 0.6 %
Foreign tax ef fect (193) (2.5)% (208) (2.1)% (92) (1.3)%
European Commission fine — — % — — % 194 2.7 %
Foreign tax credits — — % (32) (0.3)% (110) (1.5)%
Windfall benefit (119) (1.5)% (129) (1.3)% (72) (1.0)%
Other , net (26) (0.3)% (127) (1.4)% (134) (1.8)%
Income tax expense $ 1,349  17.4 %$ 1,613  16.6 %$ 1,345  18.7 %
Included within the impact of the foreign tax credits is $27 million for 2019 and $90 million for 2018 of tax benefits relating to the carryback of
certain foreign tax credits.
The effective income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 were 17.4%, 16.6% and 18.7%, respectively .
The effective  income tax rate for 2020 was higher than the effective income tax rate for 2019, primarily due to discrete tax benefits in
2019, partial ly offset by a more favorable geographic mix of earnings in 2020. The 2019 discrete tax benefits related to a favorable
court ruling, a reduction  to the Company’ s transition tax liability and additional foreign tax credi ts which can be carried back under
U.S. tax reform transition rules issued by the Department of the T reasury and the Internal Revenue Service.
The effective income tax rate for 2019 was lower than the effective income tax rate for 2018 primarily due to the nondeductible
nature of the fine issued by the European Commission in 2018 and a discrete tax benefit related to a favorable court ruling in 2019.
These 2019 benefits were partially offset by discrete tax benefits in 2018 primarily related to foreign tax credits generated in 2018 as
a result of U.S. tax reform, which can be carrie d back and utilized in 2017 under transition rules issued by the Department of the
Treasury and the Internal Revenue Service.1
1
96 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Singapore Income Tax Rate
In connection with the expansion of the Compa ny’s operations in the Asia Pacific, Middle East and Africa region, the Company’ s
subsidiary in Singapore , Mastercard Asia Pacif ic Pte. Ltd. (“MAPPL”) received an incentive grant from the Singapore Ministry of
Finance in 2010. The incentive had provided MAPPL with, among other benefits, a reduced income tax rate for the 10-year period
commencing January 1, 2010 on taxable income in excess of a base amount. The Company continued to explore business
opportunities in this region, resulting in an expansion of the incentives being granted by the Ministry of Finance, including a further
reduction to the income  tax rate on taxable income in excess of a revised fixed base amou nt commencing July 1, 2011 and
continuing through December 31, 2025. Without the incentive grant, MAPPL would have been subject to the statutory income tax
rate on its earnings. For 2020, 2019 and 2018, the impact of the incentive grant received from the Ministry of Finance resulted in a
reduction of MAPPL ’s income tax liability of $260 million, or $0.26 per diluted share, $300 million, or $0.29 per diluted share, and
$212 million, or $ 0.20 per diluted share, respectively .
Indefinite Reinvestment
As of December 31, 2020 the Company had deferred tax liabilities of $61 million primarily related  to the tax effect of the estimated
foreign exch ange impac t on unremitted earnin gs. The Compa ny expects that foreign withholding taxes associated with future
repatriation of these earnings will not be material. Earnings of approximate ly $0.6 billion rema in permane ntly reinvested and the
Company estimates that immaterial U.S. feder al and state and local income tax expense would result, primarily from foreign
exchange, if these earnings were to be repatriated.
Deferred Taxes
Deferred tax assets and liabilities represent the expected future tax consequences of temporary differences between the carrying
amounts and the tax basis of assets and liabilities. The components of deferred tax assets and liabilities at December 31 are as
follows:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Deferred T ax Assets
Accrued liabilities $ 324 $ 354 
Compensation and benefits 218 214 
State taxes and other credits 47 41 
Net operating and capital losses 147 119 
Unrealized gain/loss - 2015 EUR Notes 58 20 
U.S. foreign tax credits 276 145 
Intangible assets 182 157 
Other items 142 74 
Less: V aluation allowance (353) (205)
Total Deferred T ax Assets 1,041  919 
Deferred T ax Liabilities
Prepaid expenses and other accruals 78 83 
Goodwill and intangible assets 216 187 
Property , plant and equipment 183 128 
Previously taxed earnings and profits 61 — 
Other items 98 63 
Total Deferred T ax Liabilities 636 461 
Net Deferred T ax Assets $ 405 $ 458 
The valuation allowance balance at December 31, 2020 and 2019 primarily relates to the Company’ s ability to recognize future tax
benefits associated with the carry forward of U.S. foreign tax credits generated in the current and prior periods and certain foreign
net operating losses. The recogni tion of the foreign tax credits is dependent upon the realization of future foreign source income in
the appropriate foreign tax credit basket in accordance with U.S. federal income tax law . The recognition of the foreign losses is
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 97
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
dependent upon the future taxable income in such jurisdictions and the ability under tax law in these jurisdictions to utilize net
operating losses following a change in control.
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending  balance for the Company’ s unrecognized tax benefits for the years ended
December 31, is as follows:
2020 2019 2018
(in millions)
Beginning balance $ 203 $ 164 $ 183 
Additions:
Current year tax positions 19 22 23 
Prior year tax positions 192 37 5 
Reductions:
Prior year tax positions (10) (11) (17)
Settlements with tax authorities (12) (2) (18)
Expired statute of limitations (4) (7) (12)
Ending balance $ 388 $ 203 $ 164 
As of December 31, 2020, the amount of unrecognized tax benefit was $388 million. This amount, if recognized, would reduce the
effective income tax rate. The Company’ s unrecognized tax benefits increased primarily due to a prior year tax issue resulting from a
refund claim filed in 2020.
The Compan y is subject to tax in the U.S., Belgium, Singapore, the United Kingdom and various other foreign jurisdictions, as well
as state and local jurisdictions. Uncertain tax positions are reviewed on an ongoing basis and are adjusted after considering facts
and circums tances, including progress of tax audits, developments in case law and closing of statutes of limitation. Within the next
twelve mont hs, the Company believes that the resolution of certain federal, foreign and state and local examinations are reasonably
possible and that a change in estimate, reducing unrecognized tax benefits, may occur .  While such a change may be significant, it
is not possib le to provide a range of the potentia l change until the examinations progress further or the related statutes of limitation
expire. The Compa ny has effectively settled its U.S. federal income tax obligations through 2011. With limited  exception, the
Company is no longer subject to state and local or foreign examinations by tax authorities for years before 2010.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the Company had a net income tax-related interest payable of $24 million and $13 million,
respectively , in its consolidated balance sheet. Tax-related interest income/(expense) in 2020, 2019 and 2018 was not material. In
addition, as of Decembe r 31, 2020 and 2019, the amounts the Company has recognized for penalties payable in its consolidated
balance sheet were not material.
Note 21. Legal and Regulatory Proceedings
Mastercard is a party to legal and regulatory proceedings with respect to a variety of matters in the ordinary course of business. 
Some of these proceed ings are based on complex claims involving substantial uncertaintie s and unascertainable damages. 
Accordingly , except as discussed below , it is not possible to determine the probability of loss or estimate damages, and therefore,
Mastercard has not established reserves for any of these proceedings.  When the Company determines that a loss is both probable
and reasonably estimable, Mastercard records a liability and discloses the amount of the liability if it is material. When a material loss
contingency is only reasonably possible, Master card does not record a liability , but instead discloses the nature and the amount of
the claim, and an estima te of the loss or range of loss, if such an estimate can be made. Unless other wise stated below with respect
to these matters, Mastercard cannot provide an estimate of the possible loss or range of loss based on one or more of the following
reasons: (1) actual or potential plaintif fs have not claimed an amount of monetary damages or the amounts are unsupportable or
exaggerated, (2) the matters are in early stages,  (3) there is uncertainty as to the outcome of pending appeals or motions, (4) there
are significant factual issues to be resolved, (5) the existence in many such proceedings of multiple defendants or potential
defendants whose share of any potential financ ial responsibility has yet to be determined and/or (6) there are novel legal issues
presented. Furthermore, except as identified with respect to the matters below , Mastercard does not believe that the outcome of any
individual existing legal or regulatory proceeding to which it is a party will have a material adverse effect on its results of operations,
financial condition or overall business.  However , an adverse judgment or other outcome or settlement with respect to any
proceedings discussed below could result in fines or payments by Mastercard and/or could require Mastercard to change its
business practices. In addition, an adverse outcome in a regulatory  proceeding could lead to the filing of civil damage claims and
possibly result in significant damage awards. Any of these events could have a material adverse effect on Mastercard’ s results of
operations, financial condition and overall business.
98 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Interchange Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings
Mastercard’ s interchang e fees and other practices are subject to regulatory , legal review and/or challenges in a number of
jurisdictions, including the proceedings described  below . When taken as a whole, the resulting decisions, regulations and legislation
with respect to intercha nge fees and acceptance practices may have a material adverse effect on the Company’ s prospects for
future growth and its overall results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
United States.  In June 2005, the first of a series of complaints were filed on behalf of merchants (the majority of the complaints were
styled as class actions, although a few comp laints were filed on behalf of individual merchant plaintif fs) against Mastercard
International, Visa U.S.A., Inc., Visa Internation al Service Association and a number of financ ial institutions. Taken together , the
claims in the complaints were generally brought under both Sections 1 and 2 of the Sherman Act, which prohibit monopolization and
attempts or conspiracies  to monopolize a particular industry , and some of these complaints contain unfair competition law claims
under state law. The complaints allege, among other things, that Mastercard, Visa, and certain financial institutions conspired to set
the price of interchange  fees, enacted point of sale acceptance rules (including the no surcharg e rule) in violation of antitrust laws
and engaged in unlawful tying and bundling of certain products and services, resulting in merchants paying excessive costs for the
acceptance of Mastercard and Visa credit and debit cards. The cases were consolid ated for pre-trial procee dings in the U.S. District
Court for the Eastern District of New York in MDL No. 1720. The plaintif fs filed a consolidated class action complaint that seeks
treble damages.
In July 2006 , the group of purported merchant class plaintif fs filed a supplemental complaint alleging that Mastercard’ s initial public
offering of its Class A Common Stock in May 2006 (the “IPO”) and certain purported agreemen ts entered into between Mastercard
and financial institutions in connection with the IPO: (1) violate U.S. antitrust laws and (2) constituted a fraudulent conveyance
because the financial institutions allegedly attempted to release, without adequate consideration , Mastercard’ s right to assess them
for Mastercard’ s litigation liabilities. The class plaintif fs sought treble damages and injunctive relief including, but not limited to, an
order reversing and unwinding the IPO.
In February 2011, Mastercard and Mastercard International entered into each of: (1) an omnibu s judgment sharing and settlement
sharing agreement with Visa Inc., Visa U.S.A. Inc. and Visa International Service Association and a number of financial institutions;
and (2) a Mastercard settlement and judgment sharing agreement with a number of financial institutions.  The agreements provide
for the apportionment of certain costs and liabilit ies which Mastercard, the Visa parties and the financial institutions may incur , jointly
and/or severally , in the event of an adverse judgment or settlement of one or all of the cases in the merchant litigations.  Among a
number of scenarios addressed by the agreem ents, in the event of a global settlement involving the Visa parties, the financial
institutions and Mastercard, Mastercard would pay 12% of the monetary portion of the settlement. In the event of a settlement
involving only Mastercard and the financial institutions with respect to their issuance of Mastercard cards, Mastercard would pay
36% of the monetary portion of such settlement. 
In October 2012, the parties entered into a definitive settlement agreement with respect to the merchant class litigation (including
with respect to the claims related to the IPO) and the defendants separately entered into a settle ment agreement with the individual
merchant plaintif fs. The settlements included cash payments that were apportioned among the defendants pursuant to the omnibus
judgment sharing and settlement sharing agreement described above. Mastercard also agreed to provide class members with a
short-term reduction in default credit interchang e rates and to modify certain of its business practices, including its “no surcharge”
rule. The court granted final approval of the settlement in December 2013, and objectors to the settlem ent appealed that decision to
the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit. In June 2016, the court of appeals vacated the class action certification, reversed
the settlement approval and sent the case back to the district court for further proceedings. The court of appeals’ ruling was based
primarily on whether the merchants were adequately represented by counsel in the settlement. As a result of the appellate court
ruling, the district court divided the merchants’ claims into two separate classes - monetary damages claims (the “Damages Class”)
and claims seeking changes to business practices (the “Rules Relief Class”). The court appointed separate counsel for each class.
In September 2018, the parties to the Damages Class litigation entered into a class settlement agreement to resolve the Damages
Class claims. Mastercard increased its reserve by $237 million during 2018 to reflect both its expected financial obligation under the
Damages Class settleme nt agreement and the filed and anticipated opt-out merchant cases. The time period during which Damages
Class members were permitted to opt out of the class settlement agreement ended in July 2019 with merchants representing slightly
more than 25% of the Damages Class interchange volume choosing to opt out of the settlement. The district court granted final
approval of the settlement in December 2019. The district court’ s settlement approval order has been appealed. Mastercard has
commenced settlement negotiations with a number of the opt-out merchants and has reached settlements and/or agreements in
principle to settle a number of these claims. The Damages Class settlement agreement does not relate to the Rules Relief Class
claims. Separate settlement negotiations with the Rules Relief Class are ongoing. In December 2020, the Rules Relief Class filed a
motion for class certification. Briefing on summary judgment motions in the Rules Relief Class and opt-out merchant cases  was
completed in December 2020.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 99
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, Mastercard  had accrued a liability of $783 million  and $914 million, respectively , as a reserve
for both the Damages Class litigation and the opt-out merchant cases. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, Mastercard had $586
million and $584 million, respectively , in a qualified cash settlement fund related to the Damages Class litigation and classified as
restricted cash on its consolidated balance sheet. The reserve as of December 31, 2020 for both the Damages Class litigation and
the opt-out merchants represents Mastercard’ s best estimate of its probable liabilities in these matters. The portion of the accrued
liability relating to both the opt-out merchants and the Damages Class litigation settlement does not represent an estimate of a loss,
if any , if the matters were litigated to a final outcome. Mastercard cannot estimate the potential liability if that were to occur .
Canada.  In December 2010, a proposed class action complaint was commenced against Mastercard in Quebec on behalf of
Canadian merchants. The suit essentially repeated the allegations and arguments of a previously filed application by the Canadian
Competition Bureau to the Canadian Competition Tribunal (dismissed in Mastercard’ s favor) concerning certain Mastercard rules
related to point-of-sale acceptance, including the “honor all cards” and “no surcharge” rules. The Quebec suit sought compensatory
and punitive  damages in unspecified amounts, as well as injunctive relief. In the first half of 2011, additional purported class action
lawsuits were commenced in British Columbia and Ontario against Mastercard, Visa and a number of large Canadian financial
institutions. The British Columbia suit sought compensatory damages in unspecified amounts, and the Ontario suit sought
compensatory damages  of $5 billion on the basis of alleged conspiracy and various alleged breaches of the Canadian Competition
Act. Additional purported class action complaints were commenced in Saskatchewan and Alberta with claims that largely mirror
those in the other suits. In June 2017, Mastercard entered into a class settlement agreement to resolve all of the Canadian class
action litigation. The settlement, which requires Mastercard to make a cash payment and modify its “no surcharge” rule, has received
court approval in each Canadian province. Objectors to the settlem ent have sought to appeal the approval orders. All appellate
courts have rejected the objectors’ appeals. In one of the appeals, the objectors have until April 2021 to request an appeal to the
Supreme Court of Canada. For the remainder of the appeals, the Supreme Court has previously denied such requests.
Europe.  In July 2015, the Europ ean Commission (“EC”) issued a Statement of Objections related to Mastercard’ s interregional
interchange fees and central acquiring rule within the European Economic Area (the “EEA”). The Statement of Objections, which
followed an investigation opened in 2013, included preliminary conclusions concerning the alleged anticompetitive effects of these
practices. In December 2018, Mastercard announced the anticipated resolution of the EC’s investi gation. With respect to
interregional interchang e fees, Mastercard made a settlement proposal whereby it would make changes to its interregional
interchange fees. The EC issued a decision accepting the settlement in April 2019, with changes to interregional interchange fees
going into effect in the fourth quarter of 2019. In addition, with respect to Mastercard’ s historic central acquiring rule, the EC issued a
negative decision in January 2019. The EC’s negative decision covers a period of time of less than two years before the rule’s
modification. The rule was modified in late 2015 to comply with the requirements of the EEA Interchange Fee Regulation. The
decision does not require any modification of Mastercard’ s current business practices but included a fine of €571 million, which was
paid in April 2019. Mastercard incurred a charge of $ 654 million in 2018 in relation to this matter .
Since May 2012, a number of United Kingdom (“U.K.”) merchants filed claims or threatened litigation against Mastercard seeking
damages for merchants allegedly paying exces sive costs for the acceptance of Mastercard credit and debit cards arising out of
alleged anti-competitive conduct with respect to, among other things, Mastercard’ s cross-border interchange fees and its U.K. and
Ireland domestic interchange fees (the “U.K. Merchant claimants”). In addition, Mastercard, has faced similar filed or threatened
litigation by merchants with respect to interchange rates in other countries in Europe (the “Pan-European Merchant claimants”). In
aggregate, the alleged damages claims from the U.K. and Pan-European Merchant claimants were in the amount of approximately
£3 billion (approximately $4.5 billion as of December 31, 2020). Mastercard has resolved over £2 billion (approximately $3 billion as
of December 31, 2020) of these damages claims through settlement or judgment.
In January 2017, Mastercard received a liability judgment in its favor on all significant matters in a separate action brought by ten of
the U.K. Merchant claimants. Three  of the U.K. Merchant claimants appealed the judgment, and these appeals were combined with
Mastercard’ s appeal of a 2016 judgment in favor of one U.K. merch ant. In July 2018, the U.K. appellate court heard the appeals of
the four merchants and ruled against both Mastercard and Visa on two of the three  legal issues being considered. The parties
appealed the rulings to the U.K. Supreme Court. In June 2020, the U.K. Supreme Court ruled against Mastercard and Visa with
respect to one of the liability issues being considered by the Court related to U.K domestic interchange fees. Additionally , the U.K
Supreme Court set out the legal standard that should be applied by lower trial courts with respect to determining whether
interchange was exemptible under applicable law, and provided guidance to lower courts with regard to the legal standard that
should be applied in assessing merchants’ damages claims. The U.K. Supreme Cour t sent one of the four merchant cases back to
the trial court for a determination of liability and damages issues and sent the remaining three  merchant cases back to the trial court
for a determination of damages issues only . A hearing in one of these merchant cases on liability and damages issues is expected to
be schedule d for the fourth quarter of 2021, while a trial on damages for the other three merchant claims is not expected to occur
until 2023.
Since June 2015, Mastercard has recorded litigation provisions for settlements, judgments and legal fees relating to these claims,
including charges of $237 million in 2018. Mastercard continues to litigate with the remaining U.K. and Pan-European Merchant
claimants and it has submitted statements of defense disputing liability and damages claims. The majority of these merchant claims
100 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
generally had been stayed pending the decision of the U.K. Supreme Court, and a number of those matters are now progressing
with motion practice and discovery . Mastercard incurred charges of $22 million in 2020 to reflect both the estimated attorneys’ fees
incurred by the four merchant claimants in the U.K. Supreme Court  appeal, as well as settlements with a number of Pan-European
merchants.
In Septembe r 2016, a proposed collective action was filed in the United Kingdom on behalf of U.K. consumers seeking damages for
intra-EEA and domestic U.K. interchange fees that were allegedly passed on to consumers by merchants between 1992 and 2008.
The complaint, which seeks to leverage the European Commission’ s 2007 decision on intra-EEA interchange fees, claims damages
in an amount that excee ds £14 billion (appr oximately $19 billion as of December 31, 2020). In July 2017, the trial court denied the
plaintif fs’ application for the case to proceed as a collective action. In April 2019, the U.K. appellate court granted the plaintif fs’
appeal of the trial court’s decision and sent the case back to the trial court for a re-hearing  on the plaintif fs’ collective action
application. In Decembe r 2020, the U.K. Supreme Court rejected Mastercard’ s appeal of this ruling. The case has been sent back to
the trial court for a re-he aring on the plaintif fs’ collective action application in light of the Supre me Court decision. The hearing is
scheduled to occur in late March 2021.
ATM Non-Discrimination Rule Surcharge Complaints
In October 2011, a trade association of independent Automated Teller Machine (“ATM”) operators and 13 independent ATM
operators filed a complaint styled as a class action lawsuit in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia against both
Mastercard and Visa (the “ATM Operators Comp laint”).  Plaintif fs seek to represent a class of non-bank operators of ATM terminals
that operate in the United States with the discretion to determine the price of the ATM access  fee for the terminals they operate.
Plaintif fs allege that Mastercard and Visa have violated Section 1 of the Sherman Act by imposing rules that require ATM operators
to charge non-discriminatory ATM surcharges for transactions processed over Mastercard’ s and Visa’s respective networks that are
not greater than the surcharge for transactions over other networks accepted at the same ATM.  Plaintif fs seek both injunctive and
monetary relief equal to treble the damages they claim to have sustained as a result of the alleg ed violations and their costs of suit,
including attorneys’ fees. 
Subsequently , multiple related complaints were  filed in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia alleging both federal
antitrust and multiple state unfair competition, consumer protection and common law claims against Mastercard and Visa on behalf
of putative classes of users of ATM services (the “ATM Consumer Complaints”).  The claims in these actions largely mirror the
allegations made in the ATM Operators Complaint, although these complaints seek damage s on behalf of consumers of ATM
services who pay allegedly inflated ATM fees at both bank and non-bank ATM operators as a result of the defendants’ ATM rules. 
Plaintif fs seek both injunctive and monetary relief equal to treble the damages they claim to have sustained as a result of the alleged
violations and their costs of suit, including attorneys’ fees. 
In January 2012, the plaintif fs in the ATM Operators Complaint and the ATM Consumer Complaints filed amended class action
complaints that largely mirror their prior complai nts. In February 2013, the district court granted Mastercard’ s motion to dismiss the
complaints for failure to state a claim. On appeal, the Court of Appeals reversed the district court’ s order in August 2015 and sent the
case back for further proceedings. In September 2019, the plaintif fs filed their motions for class certification in which the plaintif fs, in
aggregate, allege over $1 billion in damages again st all of the defendants. Mastercard intends to vigorously defend against both the
plaintif fs’ liability and damages claims and has opposed class certification. Briefing on class certification is complete.
U.S. Liability Shift Litigation
In March 2016, a proposed U.S. merchant class action complaint was filed in federal court in California alleging that Mastercard,
Visa, American Express and Discover (the “Netw ork Defendants”), EMVCo and a number of issuing banks (the “Bank Defendants”)
engaged in a conspiracy  to shift fraud liability for card present transactions from issuing banks to merchants not yet in compliance
with the standards for EMV chip cards in the United States (the “EMV Liability Shift”), in violation of the Sherman Act and California
law.  Plaintif fs allege damages equal to the value of all chargebacks for which class members became liable as a result of the EMV
Liability Shift on October 1, 2015. The plaintif fs seek treble damages, attorney’ s fees and costs and an injunction against future
violations of governing law, and the defendants have filed a motion to dismiss. In September 2016, the district court denied the
Network Defendants’ motion to dismiss the complaint, but granted such a motion for EMVCo and the Bank Defendants. In May
2017, the district court transferred the case to New York so that discovery could be coordin ated with the U.S. merchant class
interchange litigation described above. In August 2020, the district court issued an order granting the plaintif fs’ request for class
certification. In January 2021, the Network Defendants’ request for permission to appeal the district court’ s certification decision to
the appellate court was denied. The case is proceeding with substantive expert discovery .
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 101
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Telephone Consumer Protection Class Action
Mastercard is a defendant in a Telephone Consumer Protection Act (“TCP A”) class action pending in Florida. The plaintif fs are
individuals and businesses who allege that appro ximately 381,000  unsolicited faxes were sent to them advertising a Mastercard co-
brand card issued by First Arkansas Bank (“FAB”). The TCPA provides for uncapped statutory damages of $500 per fax. Mastercard
has asserted  various defenses to the claims, and has notified FAB of an indemnity claim that it has (which FAB has disputed). In
June 2018, the district court granted Mastercard’ s motion to stay the proceedings until the Federal Communications Commission
makes a decision on the application of the TCPA to online fax services. In December 2019, the FCC issued a declaratory ruling
clarifying that the TCPA does not apply to faxes sent to online fax services that are received via e-mail. As a result of the ruling, the
stay of the litigation was lifted in January 2020. In January 2021, the magistrate judge serving on the district court issued a decision
recommending that the district court judge deny plaintif fs’ class certification motion. The plaintif fs have the opportunity to file
objections to this decision with the district court judge.
U.S. Federal Trade Commission Investigation
In June 2020, the U.S. Federal Trade Commission’ s Bureau of Competition (“FTC”) informed Mastercard that it has initiated a formal
investigation into compliance with the Durbin Amendment to the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform  and Consumer Protection Act. In
particular , the investigat ion focuses on Masterca rd’s compliance with the debit routing provisions of the Durbin Amendment.  The
FTC has issued a subpoena and Mastercard is cooperating with it in the investigation.
U.K. Prepaid Cards Matter
Mastercard is subject to an ongoing confidential legal matter related to prepaid cards in the U.K. This matter focuses exclusively on
historic behavior , and has no prospective impact on Mastercard’ s on-going business. In connection with this matter , in the fourth
quarter of 2020, Mastercard recorded a litigation charge of $ 45 million.
Note 22. Settlement and Other Risk Management
Mastercard’ s rules guarantee the settlement of many of the transactions between its custom ers (“settlement risk”). Settlement
exposure is the settlement risk to customers under Mastercard’ s rules due to the differenc e in timing between the payment
transaction date and subsequent settlement. While the term and amount of the guarantee are unlimited, the duration of settlement
exposure is short term and typically limited to a few days.
Gross settlement exposure is estimated using the average daily payment volume during the three months prior to period end
multiplied by the estimated number of days of exposure. The Company has globa l risk management policies and procedures, which
include risk standards, to provide a framework for managing the Company’ s settlement risk and exposure. In the event of a failed
customer , Mastercard may pursue one or more remedies available under the Company’ s rules to recover potential losses.
Historically , the Company has experienced a low level of losses from customer failures.
As part of its policies, Mastercard requires certain customers that are not in compliance with the Company’ s risk standards to post
collateral, such as cash, letters of credit, guarant ees, or other risk mitigating arrangements. This requirem ent is based on a review of
the individua l risk circumstances for each custom er. Mastercard monitors its credit risk portfolio on a regular basis and the adequacy
of collateral on hand. Additionally , from time to time, the Company reviews its risk management methodology and standards. As
such, the amounts of estimated settlement exposure are revised as necessary .
The Company’ s estimated settlement exposure was as follows at December 31:
2020 2019
(in millions)
Gross settlement exposure $ 52,360  $ 55,800  
Collateral applied to settlement exposure (6,021 ) (4,772 )
Net uncollateralized settlement exposure $ 46,339  $ 51,028  
Mastercard also provides guarantees to customers and certain other counterparties indemnifying them from losses stemming from
failures of third parties to perform duties. This include s guarantees of Mastercard-branded travelers cheques issued, but not yet
cashed of $370 million and $367 million at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively , of which $294 millio n and $290 million at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively , is mitigated by collateral arrangements. In addition, the Company enters into
agreements in the ordina ry course of business under which the Company agrees to indemnify third parties against damages, losses
and expenses incurred in connection with legal and other proceedings arising from relationships  or transactions with the Company .
Certain indemnifications do not provide a stated maximum exposure. As the extent of the Company’ s obligations under these
agreements depends entirely upon the occurrence of future events, the Company’ s potential future liability under these agreements
102 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
is not determ inable. Historically , payments made by the Company under these types of contractual arrangements have not been
material.
Note 23. Derivative and Hedging Instruments
The Compa ny monitors and manages its foreign currency and interest rate exposures as part of its overall risk management
program which focuses on the unpredictability of financial markets and seeks to reduce the potentially adverse effects that the
volatility of these market s may have on its operating results.  A primary objective of the Company’ s risk management strategies is to
reduce the financial impact that may arise from volatility in foreign currency exchange rates principally through the use of both
foreign exch ange derivative contracts (Derivatives) and foreign currency denominated debt (Net Investment Hedge). In addition, the
Company may enter into interest rate derivative contracts to manage the effects of interest rate movements on the Company’ s
aggregate liability portfolio, including potential future debt issuances (Cash Flow Hedges).
Foreign Exchange Risk
Derivatives
The Compan y enters into foreign exchange derivative contracts to manage currency exposure associated with anticipated receipts
and disbursements which are valued based on currencies other than the functional currency of the entity . The Company may also
enter into foreign exchange derivative contracts  to offset possible changes in value due to foreign exchange fluctuations of assets
and liabilities. In addition, the Company is subject to foreign exchange risk as part of its daily settlement activities. This risk is
typically limited to a few days between when a payment transaction takes place and the subsequent settlement with customers. To
manage this risk, the Company enters into short duration foreign exchange derivative contracts based upon anticipated receipts and
disbursements for the respective currency position. The objective of these activities is to reduce the Company’ s exposure to gains
and losses resulting from fluctuations of foreign currencies against its functional currencies.
The Company’ s derivative contracts are summarized below:
 December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
 NotionalFair
 Value NotionalFair
 Value
 (in millions)
Commitments to purchase foreign currency $ 389 $ 17 $ 185 $ 3 
Commitments to sell foreign currency 1,110  (26) 1,506  (25)
Options to sell foreign currency — — 21 2 
Balance sheet location
Prepaid expenses and other current assets $ 19 $ 12 
Other current liabilities (28) (32)
The derivative contracts are subject to enforceable master netting arrangements, which contain various netting and setoff provisions.
The amount of gain (loss) recognized on the consolidated statement of operations for the contracts to purchase and sell foreign
currency is summarized below:
 Year Ended December 31,
 2020 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Foreign exchange derivative contracts
General and administrative $ 40 $ (39)$ 53 
The fair value of the foreign exchange derivative contracts generally reflects the estimated amou nts that the Company would receive
(or pay), on a pre-tax basis, to terminate the contracts. The terms of the foreign  exchange derivative contracts are generally less
than 18 months. The Company had no deferred gains or losses related to foreign exchange contracts in accumulated other
comprehensive income as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, as these contracts were not designated as hedging instruments for
accounting.
The Compan y’s derivativ e financial instruments are subject to both market and counterparty credit risk. Market risk is the potential
for economic losses to be incurred on market risk sensitive instruments arising from adverse changes in market factors such as1
1
1
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 103
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
foreign currency exchange rates, interest rates and other related variables. Counterparty credit risk is the risk of loss due to failure of
the counterparty to perform its obligations in accordance with contractual terms. To mitigate counterparty credit risk, the Company
enters into derivative contracts with a diversified group of selected financial institutions based upon their credit ratings and other
factors. Generally , the Company does not obtain collateral related to derivatives because of the high credit ratings of the
counterparties.
Net Investment Hedge
The Company uses foreign currency denominated debt to hedge a portion of its net investment in foreign operations against adverse
movements in exchange rates, with changes in the value of the debt recorded within currency translation adjustment in accumulated
other comprehensive income (loss). In 2015, the Company designated its €1.65 billion euro-denominated debt as a net investment
hedge for a portion of its net investment in European operations. As of December 31, 2020, the Company had a net foreign currency
transaction loss of $ 175 million after tax, in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) associated with hedging activity .
Interest Rate Risk
Cash Flow Hedges
During the fourth quarte r of 2019, the Company entered into treasury rate locks for a total notion al amount of $1 billion, which were
accounted for as cash flow hedges. These contracts were entered into to hedge a portion of the Company’ s interest rate exposure
attributable to changes in the treasury rates related to the forecasted debt issuance during 2020 . The maximum length of time over
which the Company had hedged its exposure was 30 years. In connectio n with the issuance of the 2020 USD Notes, these contracts
were settled  and the Company paid $175 million. As of December 31, 2020, a cumulative loss of $133 million, after tax, was
recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) associated with these contracts and will be reclassified as an
adjustment to interest expense over the respective terms of the 2020 USD Notes. As of Decem ber 31, 2019, the Company recorde d
a pre-tax net unrealized  gain of $14 million ($11 millio n, after tax) in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) associated
with these contracts.
In 2020, the Company reclassified $ 4 million, pre-tax, of the deferred loss on cash flow derivative contracts recorded in accumulated
other comprehensive income (loss) to interest expense on the statement of operations. The Company estimates that $6 million, pre-
tax, of the deferred loss will be reclassified into interest expense within the next 12 months.
Note 24. Segment Reporting
Mastercard has conclud ed it has one reportable operating segment, “Payment Solutions.” Mastercard’ s Chief Executive Officer has
been identified as the chief operating decision-maker . All of the Company’ s activities are interrelated, and each activity is dependent
upon and supportive of the other . Accordingly , all significant operating decisions are based upon analysis of Mastercard at the
consolidated level.
Revenue by geographic market is based on the location of the Company’ s customer that issued the card, as well as the location of
the merchant acquirer where the card is being used. Revenue generated in the U.S. was approximately 33% of total revenue in
2020, 32% in 2019 and 33% in 2018. No individual country , other than the U.S., generated more than 10% of total revenue in those
periods. Mastercard did not have any individual customer that generated greater than 10% of net revenue in 2020, 2019 or 2018.
The followin g table reflects the geographical location of the Company’ s property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net, as of
December 31:
2020 2019 2018
(in millions)
United States $ 1,185  $ 1,147  $ 613 
Other countries 717 681 308 
Total $ 1,902  $ 1,828  $ 921 
104 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
Item 9. Changes in and disagreements with accountants on
accounting and financial disclosure
Not applicable.
Item 9A. Controls and procedures
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Our disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended (the “Exchange Act”) are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed  in the reports that we file or submit
under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the rules and forms of
the Securities and Exchange Commission and to ensure that information required to be disclosed is accumulated and communicated
to management, including our President and Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer, to allow timely decisions
regarding disclosure. The President and Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer, with assistance from other members
of management, have reviewed the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2020 and, based on
their evaluation, have concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures were ef fective as of such date.
Internal Control over Financial Reporting
In addition, Mastercard  Incorporated’ s management assessed the effectiveness of Masterca rd’s internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2020. Management’ s report on internal control over financial reporting is included in Part II, Item 8.
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, has audited the consolidated financial statements
included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and, as part of their audit, has issued their report, included herein, on the effectiveness
of our internal control over financial reporting.
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
There was no change in Mastercard’ s internal control over financial reporting that occurre d during the three months ended
December 31, 2020 that has materially affecte d, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, Mastercard’ s internal control over
financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other Information
Pursuant to Section 219 of the Iran Threat Reduction and Syria Human Rights Act of 2012, we hereby incorporate by reference
herein the disclosure contained in Exhibit 99.1 of this Report.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 105
PART III
Item 10. Directors, executive officers and corporate governance
Item 11. Executive compensation
Item 12. Security ownership of certain beneficial owners and
management and related stockholder matters
Item 13. Certain relationships and related transactions, and
director independence
Item 14. Principal accountant fees and services
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Item 10. Directors, executive of ficers and corporate governance
Information regarding our executive officers is included in section “Information about our execut ive officers” in Part I of this Report.
Additional information required by this Item with respect to our directors and executive officers, code of ethics, procedures for
recommending nominees, audit committee, audit committee financial experts and compliance with Section 16(a) of the Exchange
Act will appear in our definitive proxy statement to be filed with the SEC and delivered to stockh olders in connection with our 2021
annual meeting of stockholders (the “Proxy Statement”).
The aforementioned information in the Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Report.
Item 11. Executive compensation
The information required by this Item with respe ct to executive officer and director compensation will appear in the Proxy Statement
and is incorporated by reference into this Report.
Item 12. Security ownership of certain beneficial owners and
management and related stockholder matters
The informa tion required by this Item with respect to security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management equity and
compensation plans will appear in the Proxy Statement and is incorporated by reference into this Report.
Item 13. Certain relationships and related transactions, and
director independence
The information required by this Item with respect to transactions with related persons, the review, approval or ratification of such
transactions and director independence will appear in the Proxy Statement and is incorporated by reference into this Report.
Item 14. Principal accountant fees and services
The informa tion required by this Item with respect to auditors’ services and fees will appear in the Proxy Statement and is
incorporated by reference into this Report.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 107
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and financial statement schedules
Item 16. Form 10-K summary
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Item 15. Exhibits and financial statement schedules
(a) The following documents are filed as part of this Report:
1Consolidated Financial Statements
See Index to Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8.
2Consolidated Financial Statement Schedules
None.
3The following exhibits are filed as part of this Report or, where indicated, were previously filed and are hereby incorporated
by reference:
Refer to the Exhibit Index included herein.
Item 16. Form 10-K summary
None.
MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K 109
Exhibit index
Exhibit number Exhibit Description
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Mastercard Incorporated (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed September 29, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
3.2 Amended and Restated  By-Laws  of Masterca rd Incorpor ated (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the
Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 21, 2020  (File No. 001-32877)).
4.1 Indenture, dated as of March 31, 2014, between the Company and Deutsche Bank T rust Company Americas, as
trustee (inco rporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March
31, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.2 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of March 31, 2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of the
Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 31, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.3 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.000% Notes due 2019 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of March 31, 2014) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 31, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.4 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.375% Notes due 2024 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of March 31, 2014) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 31, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.5 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of December 1, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 1, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.6 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 1.100% Notes due 2022 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of December 1, 2015) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 1, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.7 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.100% Notes due 2027 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of December 1, 2015) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 1, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.8 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.500% Notes due 2030 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of December 1, 2015) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 1, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.9 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of November 21, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.10 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.000% Notes due 2021 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of November 21, 2016) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.11 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.950% Notes due 2026 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of November 21, 2016) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.12 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.800% Notes due 2046 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of November 21, 2016) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.13 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of February 26, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 26, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.14 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.5% Notes due 2028 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of February 26, 2018) (inco rporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the of the Company’ s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 26, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.15 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.95% Notes due 2048 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of February 26, 2018) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on February 26, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.16 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of May 31, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the
Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 31, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.17 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.950% Notes due 2029 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of May 31, 2019) (incorporat ed by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on May 31, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.18 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.650% Notes due 2049 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company datedasofMay 312019) (incorporat edbyreference toExhibit 41oftheCompany’ sCurrent Report
Company , dated as of May 31, 2019) (incorporat ed by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on May 31, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.19 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of December 3, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 3, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.20 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.000% Notes due 2025 (included in Of ficer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of December 3, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 3, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.21 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of March 26, 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the
Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 26, 2020 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.22 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.300% Notes due 2027 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of March 26, 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 26, 2020 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.23 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.350% Notes due 2030 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of March 26, 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 26, 2020 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.24 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.850% Notes due 2050 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of March 26, 2020) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on March 26, 2020 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.25* Description of Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
10.1 $6,000,000,000 Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November 14, 2019, among Mastercard
Incorporated, the several lenders and agents from time to time party thereto, Citibank, N.A., as managing
administrative agent and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as administrative agent  (incor porated by refere nce to
Exhibit 10.1 to the Company ’s Annual Report on For m 10-K filed February 14, 2020 (File No. 001-32877)) .
10.2+ Employment Agreement  between Mastercard International Incorporated and Ajaypal Banga, dated as of July 1,
2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 8, 2010
(File No. 001-32877)).
10.2.1+* Employment Letter Agreement between Masterc ard International Incorporated and Ajaypal Banga, dated as of
December 31, 2020.
10.3+ Employment Agreement between Martina Hund-Mejean and Mastercard International, amended and restated as
of December 24, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K
filed February 14, 2013 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.3.1+ Amendment to Amended and Restated Employm ent Agreement between Martina Hund-Mejean and Mastercard
International, dated as of December 21, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3.1 to the Company’ s
Annual Report on Form 10-K filed February 14, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.4+ Contract of Employment between Mastercard UK Management Services Limited and Ann Cairns, amended and
restated as of April 5, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quar terly Report on
Form 10-Q filed May 2, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.4.1+ Deed of Employment between Mastercard UK Management Services Limited and Ann Cairns, dated July 6,
2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8.2 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed February
16, 2012 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.5+ Description of Employment Arrangement with Craig Vosburg (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 2, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.6+ Description of Employment Arrangement with Gilberto Caldart (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.7+ Description of Employment Arrangement with Tim Murphy (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.8+ Description of Employment Arrangement with Michael Froman (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 29, 2020 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.9+ Description of Employment Arrangement with Sachin Mehra (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 29, 2020 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.10+ Description of Employment Arrangement with Michael Miebach (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 29, 2020 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.11+* Mastercard Internationa l Senior Executive Annual Incentive Compensation Plan, as amende d and restated
effective February 4, 2019  .
10.12+ Mastercard International Incorporated Restoration Program, as amended and restated January 1, 2007 unless
otherwise provided (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.22 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K
filed February 19, 2009 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.13+ Mastercard Incorporated  Deferral Plan, as amended and restated effective December 1, 2008 for account
balances established after December 31, 2004 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.25 to the Company’ s
Annual Report on Form 10-K filed February 19, 2009 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.14+ Mastercard Incorporated  2006 Long Term Incentive Plan, amended and restated effective June 5, 2012
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed August 1, 2012
(File No. 001-32877)).
10.15+ Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement for awards under 2006 Long Term Incentive Plan (effective for awards
granted on and subsequent to March 1, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.16+ Form of Stock Option Agreement for awards under 2006 Long Term Incentive Plan (effective for awards granted
on and subsequent to March 1, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.17+ Form of Performance Stock Unit Agreem ent for awards under 2006 Long Term Incentive Plan (effective for
awards granted on and subsequent to March 1, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.18+ Form of Mastercard Incorporated Long Term Incentive Plan Non-Competition and Non-Solicita tion Agreement
for named executive officers (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.17 to the Company’ s Annual Report on
Form 10-K filed February 16, 2012 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.19+ Amended and Restated Mastercard International Incorporated Executive Severance Plan, amended and
restated as of April 10, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed May 2, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.20+ Amended and Restated Mastercard International Incorporated Change in Control Severance Plan, amended
and restated as of June 25, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q filed July 26, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.21 Schedule of Non-Employee Directors’ Annual Compensation effective as of June 25, 2019 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed July 30, 2019  (File No. 001-
32877)).
10.22 2006 Non-Employee Director Equity Compensation Plan, amended and restated effective as of June 26, 2018
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed July 26, 2018
(File No. 001-32877)).
10.23 Form of Deferred Stock Unit Agreement for awards under 2006 Non-Employee Director Equity Compensation
Plan, amended and restated effective June 26, 2018 (effective for awards granted on and subsequent to June
25, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form  10-Q filed July
30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.24 Form of Restricted Stock  Agreement for awards under 2006 Non-Employee Director Equity Com pensation Plan,
amended and restated effective June 26, 2018 (effective for awards granted on and subsequent to June 25,
2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed July 30,
2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.25 Form of Indemnification Agreement between Mastercard Incorporated and certain of its director s (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 2, 2006 (File No. 000-
50250)).
10.26 Form of Indemnification Agreement between Mastercard Incorporated and certain of its director nominees
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 2, 2006
(File No. 000-50250)).
10.27 Deed of Gift between Mastercard Incorporated and Mastercard Foundation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.28 to Pre-Ef fective Amendment No. 5 to the Company’ s Registration Statement on Form S-1 filed May 3,
2006 (File No. 333-128337)).
10.28 Settlement Agreement, dated as of June 4, 2003, between Mastercard International Incorporated and Plaintif fs
in the class action litigation entitled In Re Visa Check/MasterMoney Antitrust Litigation (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed August 8, 2003  (File No. 000-
50250)).
10.29 Stipulation and Agreement of Settlement, dated July 20, 2006, between Mastercard Incorporat ed, the several
defendants and the plaintif fs in the consolidated federal class action lawsuit titled In re Foreign Currency
Conversion Fee Antitrust Litigation (MDL 1409), and the California state court action titled Schwartz v. Visa Int’l
Corp., et al. (incorporated by reference to Exhib it 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed
November 1, 2006 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.30 Omnibus Agreement Regarding Interchange Litigation Judgment Sharing and Settlement Shari ng, dated as of
February 7, 2011, by and among Mastercard Incorporated, Mastercard International Incorpor ated, Visa Inc.,
Visa U.S.A.  Inc., Visa International Service Association and Mastercard’ s customer banks that are parties
thereto (inco rporated by reference to Exhibit 10.33 to Amendment No.1 to the Company’ s Annual Report on
Form 10-K/A filed on November 23, 2011).
10.30.1 Amendment to Omnibus Agreement Regarding Interchange Litigation Judgment Sharing and Settlement
Sharing, dated as of August 25, 2014, by and among Mastercard Incorporated, Masterca rd International
Incorporated, Visa Inc., Visa U.S.A Inc., Visa International Service Association and Mastercard’ s customer
banks that are parties thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed October 30, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.30.2 Second Amendment to Omnibus Agreement Regarding Interchange Litigation Judgment Sharing and
Settlement Sharing, dated as of October 22, 2015, by and among Mastercard Incorporate d, Mastercard
International Incorporate d, Visa Inc., Visa U.S.A Inc., Visa International Service Association and Mastercard’ s
customer banks that are parties thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Comp any’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed October 29, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.31** Mastercard Settlement and Judgment Sharing  Agreement, dated as of February 7, 2011, by and among
Mastercard Incorporated , Mastercard International Incorporated and Mastercard’ s customer banks that are
parties there to (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.34 to Amendment No.1 to the Company’ s Annual Report
on Form 10-K/A filed on November 23, 2011).
10.31.1 Amendment to Mastercard Settlement and Judgment Sharing Agreement, dated as of August 26, 2014, by and
among Mast ercard Incorporated, Mastercard International Incorporated and Mastercard’ s customer banks that
are parties thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
filed October 30, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.31.2 Second Amendment to Mastercard Settlement and Judgment Sharing Agreement, dated as of October 22,
2015, by and among Mastercard Incorporated, Mastercard International Incorporated and Mastercard’ s
customer banks that are parties thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Comp any’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed October 29, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.32 Superseding and Amended Class Settlement Agreement, dated September 17, 2018, by and among Mastercard
Incorporated and Mastercard International Incorporated; Visa, Inc., Visa U.S.A. Inc. and Visa International
Service Asso ciation; the Class Plaintif fs defined therein; and the Customer Banks defined therein (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed September 18, 2018 (File No.
001-32877)).
21*   List of Subsidiaries of Mastercard Incorporated.
23.1* Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP .
31.1*
  Certification of Michael Miebach , President and Chief Executive Officer, pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a),
as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2*
  Certification of Sachin Mehra, Chief Financial Officer, pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a), as adopted
pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1*
  Certification of Michael Miebach , President and Chief Executive Officer, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2*
  Certification of Sachin Mehra, Chief Financial Officer, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant
to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
99.1* Disclosure pursuant to Section 219 of the Iran Threat Reduction and Syria Human Rights Act of 2012.
101.INS
  XBRL Instance Document - the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its
XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCH*   XBRL T axonomy Extension Schema Document
101.CAL*   XBRL T axonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.DEF*   XBRL T axonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
101.LAB*   XBRL T axonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
101.PRE*   XBRL T axonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
+    Management contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements.
*    Filed or furnished herewith.
**    Exhibit omits certain information that has been filed separately with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission and has been granted
confidential treatment.
The agreem ents and other documents filed as exhibits to this report are not intended to provide factual information or other
disclosure other than with respect to the terms of the agreements or other documents themselves, and should not be relied upon for
that purpose. In particular , any representations and warranties made by the Company in these agreements or other documents were
made solely  within the specific context of the relevant agreement or document and may not desc ribe the actual state of affairs as of
the date they were made or at any other time.
110 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
Signatures
Pursuant to the requirem ents of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
Annual Report on Form 10-K to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
MASTERCARD INCORPORA TED
(Registrant)
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ MICHAEL MIEBACH
 Michael Miebach
 President and Chief Executive Officer
 (Principal Executive Officer)
Pursuant to the requir ements of the Securiti es Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated:
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ MICHAEL MIEBACH
 Michael Miebach
 President and Chief Executive Officer; Director
 (Principal Executive Officer)
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ SACHIN MEHRA
 Sachin Mehra
 Chief Financial Officer
 (Principal Financial Officer)
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ SANDRA ARKELL
 Sandra Arkell
 Corporate Controller
 (Principal Accounting Officer)
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ AJA Y BANGA
Ajay Banga
Executive Chairman; Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ RICHARD K. DA VIS
Richard K. Davis
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ STEVEN J. FREIBERG
Steven J. Freiberg
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ JULIUS GENACHOWSKI
Julius Genachowski
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ CHOON PHONG GOH
Choon Phong Goh
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ MERIT E. JANOW
Merit E. Janow
Lead Independent Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ OKI MA TSUMOT O
Oki Matsumoto
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ YOUNGME MOON
Youngme Moon
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ RIMA QURESHI
Rima Qureshi
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ JOSÉ OCT AVIO REYES LAGUNES
José Octavio Reyes Lagunes
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ GABRIELLE SULZBERGER
Gabrielle Sulzberger
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ JACKSON T AI
Jackson T ai
Director
Date: February 12, 2021 By: /s/ LANCE UGGLA
Lance Uggla
Director
111 MASTERCARD 2020 FORM 10-K
